label	text0	text1
1	bbc news bbc service cut outlined staff	Sketched BBC News Personnel Reduction Service.
1	shame info dissemination bbc confirms service cut	It's the only way to get the information you need.
1	bbc service cut outlined staff	BBC downsizing.
2	looter destroy mummy egyptian museum official jan egypt daddy	Jan Egypt Daddy, official representative of the museum, destroys the Egyptian mummy.
2	thousand egyptian form human chain egypt museum protect looting aljazeera	Thousand Egyptians forming a Human Chain Egyptian Museum protecting the plundering of l' aljazeera.
2	artifact stolen egyptian museum cairo sad	Artifact stolen Egyptian Museum sad cairo.
2	gamble care egyptian museum artifact freedom people egypt	Egyptian Gaming Care artifact Egyptian Freedom Museum.
2	reuters reporting looter break national museum yesterday destroy mummy	Reuters reports that looters smashed the National Museum yesterday, destroying Mummy.
2	damaged artifact egyptian national museum cap al jazeera live stream egypt jan	Damaged artifact Cap al jazeera Egyptian National Museum live stream Jan Egypt.
2	looter smashed egypt national museum damaged priceless artifact picture	A looter destroyed the Egyptian National Museum, damaging a photograph of it; priceless artifact.
2	egypt military secures famed antiquity museum	The Egyptian army ensures the security of the famous D&apos Museum.
2	cairo building adjacent egypt national museum priceless collection pheoronic art entirely fire	Cairo built adjacent to the apos; Egypt National inestimable Phaoronic collection fire fully phaoronic art.
2	al jazeera thousand egyptian youth form human shield protect egyptian museum museum egypt jan	Thousands of young Egyptians form a human shield to protect the museum.
2	touching story protester protecting museum jan egypt	It's the first museum in the world to be built on the foundation of a museum.
2	looter destroy mummy egyptian museum official	The ransacking destroys the official Egyptian mummy of the museum.
2	egypt army secures museum pharaonic treasure report cairo reuters army unit secured egyptian mu	The Egyptian army secures the Pharaoh's Museum of Treasure from Cairo to Cairo, and the Egyptian army secures the Egyptian army.
2	looter destroy mummy egyptian museum	The looter destroys the Egyptian Mummy Museum.
2	army protestors protect imperiled cairo museum	Protesters from the army are protecting the endangered Cairo museum.
2	al jazeera protestors create human shield egyptian museum protect egypt egipto jan	The Egyptians have been forced to abandon their weapons of mass destruction in order to prevent the spread of the virus.
2	looter broke museum destroyed pharaonic mummy late friday nation top archaeologist reuters	Last Friday, a looter destroyed a museum and destroyed the nation's pharaoh mummy, Reuters.
2	protest protect human history human wall protecting cairo museum egypt egypte egipto mubarak pls	To protect the history of the human wall, to protect the museum of Cairo and Egypt, egipto Mubarak.
2	breakingnews looter broke museum destroyed pharaonic mummy late friday nation top archaeologist reuters egypt	This is the first time I've heard of a story that I've read about a man who's been killed by a man.
2	thousand egyptian youth protecting cairo museum sabotage jan egypt mubarak	A thousand young Egyptians protecting the city of Cairo are sabotaging the Jan Egyptian Mubarak Museum.
2	keeping informed	Keeping up to date.
2	aje human shield national museum arrested looter damage jan egypt reggaala	Human Shield National museum stopped damage plunder Jan egypt reggaala.
2	national museum lotted piece missing sigh jan jan egypt	Jan Egypt National Museum is missing a piece.
2	rioter destroy mummy egyptian museum cairo filed art culture history learning afric	It's been a long time, but it's been a long time, and it's been a long time, and it's been a long time.
3	report italian polish medium claim robert kubica injured rally accident italy	He was injured at a rally in Italy, where he was shot at by an Italian psychic who claimed that Robert Kubica was injured.
3	robert kubica involved serious rallye accident	Robert Kubica was involved in a big rally accident.
3	star kubica involved serious crash yahoo eurosport	Star Kubica involved a serious yahoo crash in eurosport.
3	kubicas injury major setback renaults assault title year petrov reserve driver will struggle pt	It's gonna be a tough year for Petrov to be a stand-by pilot.
3	uk robert kubica injured rally accident italian polish medium	Uk robert kubica injured rally accidentally rally Italian pol médium rally.
4	wikileaks nobel peace prize mankind profit motive	WikiLeaks Nobel Peace Prize L' humanity motivated by profit.
4	nobel peace prize nomination wikileaks founder	Founding Wikileaks Nobel Peace Prize nomination.
4	nobel war prize wikileaks nuke fired cablegate wikileaks assange anonymous	The nobel wikileaks War Prize nukes the anonymous wikileaks cablegate wikileaks.
4	nobel peace prize wikileaks	Wikileaks Nobel Peace Prize winner.
5	dvr alert pm today oprah winfrey deep family secret revealed	This is the first time I've been able to tell you a family secret.
5	oprah winfrey family secret prompt buzz timesherald	The secret of the Oprah Winfrey family... is what makes Timeherald tick.
5	breaking news oprah winfrey reveals secret sister filed oprah winfrey	Winfrey's secret sister, Oprah Winfrey, has dropped off her daughter, Oprah Winfrey.
5	oprah winfrey reveal family secret	Oprah Winfrey reveals her family's secret.
6	rite movie clip	This is a rite-of-movie clip.
6	rite movie review horror movie claiming inspired true event including amityville horror	It's a great way to make a difference in the lives of the people of the world.
6	watch rite free movie online movie online	Watch free online movie movie rite online movie online.
6	chat director star rite anthony hopkins english grandfather	Chat filmmaker rite star Anthony Hopkins grand-father english.
6	rite movie trailer anthony hopkins best flick movie trailer hd streaming torrent downloads movie	Anthony hopkins movie trailer rite movie best trailer hd streaming torrent movie download.
6	watching rite	Watch the rite.
6	bishop exorcist praise exorcism movie catholic culture washington postbishop exorcist praise exorci	Exorcist bishop rent exorcism film film culture Catholic film Washington post-exorcist bishop rent exorcism exorcism.
6	battle exorcism movie rite exorcism hmmm read find care weigh	Exorcism fight rite film rite exorcism hmmm reading find cures weigh heavy.
6	photo movie trailer rite trailer video hulu watch stream	The band-@-@-@-@-@-@-@-@ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @ @.
6	watched rite trailer therite	J' look at the rite and look at the therite.
6	rite midnite movie cheesefest video comic	Rite midnite film film cheesefest strip video cartoon.
6	watching rite therite	There was rite.
6	watching rite therite	There was rite.
6	rite tv spot kingdom	Rite tv, Rite tv, Rite tv.
6	movie review rite mill exorcist movie weymouth news usa todaymovie review rite	Rite-Rite Film Review Weymouth news film was used today as the basis for the review of the Rite-Rite film.
6	rite movie review fan movie deal battle good	Fan film Critical Rite from l' combat agreement.
6	movie review rite movie moviereviews	Movie movies rite film review.
6	rite review movie	Rite critical film rite.
6	download rite movie entertainment zone download rite	Download the Rite Motion Picture Entertainment Zone download the Rite.
6	rite movie review fan movie deal battle good evil	Fan film critical rite from l' film agreement fight good evil.
6	movie review rite anthony hopkins rite photo warner bros left explore	Film review Rite anthony hopkins Rite photo overlayer bros left to explore.
6	movie review rite horror thriller	Movie review, Rite Hate Rite Rite.
6	rite safe horror film devil time plain dealer	It's a good thing that you've got a lot of money.
6	watching rite therite	There was rite.
6	watched solid acting anthony hopkins sr beauty alice braga rite view	J' watched Anthony Hopkins play solid alice beautiful braga rite seen.
6	trailer talk week movie rite mechanic week opportunity	Band Discussion Week-Rite Announcements of the Week Machinery of Film Rite Week Occasion.
6	film rite based training real priest film faith catholic exorcist	Rite film based on the formation of a true priest, film of the Catholic Exorcist faith.
7	australia greatest olympian ian thorpe expected reportedly comeback international swim	The biggest Olympic athlete in Australia, Thorpe s&apos, was waiting for a return to international swimming.
8	donald rumsfeld reflects writing memoir rumsfeld began thinking book unknown	Donald Rumsfeld reflected the apos; writing memoirs Rumsfeld began to think of an unknown book.
9	white stripe officially call quits	This is the first time I've had the opportunity to speak with you.
9	fake snow storm white stripe officially call quits	The project is expected to be completed by the end of the year, and the project is expected to be completed by the end of the year.
9	news white stripe broke today	It's the first time I've seen it, and it's the first time I've seen it.
9	rip white stripe	And tear the white stripe.
9	white stripe breakup ain	C' est la rupture de la bande blanche.
9	white stripe officially call quits	This is the first time I've had the opportunity to speak with you.
9	sad white stripe split steam side project best moment	The white steamed sad stripe cleft project of the best moment.
9	white stripe officially broke thought record devastated	White stripes have officially broken the record for devastation.
9	white stripe breaking performance record winnipeg free press	The record for white stripes was broken by the free Winnipeg press.
9	white stripe broke feel inevitable duo remarried gonna work commonsense	The broken white stripe of feeling inevitable from the remarriaged duo... will work out the common sense.
9	news video white stripe call quits read breakup rip bummer	New video strip white d' caller gets to read tear-breaking depressing rupture.
10	prince william kate middleton wedding guest invited fax telegraph uk	The Prince William Kate Middleton, who was invited to the wedding, invited the telegrapher.
11	state budget school risk toddler yonkers longer attend pre school	Infants who are at risk of attending public schools spend more time in pre-school education.
11	cuomo budget hit school toddler yonkers longer attend pre school syra	The budget of cuomo hits the toddlers of l' school yonkers more frequent syra pre-school longer.
11	gov cuomo budget propsal slash nyc york city facing billion hit result	CUOM GOVERNMENT Propsal budget / One Billion Results City NYYork City.
11	update lt gov seek support cuomo budget	Government of Canada update.
11	hey mid hudson public employee job security mclaughlin hope helped	He is a member of the Board of Directors of the Canadian Institute of Chartered Accountants, the Canadian Institute of Chartered Accountants.
11	cuomo budget hit school toddler yonkers longer attend pre school srq	The Cuban budget has been hitting the children of the island; more yonkers are attending the island's elementary school.
11	governor proposes sweeping cut funding york school medicaid program slashed	The governor proposed drastic cuts to the program's funding; medical aid from l'apos, York School.
11	gov andrew cuomo drop budget axe	Well, the Andrew Cuomo government is dropping the budget axe.
11	read spending hvagents info	Read the expense reports of hv agents.
11	cuomo call york budget process quot sham quot	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.
11	cuomo cut spending budget plan	A Budget Plan to Reduce Cumo's Expenditures.
11	spending budget gov cuomo unveils today will include substantial cut hundred	Launch of the government budget cuomo today; substantial cuts of $100 will be included.
11	liberty group back cuomo budget suffolk county project fiscal reform chance tcot nygop	Liberty group back cuomo budget suffolk county tcot Nygop tax reform project.
11	reuters tcot cuomo call york budget process sham	Reuters tcot cuomo is called York budget process dummy.
11	cuomo budget reading quick takeaway doesn recommend closing	Quick reading of the budget of the cuomo does not recommend closure.
11	governor cuomo budget proposal eliminates funding healthy family york	The budget proposed by Governor Cuomo eliminates the need to fund a healthy family in York City.
11	news cuomo find secret budget flaw albany	New cuomo find secretly the Albanian budget deficit.
11	politics governor cuomo budget seek reverse sham york reuters york governor	Governor Cuomo's political budget seeks to reverse the fake York reuters, York governor.
11	cuomo expose dirty budget trick cut announced today	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.
11	assessing cuomo effort cut york medicaid budget	L' evaluation of the project; and, cuomo's effort has reduced York's medicaid budget.
11	recognizes reduced state spending key solving ny fiscal crisis	Recognizes the reduction in government spending to solve the budget crisis.
11	headline crain cuomo call albany budget process sham series called permanent douglascastle	The title feared Albanian call fear cuomo fictional budget process called permanent douglascastle.
11	ny governor proposes sweeping cut funding york school medicaid program slashed srq	The Governor is proposing severe cuts to the funding of the York School Medicaid medical program.
11	google news budget plan spread pain albany time union reutersbudget plan spread painalbany time unionmajor	The budget plans new google spread Albanian pain plan Reutersbudget plan of the apos; schedule of the apos; schedule of the apos; schedule of the majority.
11	ny gov cuomo slash fund school medicaid	Ny gov cuomo slash funds medicaid school school.
11	official ny cuomo proposing painful budget cut sdut	Ny Couomo officially announced that it is proposing to make budget cuts that are painful.
12	taco bell class action lawyer beef battle kfc serf mutant hybrid beast chicken eyeroll	Class d' action d' beef taco lawyer kfc mutant serf chicken hybrid eyeroll.
12	percentage rat derived taco bell meat filling meat oat evidently	Percent rat-derived taco meat containing potato; oats.
12	taco bell taco meat filling beef fb	It's the taco meat from the beef fb's taco bell.
12	taco bell sued calling mixture lt beef seasoned beef sound saved lot cow	The Taco Bell continued the mix of appetizers and the beef seasoned at the mouth of the mouth; a cows saved.
12	thought beef lawsuit pr response	J&apos, J' thought of a trial at the beef.
12	live tweet taco bell claim meat beef wasn typo	Tweet direct taco smokes that beef was typo.
12	beef beef law firm sue taco bell false advertising cattle	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
12	cost cent expecting tacobell defends beef secret recipe	It's the only way I can get it to work.
12	taco bell beef meat qualify taco filling yikes	Taco beef qualifies tacos that fill yikes.
12	hey surplus population lawsuit taco bell claim meat mixture beef	Overcrowding tacos, meatballs, beef.
12	taco bell fight beef lawsuit taco bell launching advertising campaign today fight	Taco Bell Taco Bell launches advertising campaign today.
12	vegetarian lawsuit taco bell claiming beef hold actual beef	Taco Tinker Bell Vegetarian Pursuit Claiming Beef Hold True Beef.
12	lawsuit veracity taco bell meat discourage enjoying colon cancer	Prosecuting truth-tumo-meat-of-the-bell-tumo-meals to discourage people from taking advantage of colon cancer.
12	gross taco bell sued bogus beef	So the big taco chased after the fake beef.
12	taco bell beef taco meat filling	Beef taco meat... stuffed with beef taco.
12	guess calling beef burrito beef burrito gross	J' imagine j' call it a burrito burrito burrito de boeuf.
12	duraflame log beef taco bell	Duraflame log beef-taco is wrong.
12	shouldn beef beef gross hmm taco bell beef alleged meat	Beef and beef, big taco beef, so-called beef.
12	taco bell beef taco inexpensive beef lawsuit share info	Taco taco taco beef bull taco cheap beef trial share information.
12	meat high quality mediapost beef brouhaha taco bell buzz suffering mediapost	High quality meat mediapost beef brouhaha taco buzz with mediapost.
12	truth chalupa ain beef alabama law firm claim lawsuit taco bell false adv	Beef truth chalupa; Alabama firm of apos; lawyers claim taco justice wrongly.
12	yuck taco bell meat beef	Beef with a taco-bell, beef.
12	checking eww eating lawsuit alleges taco bell beef thisis	Eww eat a trial claims that this is beef from the taco bell.
12	blog post beefy	This is Blog post beefy.
12	hey hear taco bell sued beef filling beef told good enema	Hey, j' heard that taco bell is chasing beef stuffed beef said good enema.
12	taco bell sued selling fake meat damn wonder fake lmao eating taco bell month ago haha	The taco bell's suing for selling fake meat.
12	taco bell beef meat lawsuit claim rest supernatural filler	The Taco Beef Trial claims that it is a supernatural resting place.
12	law suit taco bell beef filler find taco bell chihuahua	L' beef-filling agent taco from the trial to find taco-chichuahua.
12	taco bell lawsuit claim chain beef meat	The bell taco trial is about the chained beef.
12	robert paisola news taco bell take beef lawsuit public ap ap taco bell news zone	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I don't think I'm going to be able to do that anymore.
12	professor ken albala wrote op taco bell meat	Professor Ken Albala wrote Op Taco Bell Meat.
12	don fda approved ingredient list taco bell beef	These products are not intended to be used in cosmetic products.
12	amazes taco bell lawsuit usda call beef taco percent beef meat realfood	C' is incredible that actions against tacos called the percentage of beef the real meal taco beef.
12	opinion taco bell suit expose ignorance meat shortly news taco bell lawsuit ou	The Taco Bell's judgment exposes the meat of the Taco Bell; a short time after the trial of the Taco Bell.
12	geez hide taco bell beef	God damn it, hide-me from the beef to the taco.
12	taco bell beef convenience cost	C' is the price of the beef to the taco.
12	well lunch lawsuit taco bell claim meat mixture beef	Well, at lunch, the bell of the tacos claims a mixture of meat and beef.
12	black commented chasindatpaper blog post eww eating lawsuit alleges taco bell beef	The blog in black Chasindatpaper post eww eat prosecution alleges beef taco bell.
12	omg love taco bell law firm sue taco bell claim beef label misleading	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry.
12	knew soy taco law firm sue taco bell claim beef label misleading	I knew the taco-soy attorney's office was suing tacos claiming that the tag was deceptive.
13	rahm emanuel chicago mayor llinois supreme court ruling xmnr chicagomayor rahmemanuel	Rahm emanuel Chicago Mayor llnnnr chicagomayor Supreme Court ruling.
13	court emanuel eligible chicago mayor ny time pa habit sur place assez longtemps	This is the first time in the history of the city that an appeal from the City of Chicago can be made.
13	rahm stay chi mayoral ballot dbl standard city residency rule public worker nytimes	Rahm remains mayor of the ballot paper dbl standard residence of the city regulates the time of the public worker.
13	il supreme court imposed stay political execution rahm emanuel ballot	The Supreme Court has ordered the suspension of the execution of the presidential decree.
13	countdown rahmageddon illinois supreme court voted unanimously rahm emanuel	Rahmageddon llinois Supreme Court has voted at the same time; unanimity has been issued.
13	illinois state appeal court declared rahm emanuel ineligible mayor chicago born kenya	The Court of Appeals of the State of Illinois declared that he was not eligible for the office of Mayor of the City of Chicago.
13	big news chicago rahm emanuel eligible chicago mayor court	It's the first time in the history of Chicago that the mayor of Chicago has been elected.
13	emanuel chicago ballot	Chicago Gospel.
13	illinois court emanuel stay chicago ballot chicago reuters white house chief st news	U.S.A.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.S.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.S.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.S.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.C.
13	npr news ill high court emanuel chicago mayor	NPR Supreme Court News, emancipated Mayor of Chicago.
13	blogfeed court don boot rahm will stay ballot ruling	I'm sorry, but I don't think it's a good idea.
13	court allows emanuel ballot chicago mayor nytimes tlot news illinois dems	The court will allow the vote on the mayor of the city of Chicago to take place in the morning.
13	rahm emanuel chicago ballot news	Rahm will emancipate chicago new ballots.
13	minute court ruling allows rahm emanuel atlantic wire	A court order has been issued allowing Rahm emanuel atlantic wire.
13	court rule rahm emanuel ineligible chicago mayoral race law il chicago rahm	Rahm emanuel rahm rahm rahm rahm rahm rahm rahm rahm racing law for mayor.
13	jmg court rule rahm emanuel ineligible mayor chicago opponent white house	Mayor of the Chicago White House Opposition to the White House.
13	great breaking rahm emanuel ballot supreme court rule	This is a major breach of the Supreme Court of Apos rule.
13	illinois supreme court rahm emanuel ballot illinois supreme court issued ruling allowing rahm	U.S. Supreme Court of Appeals; Illinois Supreme Court of Appeals; Illinois Supreme Court of Appeals; Illinois Supreme Court of Appeals.
13	top story illinois supreme court rahm emanuel ballot illinois supreme court issued ruling	At the top of the list, the Supreme Court of the U.S. Supreme Court published a decision.
13	slow news day chicago ll live bloggin mayoral debate cdt	Toll-to-toll-to-toll-to-toll-to-toll-to-toll-to-toll-to-toll-to-tool-to-toll-to-tool-to-tool-to-tool.
13	countdown rahmageddon	Rahmageddon countdown.
13	court put emanuel chicago mayor race	The Gospel of Chicago was rejected as a candidate for mayor.
13	rahm emanuel ballot chicago alternet	Rahm on the Internet.
13	illinois supreme court rahm chicago resident eligible mayor examiner illinois suprem illinois	Illinois Supreme Court of Appeal; Illinois rahm Chicago Resident elected Illinois Supreme Review Mayor Illinois.
13	reading court rahm emanuel eligible chicago mayor nytimes illinois supreme court	Reading the Elected Emanuel Court of Chicago ny time illinois Chicago Supreme Court.
13	supreme court put rahm emanuel ballot	The Supreme Court voted rahm emancipation.
13	rahm emanuel stay ballot chicago mayoral election filed news politics president obama ra	Rahm emanuel remain ballot paper Mayor of Chicago has put down the deadline; political information President Obama has re-elected.
13	court emanuel eligible chicago mayor	This is the E.M.C. Court of Chicago.
13	post chicago rahm emanuel ballot	After the vote on emancipation from Chicago.
13	news alert ruling restores emanuel ballot breaking news alertthe york timestue january	L' News Alert Restores Ballot Paper Election Eminent News Alert at York time January.
13	court rahm emanuel ineligible mayor	Ineligible mayor's emancipation court.
13	hot air breaking rahm ballot tcot lt state totally corrupt	State is totally corrupt.
13	rahm chicago economy raised tax deserve	The economy of Chicago deserves a rise in taxes.
13	chicago rahm emanuel ballot	Chicago emancipation vote.
14	vinson rule entire hcr law lack severability clause entire text	The whole hcr rule does not contain a divisibility clause.
14	regular folk united responds ruling obamacare tcot mdreps hcr aacons bookerrising	The regular plain folk responds by directing bookerrising obamacare mdreps hcr aacons.
14	judge rule health care law foxnews	Justice of the Foxnews Health Care Act.
14	judge strike healthcare reform law	The Health Care Reform Act is being challenged by the judge.
14	reagan appointed judge obamacare pound sand patient protection affordable care	Reagan Appointed Judge Obamacare's Book of Sand Protection for Affordable Health Care Patients.
14	federal judge strike health care reform call insurance purchase mandate aba journal	The federal judges' strike on health-care reform is calling for the purchase of health-care insurance.
14	nytimes federal judge rule health law violates news breakingnews	Federal judges' health laws sometimes violate breaking breaking news.
14	federal judge rule health care reform law	Health care reform is decided by a federal judge.
14	republic argued florida ruling monday judge roger vinson florida	Florida was sworn in by the Republic on Monday, Judge Roger Vinson Florida.
14	florida judge strike obamacare america	The Florida judge has struck obamacare america.
14	well surprise good thing healthcare law declared	Well, good surprise declared health care law.
14	judge rule health law law mandatory insurance hcr ppaca aca	Judges Health law compulsory insurance law hcr ppaca aca.
14	federal judge healthcare law	Health Care Federal Judges Act.
14	health care law obama administration vowing move full speed ahead implementa	It's time to move on to the next level, and it's time to move on to the next level.
14	judge ruling health reform law radical judicial activism amok overturned medi	Health reform judge Radical Judicial Activism overthrown media.
14	obamacare reagan appointed federal district judge florida ruled key portion obama	Obamacare Reagan named Florida District Federal Judge ruled on the key part Obama.
14	judge rule health care law	Judge rules the Health Care Act.
14	judge rule obama health care law	Judge the Obama Rule of Health Care Law.
14	durbin chair hearing healthcare law hill healthwatch tcot obamacare	Durbin chairs to hear Hill Healthwatch Health Care Act Tcot obamacare obamacare.
14	obama health care overhaul ruled	Obama's health-care reform came through.
14	judge entire hc law piper	This is the first time you've had the opportunity to judge the HCC team.
14	going amazing constitutional showdown reach supreme court	L' unbelievable test of the strength of the Constitution reaches the Supreme Court.
14	insurance news federal judge reject health reform law district court judge roger vinson agreed	News from Home; Insurance Federal Judge Rejects Health Reform District Judge Roger Vinson agreed.
14	obama care	Obama care.
14	federal judge rule entire health care law tcot obamacare	The federal judge makes the rules of the Health Care Act.
14	today jan judge declares obamacare total thought	It's a good thing that you've got a lot of money.
14	judge ruled health care individual mandate declared void	The judge declared the individual health-care order null and void.
14	state judge agree	The Judge of the Court of First Instance is hereby declared innocent.
14	obamacare heading supreme court	Obamacare heads the Supreme Court.
14	federal judge strike insurance mandate entire reform bill	The Federal Judges' Strike Insurance Bill.
14	heritage morning bell victory road repeal teaparty hcr	Teaparty hcr is replaced by the Road to the Victory of the Heritage Morning Bell.
14	judge strike healthcare reform law unjust law unjust men gandhi	Judge strikes health care reform as unfair Gandhi men's law unfair.
14	breaking news federal court rule obamacare afternoon federal judge florida ruled	Federal Court Rule Obamacare after-midi Florida Federal Judge has ruled.
14	obamacare struck stage set showdown federal judge monday struck	Obamacare hit setdown scene Federal judge Monday struck.
14	federal judge florida strike obama health care plan south florida	Florida South Health Care Plan Federal Judge Florida Strike Obama.
14	dtn news judge strike part health care law federal judge ruled presiden	New judges strike in part Health Care Act the federal judge has ruled presiden.
14	florida judge rule obamacare	It's the Florida judge's prerogative.
14	federal judge toss entire healthcare reform law account individual mandate acquire insurance coverage	Federal judge rejects the entire health care law reform mandate individual purchase of insurance.
14	man hour judge vinson obamacare second ruling	Justice Vinson Obamacare is the 2nd Judge of the hour.
14	judge owns stock aetna	The Aetna shares are owned by the judge.
14	avenue kill obamacare florida federal judge rule obamacare	L' Kill Obamacare Avenue Florida Rules Obamacare Federal Judge Obamacare Rules Obamacare.
14	health care litigation insurance mandate	Health Care Litigation Insurance.
14	judge rule obama health care law	Judge the Obama Rule of Health Care Law.
14	antonin scalia save individual mandate	Antonin Scalia saves the individual search warrant.
14	judge toss health care reform law federal judge ruled president obama sweep cnn	Judge rejects health-care reform bill Federal judge has ruled that President Barack Obama is guilty.
14	health care law struck federal judge ruled president obama sweeping healt	The health-care bill hit the federal judge and ruled that President Obama was sweeping Healt.
14	article darkpolitricks federal judge rule health care law darkpolitricks	Article Darkpolitricks Federal judge rules Darkpolitricks Darkpolitricks Health Care Act.
14	goodness thinking judge rule health care law	I think a smart judge rules the health-care law.
14	reason federal judge individual mandate health care overhaul declared void obamacare	Why the Federal Justice is Ordering Health Care Renewal?
14	georgia official praise judge ruling health care law fight	Georgian officials praise the health-care law judge.
14	reaction fla judge ruling health reform law strong florida judge ruling pa health reform	Reaction fla Judge leading health care reform Law strong Florida judge leading health care reform pa.
14	federal judge florida rule obamacare	Obamacare is ruled by the Florida Federal Judge.
14	health care law struck	There has been a crackdown on the Health Care Act.
14	health care law struck federal judge ruled president obama sweeping health	The health-care bill hit the federal judge today and found that President Obama was sweeping health.
14	judge strike healthcare reform law	The Health Care Reform Act is being challenged by the judge.
14	fla judge strike obama health care overhaul federal judge declared obama administration health	US Federal Justice's Obama Health Care Revision Strike Judge declared the Obama administration healthy.
14	judge obama health overhaul ap	Judge Obama reformed health.
14	florida judge declares entire healthcare law void month half ago virginia judge key pr	Florida judge says the entire health care bill stinks six months ago.
14	federal judge rule health care law violates constitution nacsonline	The federal court rules on health care violating the Nacsonline constitution.
14	obamacare ruling injunction bc entire law declared void tcot	The court shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine the case.
15	topstories amtrak senator ny nj rail tunnel plan reuters share friend top news	Topstories Amtrak Senator Ny Nj Reuters Rail Tunnel Plan share key new friends.
15	amtrak senator ny nj rail tunnel plan york reuters amtrak announced plan monday	Senator Amtrak announced plans for the New York Reuters Amtrak Railway Tunnel on Monday.
16	super bust woe endless texas host super bowl week texas super	I'm sorry I didn't get it, but I'm sorry I didn't get it.
16	latest dallas super bowl fiasco seat north texas rough week super bowl host	The final Super Bowl Dallas debacle took place in North Texas, Texas during the tough Super Bowl week.
16	super bowl xlv madness cowboy stadium injury flight delay striking cabby examiner	Super bowl xlv the madness of the stadium-boy the flight of injury delayes the apos; examination of the taxi driver.
16	joe buck seat couldn accommodated super bowl	Joe Buck's seat could fit the Super Bowl for you.
17	consumerist tsa testing revealing full body scanner software	Tsa consumer testing reveals complete body-scanning software.
17	count jesse ventura flier don junk touched transportation security administration agent	Earl Jesse's driver ventured Don hit the airport Transport Security Officer.
17	tsa testing advanced imaging technology software select airport	This is the first time you've checked out the airport, and it's the first time you've checked it.
17	tsa unveils body scanner software doesn naked alternet	Tsa unveils the Naked Body Scanner Software on the Internet.
17	gotta luv video jesse ventura strike lawsuit tsa	J' loves Jesse Ventura's video suing Tsa.
17	tsa body scanner spot bomb dong tsa	Tsa body scanners are picking up dong tsa bombs.
17	disturbing jesse ewww	Jesse's a pain in the ass and www.
17	ventura strike lawsuit tsa truth contagious governor jesse ventura ste	Ventura Tsa Truth Strike Contagious Governor ventura ste Jesse ventura.
17	tsa body scanner spot bomb dong tsa	Tsa body scanners are picking up dong tsa bombs.
17	tsa body scanner outline private part	Tsa Body Scanners describe the private parts.
17	wonder young man pant tsa	Oh, that's a wonderful young man, Pant Tsa pantsa.
17	tsa scanner spot bomb dong tsa	Tsa's scanners detect bombs dong tsa.
17	hee hee jesse ventura slam tsa lawsuit	Hee hee jesse ventura slam slam trials tsa.
17	fucking awesome jesse jesse ventura slam tsa lawsuit	Fucking fabulous Jesse Ventura pressed charges against us.
17	tsa testing advanced imaging technology story atlanta tsa tuesday testing	Atlanta's Advanced Imaging Technology History Tests on Tuesday.
17	post tsa facing lawsuit governor ventura atomstack big si fascism tsa	Tsa Post facing a governorship trial ventura atomstack grand so Tsa Fascism.
17	coming airport modesty change	The room was very clean and the bathroom was clean.
17	latest news jesse ventura force tsa submission jennifer abel thing pr guardian usa	This is the last news of the latest news about the force of submission.
17	jesse ventura wrestling star governor true american hero	Jesse Ventura, a wrestling star, is a real American hero.
17	jesse ventura slam tsa lawsuit count jesse ventura flier don junk touched tr	Jesse ventura slam tsa trial count ventura f b b Iesse ventura dirt touched very.
17	post tsa unveils generic body scan usa today big si fascism tsa	It's a great fascism, but it's a great fascism, and it's a great fascism.
17	ventura strike lawsuit tsa iavian	I'm sorry, but I can't help you.
17	tsa test privacy enhancement naked scanner transportation security administration remake	I want to make sure that you have the information you need to make sure you have the information you need.
17	tsa test privacy enhancing software body scanner privacy	Tsa test the' Privacy Enhancement Scanner Personal Software Scanner.
17	couldn place tsa unveils modest body scanner abc news	We could put tsa unveil modest scanners body new abc.
17	cnn jesse ventura slam tsa lawsuit count jesse ventura flier don junk touched	Cn jessesse ventura slam tsa sue count ventura flyante n'jeesse ventura fileté touché.
18	unemployment rate percent december quarter unemployment rate rose three	Percentage unemployment rate The December quarter saw a three-fold increase in the unemployment rate.
18	unemployment rate drop metro area	Unemployment is falling in the metropolitan area.
18	obama economy priority generate job unemployment rate pe	Obama's priority is job creation.
18	jobless rise state worker laid labor department unemployment rate rose	Increase in unemployment of laid-off workers Unemployment in the labour services has increased.
18	employment gaining speed jobless rate washington reuters employment shifted	It's been a long time since Washington, D.C. and Washington, D.C. had their unemployment rates peaked.
18	unemployment rate state glance ap ap unemployment rate rose state month fresh evi	Rates of unemployment Rates of unemployment Rates of unemployment rose recently.
18	unemployment rise state fall ap ap unemployment rate rose hawaii alohatone	Unemployment has risen in Hawaii, Alohatone.
18	wrapup employment gaining speed jobless rate	Employment at the end of the year quickly gains the unemployment rate.
18	dean baker problem structrual unemployment incompetent manager	Problem of the unemployed structural baker unemployed incompetent manager.
18	folk scrambling job don exist find structural unemployment	There are some precarious jobs, but there is also structural unemployment.
18	employment gaining speed jobless rate washington reuters employment shifted	It's been a long time since Washington, D.C. and Washington, D.C. had their unemployment rates peaked.
18	employment gaining speed jobless rate	Unemployed accelerated unemployment rate.
18	employment gaining speed jobless rate washington reuters employment shifted higher	The unemployment rate is the same as that of the U.S. and the U.S. and the United States.
19	energy conservation tip south hill electric heating cooling	The shelf-life of the South Hill Energy Electrical Heating Cooling.
19	fallon follow tip save energy included site tip will help beat hig	It's a good idea to keep up to date with the latest technology.
19	best way save energy live energy efficient save mo	Best Practice; Save Time; High Energy Efficiency Save Me.
19	tip help reduce energy bill control electricity save money power bill	Help to reduce bills; energy controls; electricity; money; electricity.
19	save energy cash quick easy tip article will help save ton money saving en	Save money; save money; save money; save money; save money; save money.
19	energy money office saving	It's a great place to spend your time and money, and it's a great place to stay.
19	lighting save energy money jim dino staff writer changing lighting system cost effecti	L'éclairage saves energy; Jim dino personal editor changes the system; lighting costs done.
19	saving house heating cooling	Save money on heating your home's cooling.
19	energy conservation tip south hill electric heating cooling	The shelf-life of the South Hill Energy Electrical Heating Cooling.
20	detroit auto green	Green-car door.
21	global warming update bizarre weather destroyed crop whale	Update on Global Warming Strange Weather has destroyed the harvests of the whales.
21	terrific abc news story role climate change play extreme winter weather	This is a huge report on the role of climate change in the extreme conditions of winter.
21	australian disaster linked global warming	Global warming was linked to global warming by the Australian catastrophe.
21	storm sign global warming mama believing	Global warming storm mama warning of global warming.
21	record snowstorm indicator global warming	Global Warming Snowstorm Indicator Record.
21	al gore explains snowmaggedon midst global warming matt harding global warming guru vice	Gore explains snowmaggedon in the midst of global warming, the guru of global warming, and the guru of global warming.
21	climate change update bizarre weather destroyed crop legendary fund manager jeremy grantham weig	Climate change strange weather update destroyed legendary crop fund manager Jeremy Grantham Weig.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit ho	Keith Olbermann joins controversial Liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit in the current TV report.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit ho	Keith Olbermann joins controversial Liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit in the current TV report.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit ho	Keith Olbermann joins controversial Liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit in the current TV report.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit socialutility	Keith Olbermann joins Keith Olbermann controversial Pundit Socialutility Liberal Pundit Pundit Social Utility.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report	Keith Olbermann has joined this television report.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report	Keith Olbermann has joined this television report.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report keith olbermann controversial liberal pundit ho	Keith Olbermann joins controversial Liberal Keith Olbermann Pundit Ho Pundit in the current TV report.
22	olbermann land current grow york adage outspoken tv host keith olbermann fresh	Olbermann common soil of york culture host frank adage Keith Olbermann fresh.
22	keith olbermann join current tv report	Keith Olbermann has joined this television report.
22	keith olbermann current tv hosting chief news officer	The director of l&apos is Keith Olbermann, who is on television.
23	job wrong place memo president dear president state union add	Misplaced Work, President, Dear President, D&apos Union; State add.
23	job wrong place memo president dear president state union ad	I don't think it's a good idea, but I think it's a good idea.
23	state union small business key winning future small business fu	This is the key to the success of the company's small business.
24	bbc news domodedovo airport blast rock moscow main airport breakingnews moscow	BBC News Domodedovo Airport in Moscow; Rock Blast; Moscow Main Airport Moscow News.
24	fatal blast reported moscow airport terminal russian authority monday reported fatal explosion	The fatal explosion was reported on Monday by the Russian authorities at the Moscow airport.
24	check article fox news report dead explosion moscow busiest airport	In addition, there are reports of a deadly explosion at Moscow's busiest airport, Fox News.
24	suicide bomber kill moscow airport explosion ripped interna lukewilliamss	Suicide bomber who killed someone at the airport in Moscow tore apart interna lukewilliamse.
24	bomber kill russia biggest airport	The bomber's killing Russia's largest airport.
24	moscow airport terror attack kill wound ap	A.P. was killed by a terrorist attack on the airport in Moscow.
24	dead moscow airport explosion cnn	Explosion at Moscow Airport.
24	explosion kill moscow airport explosion ripped international arrival hall moscow bu	Explosion kills Moscow Lapos; Explosion of the Apostles; Airport tore the hallway of international arrivals Moscow.
24	cnn killed injured terror blast moscow airport terrorist suicide bomber blamed mosco	One attack,-suicide at Moscow airport, a-suicide bombing, killed one person.
24	abc breaking terrorist attack moscow airport leaf dead	Terrorist attack in Moscow, sheet d'apos; airport dead.
24	explosion rock domodedovo moscow busiest airport injured	The explosion of the rock Domodedovo Moscow airport most occupied wounded the airport.
24	bombing moscow airport kill russia	Russia is being killed by the bombing of Moscow airport.
24	dozen killed moscow airport suicide bombing noticias	Suicide bombings at the Moscow airport.
24	suicide bomber kill russia biggest airport	Suicide bombers are killing the biggest Russian airport.
24	suicide bombing moscow airport moscow suicide bomber killed people russia busiest airpo	Suicide bombing at the Moscow airport killed people in Russia.
24	news search moscow blast briton uk foreign office urgently checking briton	Search for information on the Soviet Union, Moscow bombing, the British Foreign Office to check it out; Briton Briton Briton emergency.
24	briton dead moscow blast british citizen people killed bomb attack moscow	British citizens who died in Moscow were bombed to death in Moscow.
24	live moscow airport explosion	Explosion at Moscow Airport.
24	briton killed moscow blast uk foreign office report british citizen	Briton has killed Moscow blast uk Foreign Office reports as a citizen of the UK.
24	hindu killed suicide bomber strike moscow airport	Hindu has killed a suicide bomber at the Moscow airport.
24	deadly blast moscow airport	Fatal explosion at Moscow Airport.
24	fatal blast reported moscow airport terminal russian authority monday reported fatal explosion domodedo	The fatal explosion was reported Monday at Moscow's Russian airport, Russian authorities reported a fatal explosion at the Domodedo airport.
24	deadly suicide bombing hit moscow airport people killed injured suicide bomb blast mo	A suicide bombing-deadly suicide at the airport in Moscow killed people who were injured by a suicide bombing-suicide bombing.
24	suicide bomber blamed moscow airport attack killed russian state tv report	A suicide bomber accused of suicide; an attack at the Moscow airport killed a Russian TV news report.
24	guardian uk domodedovo airport hit deadly bombing	Murderous bombings were carried out at Uk domodedovo airport.
24	carnage bomber target moscow airport	The suicide bomber's targeting the Moscow airport.
24	killed moscow airport attack police seeking men report	The Moscow Airport Police Department was killed while they were looking for men.
24	dead moscow airport explosion cnn	Explosion at Moscow Airport.
24	dead moscow airport explosion	Explosion at Moscow Airport.
24	ufo paranormal terrorist bombing moscow airport	A Paranormal Terrorist Bombing at Moscow Airport.
24	news uk foreign office urgently checking briton caught explosion rep	The Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the United Kingdom verifies that Briton is well aware of the explosion.
24	terrorist attack view exclusive footage today bombing moscow airport dozen dead tcot ocra	Terrorist attack to see the exclusive footage today; bombing of the airport of Moscow dozens of dead Tcot ocra.
24	suicide bombing moscow airport kill	A suicide bomber attacked the city of Moscow and killed the city of Moscow.
24	uk foreign office urgently checking briton caught explosion uk news	The UK Foreign Office @-@U.S.A. Verifies that Briton has caught the explosion Uk news.
24	moscow airport blast dozen killed explosion hit domodedovo airport early unconfirmed report	Explosion at Moscow Airport A dozen explosions occurred at Domodedovo Airport.
24	dead moscow airport explosion explosion attributed russia investigative committee cnn	Moscow airport attributed to the Russian investigation.
25	giffords husband great rep gabrielle giffords ariz adjusting rehabili	Giffords great gabriel giffords ariz adjust the rehabilitation.
25	doctor giffords face rocky road recovery day week rep gabrielle giffords recovery	Dr. Giffords faces a rocky day of recovery the week, featuring Gabrielle Giffords of recovery.
25	medical news giffords cleared rehab critical care head trauma medpage today	Giffords de l'apos; actualité médicale has approved the page on head injuries in re-education today.
25	giffords condition upgraded good	L' sn&apos gifford condition; improved.
25	bbc news america giffords health good medic condition congresswoman gabrielle giffords	BBC News American Giffords Healthy Member of Parliament Gabrielle Giffords.
25	giffords rocky road recovery health news	Rocky Giffords of the roadside rehabilitation health news.
25	breaking news fluid buildup rep giffords brain will delay start full fledged rehabilitation hou	The last news: l'apos; accumulation of fluids in the brain of the Giffords will delay the beginning of complete rehabilitation.
25	brain fluid buildup delay giffords rehab	Giffords' re-education is delayed by the accumulation of cerebral fluid.
25	giffords surprising doctor hospital icu exercise wounded rep gabrielle giffords	Giffords surprisingly doctor practice this hospital wound gabriel giffords rep.
25	rep giffords fitness level bodes well recovery add diet loaded fruit	Rep Giffords level of physical condition augurs well for recovery, adding the diet full of loaded fruit.
25	doctor giffords face rocky road recovery normalcy cnn erwwpr	Dr. Giffords faces a salvage of the normal rock road.
25	doctor giffords good condition will rehab rep gabrielle giffords good condition wi	Dr. Giffords is in good shape for Gabrielle Giffords' rehabilitation.
25	giffords condition upgraded good	L' sn&apos gifford condition; improved.
25	doctor giffords face rocky road recovery day week rep gabrielle giffords recovery fr	Dr. Giffords faces a rocky salvage day in Rep. Giffords Recovery Gabrielle week.
25	interested giffords improves watch hour tv gabrielle giffords watched hour television	This is the first time you will be able to watch a TV show on TV.
25	doctor giffords recovery sprint day week rep gabrielle giffords recovery fro	Doctor Giffords recuperation sprint weekday rep Gabrielle Giffords recuperation from gabriel week giffords.
25	giffords condition upgraded good doctor rep gabrielle giffords upgraded condition serio	It's been a long time, but it's been a long time, and it's been a long time since we've been able to do that.
25	rep giffords set rehab houston yahoo share friend health smoking story	Rep Giffords set rehab houston yahoo to share the story of the use of tobacco by healthy friends.
25	giffords condition upgraded good cnn	Gifford conditions have allowed us to improve water quality.
25	giffords surprising doctor hospital icu	It's the first time I've been in a hospital, and it's the last time.
25	giffords speaking valve breathing tube	Giffords speaks valvule respiratory tube.
25	giffords condition upgraded good doctor rep gabrielle giffords upgraded condition serio	It's been a long time, but it's been a long time, and it's been a long time since we've been able to do that.
25	brain fluid buildup delay giffords rehab rep gabrielle giffords transferred houston brain	The accumulation of cerebral fluid delayed the gabriel gifford rehab transferred Houston's brain.
25	news update giffords condition upgraded good doctor rep gabrielle giffords upgraded condition	Current status of giffords updated Good rep giffords gabrielle rep upgraded status status.
25	gabrielle giffords good condition transfer rehab	Gabrielle Giffords is in good state of Rehabilitation Transfer Transfer Transfer and Rehabilitation Transfer.
25	top news giffords full round therapy houston reuters representative gabrielle gifford	Top news Giffords completes Houston Reuters representing Gabrielle Gifford.
25	houston transfer help giffords husband kelly cope	Giffords' husband, Kelly, was helped out by the Houston transfer.
25	updated rehab aim giffords life	The life of Giffords has now been redirected to re-education.
26	jordan thousand protest demand pm step wave mass protest arab spread opposition supporter	Thousands of protests in Jordan for a wave of mass mass protests in Saudi Arabia are spreading in support of the apo; opposition.
26	thousand protesting jordan demanding govt step	Thousand Jordanian protesters demand that the government take a step forward.
26	jordan protester gather country demanding prime minister step al jazeera	Jordanian protesters are gathering to demand that the Prime Minister take a step toward Jazeera.
26	aljazeera thousand protest jordan	Aljazeera has a thousand protests from Jordan.
26	thousand protest jordan middle east al jazeera english	Middle @-@Orient al jazeera.
26	desire freedom infectious thousand protest jordan middle east al jazeera english	Wish for the contagious freedom of a thousand Jordanian protests Middle @-@Orient al jazeera English.
26	pro democracy protest break jordan catspirit	Demonstration in favor of democracy breaking Jordan's cat spirit.
26	thousand protest jordan demand pm step	Thousands of Jordanian protests have been made.
26	thousand protest jordan middle east	Jordan Middle-Orient.
26	thousand protest jordan reform	Thousands of protests over Jordanian reform.
26	thousand protest jordan reform cnn news	Thousand protests about Jordanian CNN News reform.
26	thousand protest jordan middle east	Jordan Middle-Orient.
26	spreading thousand protest jordan demand pm step aljazeera net	Disseminating thousands of protests in Jordan requires pm pas aljazeera net aljazeera.
26	thousand jordan protest demand pm step day protest opposition supporter stre	A thousand protesters in Jordan are calling for a working day of protests against the government.
27	france fox piven defies death threat taunt anchorman glenn beck link lit	The fox of France defies the threat of death by mocking the life of presenter Glenn Beck.
27	glenn beck fran piven michael tomasky comment free americafirst	Glenn Beckk Fran released Michael Tomasky's free review of L' America first.
27	france fox piven defies death threat taunt anchorman glenn beck mental	France Fox Piven defies the death threat... taunts mental anchorman Glenn Beck.
27	glenn beck virulent attack cuny prof fox piven inciting threat aaup irresponsible rhetoric	Glenn Beck virulent cuny-professor fox attack inciting irresponsible ape-photoric threat.
27	glenn beck target france fox piven beck scary	Glenn Beck, the fox of the target fox, Piven, is scary.
27	glenn beck france fox piven york time falsely depicts controversy tcot	Glenn beck France Fox piven York Time has falsely depicted the tcot controversy.
27	france fox piven defies death threat taunt anchorman glenn beck	Renard de France piven defies anchorman Glenn Beckk's death threat.
27	glenn beck france fox piven york time falsely depicts controversy tcot hhrs teaparty	Glenn beck France Fox piven York Time falsely portrays the controversy of tcot hhrs teaparty.
28	hawaii won release obama birth info	It was the first time in the world that Hawaii had ever seen the United States of America.
28	copy obama birth certificate bill pass xmnr tcot gop	Copy Obama Birth Certificate Bill passes xmnr tcot gop gop tcot xmnr.
28	birthers hawaii bill charge president obama birth record effort silence birthers	Birthers hawaii bill President Obama of Obama from birth to register the effort silent birthers birthers.
28	hawaii bill grant access obama birth record fee	It's the only way you can get the information you need.
28	hawaii offer obama birth document honolulu jan upi bid quiet birthers hawaiian legisl	Hawaii Offers Obama Birth Document Honolulu Jan Upi offers calm Hawaiian birthers legislation.
29	iran iran hang iranian dutch woman drug smuggling iranelection	Iran Iran Hanging Dutch Iranian Woman Drug Trafficking iranelection smuggling iranelection.
29	dtn iran iran executes iranian dutch woman detained poll unrest report iranian dutch woman detaine	L' Iran executes an Iranian Dutch woman who was detained by an Iranian public opinion poll; agitation An Iranian Dutch woman detached from apos; a poll.
29	dutch freeze contact iran hanging iranelection well late	The Dutch frost contact Iran hangs very late in the game.
29	bbc news iran hang iranian dutch woman sahra bahrami iranelections freeiran	BBC News Iran hangs a Dutch Iranian Sahra bahrami Iranian iranelections freeiran iranian woman.
29	bbc news dutch freeze contact iran hanging	BBC News hutch is freezing contact Iran hanging.
29	bbc news dutch freeze contact iran hanging	BBC News hutch is freezing contact Iran hanging.
29	iran hang iranian dutch woman drug smuggling tehran amsterdam reuters iranian dutch woman arrested	Iran hangs Dutch Iranian drug smuggler Tehran Amsterdam reuters Iranian arrested Dutch female.
29	dutch break iran link hanging iranelection saudiarabia tunis jan	Episode blizzard is a blizzard blizzard blizzard.
29	dutch government end official contact iran protest hanging dutch iranian woman al jazeera	The Dutch government puts an end to official contact with Dutch woman al-Jazeera Iranian hanging protest.
29	iran hang dutch iranian woman drug smuggling worldnews	Iran hangs an Iranian woman, trafficking drugs from the world news.
29	netherlands recall iran ambassador dutch woman execution foreign policy outrage	The Countries @-@Bas recall that the Ambassador of Denmark; Iran has executed a Dutch woman for insulting foreign policy.
29	iran executes iranian dutch woman	The apos; Iran executes a Dutch Iranian woman.
30	carney obama press secretary	Press secretary, Carney Obama.
30	jay carney white house press secretary richard adam guardian	Jay Carney, Richard Adam Guard, White House spokesman.
30	jay carney voice relationship will develop jaycarney	The vocal relationship of Jay Carney will also develop Jay Carney.
30	meet jay carney guy white house press secretary	Jay Carney, the White House Press Secretary.
30	jay carney white house press secretary richard adam guardian	Jay Carney, Richard Adam Guard, White House spokesman.
30	white house press secretary jay carney	White House spokesman Jay Carney.
30	ap source obama pick biden spokesman white house press secretary	Obama appoints door-speech biden door-White House press secretary.
30	carney picked obama press secretary mike allen politico	Carney chose-Word @apos; Obama.
30	obama name press secretary	Obama, by the name of Press Secretary.
30	vice president communication director jay carney named white house press secretary	Vice-President-President Jay Carney, Communications Director, has appointed him White House Press Secretary.
30	time journalist obama press secretary news	Obama Press Magazine period.
31	sm socialmedia revolution social medium uprising epoch time tyranny social medium	It's a social revolution, a social revolution, an uprising of apos; a tyrannical period of social middle social times.
31	social medium tool protest middle east police worst	L&apos is a social media tool that protests against the Middle East's worst police force.
31	thing social medium revolution enticing idea	The subject of the media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media. media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media media
31	haiti tragedy cement role social medium powerful social tool	The tragedy of Haiti binds together the social role of the medium as a powerful social tool.
31	political power social medium foreign affair	Political power, social media, foreign affairs, and foreign affairs.
31	republican nimble democrat social medium study find democrat obama cam tcot tlot	An agile Republican Democratic study of social medium finds obama cam cam tcot tlot tlot democrat.
31	nerdalert thing social medium revolution	Nerdalert is a medium social revolutionary thing.
31	mob democracy facebook twitter youtube revolution politics daily	Mob Democracy Facebook youtube revolutionize everyday politics.
31	thing social medium revolution activist twitter	C' is a social thing, is a revolution, is a Twitter activist.
31	pew republican democrat social medium	Pew Democratic Republican Social Media Democrat.
31	egyptian uprising play social medium site despite government internet restriction egypt	The Egyptian uprising plays the role of a social media outlet despite the government's restrictions on e-mail access.
31	twitter facebook blocked egypt news jan politics sm jan	It's been a long time since I've had a chance to tell you what I've done.
31	mob democracy facebook twitter youtube revolution facebook	Youtube Facebook Facebook Facebook revolutionary mafia.
31	online american social networking twitter republican catch democrat social	On U.S. social media, Republican Twitter catches Social Democratic.
31	journalist social medium report egyptian demonstration audioboo	Journalist social media outlet reporting Egyptian protest audioboo audioboo.
31	republican gain democrat social medium study released pew center internet	L' Study on the Democratic Social Medium Republican has published on the Internet the point of departure; anchoring of the Internet.
31	poll gop catch dems social medium younger internet user pew lik socialmedia	It's a great way to get to know more about the Internet and to learn more about social media.
31	poll gop catch dems social medium younger internet user pew	It's a great way to get a feel for the environment and the environment.
31	power social medium	Power of the social medium?
31	social medium growing role social medium	The Growing Role of the Social Medium the Social Role the Social Medium the Social Medium.
31	poll gop catch dems social medium younger internet user pew social medium	The survey collects data on the state of the art of social media.
31	republican catch democrat socialmedia politics	Social media reports that Republican politics is catching up with the Democrats.
31	online american social networking twitter politics campaign	On social media in the United States, a political campaign on Twitter is under way.
31	will egypt facebook powered revolution hard heel tunisian protest	L' Egypt facebook, fueled by the country's hard-hitting revolution.
31	republican gain democrat social medium	Republicans, they win the social-democratic medium.
31	obama campaign playbook promote agenda social medium	Obama's book on social media campaigning promotes the social media agenda.
31	facebook twitter revolution mediapost searchblog overview internet blackout af	Twitter revolution Twitter mediapost blog search d' Internet glimpse black-out af.
31	christie prof adept social medium	Christie teaches social psychics.
31	gop voter active social networking site political purpose washing artimpactnetpr	Social networking site active gop voting for political wash artimpactnetprprpr.
31	journalist social medium report egyptian demonstration journalist	Social media reporter reporting on the Egyptian protest reporter for the protest.
31	poll gop catch dems social medium	Gop Wrestling is the social media outlet for the Gop Wrestling poll.
31	rash report social medium tool social unrest john rash tunisian mohamed bouazizi cou	Rash reports on a social media tool john rash Tunisian mohamed bouazizi neck social disorder.
31	thing social medium revolution	C&apos is the social media revolution.
31	pew internet online american social networking twitter politics campaign internet	On the Web, on the Web, on the US Social Network, on Twitter, on the Web, on the Web, on the Web, on the Web, etc.
31	political power social medium foreign affair	Political power, social media, foreign affairs, and foreign affairs.
31	obama campaign playbook promote agenda social medium	Obama's book on social media campaigning promotes the social media agenda.
32	alberta ferretti spring rtw	Ferretti Spring rtw.
32	leon payn bottega veneta coming	Leon bottega payn veneta to come.
32	bottega veneta teal turquoise knot intrecciato snakeskin clutch	Bottega veneta Turquoise teal node Intrecciato skin of snakes clutch intrecciato.
32	bottega veneta rtw spring beautiful fashion art gt	Bottega veneta rtw springtime fashion beautiful art gt gt.
32	photography check bottega veneta robert longo photo shoot fall winter advertising camp	Photograph check Bottega Veneta Robert Longo photo session Fall photo camp.
32	straight catwalk stan jouk	This is Stan's right hand bridge.
32	trend spring	Spring's trend.
32	bottega veneta launch fragrance	Scent-flavored Bottega veneta.
33	wisconsin detector law family duplex	Duplex from the Wisconsin-based sensor family.
34	bbc news police lose officer	B.B.C. Loses one officer.
34	government spending cut leave north east forestry commission base saveourforests	Government budget cuts have left the basis of the Northern Forestry Commission-est saves our forests.
34	manchester austerity cut hit frontline service leisure centre library swimming pool public toile	L' austerity of Manchester has hit on the first line center of leisure library library pool toilet public pool leisure center.
34	spending cut toy library jeopardy	To spend on a library of toys, c&apos is to risk of them; to lose there.
34	guardian music birmingham city council cut bcmg reversed protest kicking fuss work	Birmingham music guard cut bcmg city council overturned protest kicking chaotic work.
35	disease health risk bed bug bite	Health Risks of Illnesses Bedbug bite.
35	sage advice travel picking bedbug hitchhiker	Tips on choosing a car-bed bug stop.
35	rid bedbug	Get rid-of the bed bugs.
35	bedbug case clinophobia fear going bed	Bed bugs are afraid to go to bed.
35	bed bug problem bad bed bug summit washington	The Bedbugs Problem The Top of Bedbugs Washington.
35	bed bug deadbedbugs help fact bed bug treatment	Bed bugs help treat bed bugs with dead bugs.
35	lighter note today wrapped second national bed bug summit cue bad joke conference hotel	Lighter note today' hui en envelopé 2nd national summit of the bed bugs replica bad joke hotel conference joke.
35	deadbedbugs fact bed bug cover	The dead bedbugs have been the cover of the bedbugs.
35	bedbug rapidly evolving fight pesticide tech news	Bedbugs are a fast-moving, anti-pesticide technology.
35	national summit address bedbug epidemic	The National Summit deals with the issue of bed bugs.
35	fed crack bedbug	Crack-fed bed bugs.
36	extremely good analysis difficult will murdoch money daily blog	Extremely good hard Murdoch analysis money daily blogger.
36	daily review murdoch ipad newspaper rupert murdoch ipad launch daily offer glitzy graphic	Murdoch Daily Journal ipad murdoch ipad rupert daily launch offer scintillating graphics.
36	faster forward news corp launch tablet daily app ipad designed scratch dail	The company's daily front-end launch tablet; scratch-designed daily information ipad application.
36	web daily stunning slow day launch daily ipad newspaper ipad	Daily web surprisingly slow daily ipad daily ipad journal ipad daily launch day.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	It's a good way to reduce your weight, and it's a good way to reduce your weight.
37	health acai berry effective colon cleanse ingredient acai berry rightly desc	It's a good way to keep your nose clean, and it's a good way to keep your nose clean.
37	skinny burn fat	Burning grease.
37	maqui berry newest effective losing weight	Maqui Berry is the most effective yet to lose weight.
37	acai berry weight loss confusing	There is a lot of confusion about how much weight the berries are losing.
37	will acai berry help lose weight acai berry renowned natural weight loss supplement hea	The berries will help to lose weight The berries d' açaï are a well-known supplement for the loss of natural weight.
37	acai berry diet succeed hoodia gordonii site acai berry cultivated acai palm	The plant has a wide range of plant and animal life, and is one of the world's most important plant and animal species.
37	acai berry supplement help weight loss bamadems reason acai ambria dealcenter	The extra d&apos berries will help you to lose weight while you're doing business.
37	weight loss diet acai berry weight loss diet plan diet diet food weight loss beauty sally beauty bea	Dietary Weight Loss Acai Bays Dietary Weight Loss Diet Dietary Weight Loss Bea Sally Bea Diet.
37	love finding stuff acai berry juice drinking weight loss lookin sally	J' loves to find things like fresh berry juice; açaï while drinking berry juice.
37	acai berry powder ehow acai berry powder acai berry extraordinarily	Powder d'apos; acai berry ehow powder d'apos; extraordinary acai berry.
37	buy acai berry weight loss product read buy acai berry weight loss product	"Purchase a weight-loss product from d&apos berries; read ""Buy a d&apos berry weight-loss product; acai."""
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	It's a good way to reduce your weight, and it's a good way to reduce your weight.
37	best weight loss pill acai berry advantage king bop loved appreciated solely lucky en	The best pill of weight loss acai-advantage bberries king bop-appreciated only lucky.
37	amazon acai berry weight loss expectation acai berry amazon named super fruit cl	Amazone acai berry loss of weight waiting acai berries amazone named super fruit clazone.
37	best lose weight acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	Increase your weight loss by reducing your weight by reducing your weight.
37	acai berry supplement weight loss associated content heard oprah win	Açaa berry is a weight loss supplement associated with the content you want to win.
37	acai berry scam free trial weight loss genius scam associated acai berry supposed	L'apos, a scam from the bay d'apos; Açaï, without a trial, the genius of weight loss; l'apos, a scam associated with the bay d'apos; Açaï, supposed to be a scam from the bay d'apos; Açaï.
37	weight loss diet plan acai juice equal nutritional claim acai	Dietary allowance for weight-loss, diet, diet, diet, diet, etc.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	A diet that slows down to the bay d'apos; Acaï provides a healthy reduction in weight.
37	healthy weight loss acai berry bamadems acai berry ambria dealcenter	Weight loss-acai bamadems acai bryryry ambria dealcenter.
37	acai berry health benefit weight loss improvement	Açaï baies santé profit de perte de poids improvement de la perte de poids.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	It's a good way to reduce your weight, and it's a good way to reduce your weight.
37	weight loss diet plan south american acai berry currently american lose	Dietetic Plan for South Acai Bay Weight Loss-American currently lose.
37	acai berry capsule review acai berry benefit letspost jone dow acai berry capsule well	The capsule can be used in a variety of ways, such as in the case of ice cream, in the case of ice cream, in the case of ice cream, in the case of ice cream.
37	weight loss diet plan acai berry antioxidant popular supplement include antioxidant rich acai berry	Anti-oxidant plan thinning d&apos berries; acai supplement popular include anti-oxidant rich d&apos berries; acai rich anti-oxidants.
37	weight loss diet plan acai berry antioxidant popular supplement include antioxidant rich acai berry	Anti-oxidant plan thinning d&apos berries; acai supplement popular include anti-oxidant rich d&apos berries; acai rich anti-oxidants.
37	madwrite weight loss minimal technique numerous acai berry pulp diet benefit leave conse	Minimal techniques for weight loss Madwrite has many dietary advantages of d&apos berry pulp; acai leaves the result.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry adi news acai berry promote weight loss imp	Weight loss dietary plan adi berries d' healthy new berries d' promotion of weight loss impedes weight loss.
37	acai berry fact lose weight acai berry lose super online deal net lfittips	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	acai berry effective weight loss pill current health article tafdropdn blue acai berry effective	Acai Berry Effective Weight Loss Pill current acai berry blue tafdropdn health product effective tafdropdn.
37	acai berry chocolate tasting weight loss diet plan demand acai berry eventually lead	Açaa Chocolate Lifestyle Weight Loss Tasting Regime berries possibly require lead acai.
37	random concept explicit acai berry weight full excitement	Random concept explicitly acai full-weight excitation berry.
37	acai berry diet linda acai berry diet acai berry weightcrushers ambria dealcenter	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	weight loss diet plan acai juice equal nutritional claim acai	Dietary allowance for weight-loss, diet, diet, diet, diet, etc.
37	losing weight best acai berry benefit report elmerfizz people reduce fat	Losing weight Best acai berries profits elmerfizz people ratio reduces fat.
37	madwrite acai berry colon cleansing diet visit post acai fruit deto	Acwrite acai colon berry-cleaning diet visits-acai post fruit.
37	acai berry diet weight loss include increase body energy level increased immune system	The weight loss of the diet of the bay d'apos; includes an increase in the level of body energy, an increase in the immune system.
37	acai berry diet side effect lose weight fast acai berry diet side effe	It is also important to keep in mind that there is a risk to the health and safety of Canadians.
37	acai berry chocolate tasting weight loss diet plan adi news scientifically prov	Açaï chocolate with tasting berries and weight loss diets dietary plan scientifically new prov.
37	losing excess weight amazon acai berry weight loss people overweight obe	Excessive weight loss Amazon acai berry people are losing weight ob oboe oboe oboe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe obe weight.
37	acai berry weight loss formula program flush pound lose weight free bottle	Weight-loss program for d&apos berries, flush, weight-lossless bottle.
37	top weight loss pill include acai berry purchased	Weight-loss pills include purchased berries.
37	acai berry effective weight loss health benefit article will explain aca	It is also important to note that there are many factors that influence the health of Canadians.
37	acai berry weight loss confusing helen arsenault january talk mogul op	The loss of weight of the bay d'apos caused Helen Arsenault to be confused in January.
37	acai berry improve health lose weight acai acai berry fruit	Berries are improving health, berries are losing weight, and berries are losing fruit.
37	amazon acai berry weight loss expectation acai berry amazon named super fruit cl	Amazone acai berry loss of weight waiting acai berries amazone named super fruit clazone.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry adi news acai berry promote weight loss imp	Weight loss dietary plan adi berries d' healthy new berries d' promotion of weight loss impedes weight loss.
37	acai berry acai diet info acai berry detox product curious acai berry	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	amazon rain forest safe acai berry diet power attributed	Amazon Rainforest, acai-safe bays with food allocation power.
37	weight loss acai berry bitcomet blog acai berry diet acai diet acai bromelain weight loss acai pow	Bitcomet acai berry weight loss blog acai baies diet acai bromelain acai weight loss pow acai pow acai pow.
37	reading acai berry weight loss diet plan cardiovascular health diet weight loss	You may also want to check your diet to see if it's safe to eat.
37	acai berry product real wait loss brand question fezangee acai berry pro	Açai produção de bays d'apos; realmente question mark d'attente fezangee acções de bays d'apos; fezangee.
37	acai berry medicine food acai berry benefit northcountry boypost ron duckett acai berry	It's a place where you can enjoy the beauty of the sea, the beauty of the sea, the beauty of the sea, the beauty of the sea and the beauty of the sea.
37	essential weight loss diet pill guide best acai berry diet help promoting	Essential weight-loss pills guide the best bay diets; açaï.
37	acai berry best healty fruit pinoy pen article acai create originates acai berry	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	leanspa acai berry diet fact fiction acai berry weight loss fad buyer	Leanspa acai diet à la baie Facts Fiction acai baies loss of weight fad buyer fad.
37	thin link burn fat	The fine-grained links will burn the burnt fat.
37	acai berry acai berry juice weight loss	Açai berries Açai berries Loss of weight of berry juice.
37	weight loss diet plan south american acai berry currently american lose	Dietetic Plan for South Acai Bay Weight Loss-American currently lose.
37	weight loss diet plan acai juice equal nutritional acai berry hit health	A weight-loss diet based on Dapos juices; a diet based on Dapos berries; and health benefits.
37	acai berry diet side effect lose weight fast acai berry diet side effe	It is also important to keep in mind that there is a risk to the health and safety of Canadians.
37	lose weight world effective nutrition acai weight loss acai berry weight loss	Effective global weight loss acai weight loss acai weight acay ber berries weight loss berries.
37	loss weight acai berry capsule benefit	Loss of weight in the acai berry capsule.
37	acai berry chocolate tasting weight loss diet plan adi news scientifically prov	Açaï chocolate with tasting berries and weight loss diets dietary plan scientifically new prov.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	It's a good way to reduce your weight, and it's a good way to reduce your weight.
37	acai berry social bookmarking net acai berry latest weight loss buy acai berry best colon cleanse	Addition of d' a social label to d&apos berries; acai latest bay weight loss; acai Best colon cleansing of d&apos berries; acai.
37	real acai berry supplement deal rapid fast weight loss well ordered acai berry blast	It's also a great way to help you keep your weight down and keep your weight down.
37	acacia berry diet acacia berry acai weight loss hcg diet plan happened account parti	The acacia berry acacia berry acry weight loss diet hcg plan s&apos is part of the diet.
37	ready thin ready don burn fat	Ready-made, ready-made, burns fat.
37	secret natural weight loss food acai berry benefit	Loss of natural weight is a secret to acai food and berries.
37	told thin ready burn fat	Said thin, ready, burnt fat.
37	told trim fat ready check burn fat	Prepare the fat to check the fat that has been burned.
37	acai berry eating regimen review lose lb rapid zwak org info acai berry benefit yo	Examination of the diet of dried berries; fast loss of information on profitable berries.
37	weight loss diet plan acai juice equal nutritional claim acai	Dietary allowance for weight-loss, diet, diet, diet, diet, etc.
37	swanson vitamin review weight review acai berry buy calorie control weight swanson vitam	Swanson Vitamin Review Critical Weight acai berries buy control of Swanson Vitamin Swanson Calorie weight.
37	acai berry juice drinking weight loss juice will help	Berry juices; if you drink weight-loss juices, you may be able to help.
37	reason acai berry weight loss diet case half popula	This is why half of the population suffers from weight loss in the bay diet.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry	Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Diet diet.
37	acai berry detox scam acai berry detox scam rachel weight loss blog acai weight loss experien	Acai berry detox acai berry detox scam rachel blog weight loss acai weight loss experience acai weight loss experience.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan advertised sugge	Açai weight-loss regimen of the Healthy Weight Reduction Plan Blueberry Regime Regime.
37	acai berry diet sexy acai berry scam warning acai berry diet	Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
37	burn pound today day check burn fat	Burn the book today; oil, check the burnt fat.
37	lt gt acai berry lt gt weight loss side effect improvement	Gt acai berry gt to improve the quality of your body.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry people sticking	Weight-loss plan Healthy acai berry lifestyle people glue people together.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	It's a good way to reduce your weight, and it's a good way to reduce your weight.
37	pure acai berry thorough article pure acai berry buy pure acai berry acai berry extracteveryone se	Dapos berries; dapos berries pure article; can buy dapos berries; dapos berries pure acai; dapos berries; can extract everyone.
37	exactly acai berry diet pill wrk yahoo answer acai berry diet pill	The diet pill acai berry wrk yahoo exactly respond to the diet pill acai berry.
37	acai berry work lose weight lose weight heard acai berry pe	Work on d'apos bays is losing weight.
37	acai berry cena austin meyer acai berry weight loss acai berry thin acai berry thin ra acai berry thin frum	Austin meyer berry acai berry weight loss fine acai berry fine acai berry fine frum berry.
37	acai berry work reading help understand acai berry work acai berry	Reading the d&apos bays helps you understand the d&apos bays.
37	told skinny today day burn fat	J&apos, a.k.a., a.k.a., a.k.a.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry people sticking	Weight-loss plan Healthy acai berry lifestyle people glue people together.
37	amazon acai berry weight loss expectation acai berry amazon named super fruit cl	Amazone acai berry loss of weight waiting acai berries amazone named super fruit clazone.
37	acai berry juice diet regime operate excess weight heading answer question soo	The Soo Soo Soo question is answered by using too much weight in the diet of d&apos berry juice.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry adi news acai berry promote weight loss imp	Weight loss dietary plan adi berries d' healthy new berries d' promotion of weight loss impedes weight loss.
37	acai berry weight loss confusing industry analyst acai berry directly re	Apos Bay Weight Loss; Causal, Confusing to L&apos Analyst; D&apos Bay Industry; Acai.
37	food burn belly fat don	Food burns the fat from Don's belly.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan cardiovascular health diet weight loss shedd	Cardiovascular health plan diet weight-loss diet.
37	heard acai berry diet acai berry heard diet purchasing	It is not a good idea to buy food from a restaurant, but it is a good idea to do so.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction number diet plan	It's a good way to reduce your weight, and it's a good way to reduce your weight.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry	Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Diet diet.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	A diet that slows down to the bay d'apos; Acaï provides a healthy reduction in weight.
37	acai year weight loss diet plan acai berry purplish fruit harvested palm tree	L'est-à-la-vie de l'île de l'Est; l'année de l'apos; c'est-à-la-vie de l'île de l'Est; c'est-à-vie.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	A diet that slows down to the bay d'apos; Acaï provides a healthy reduction in weight.
37	acai berry chocolate tasting weight loss diet plan demand acai berry eventually lead	Açaa Chocolate Lifestyle Weight Loss Tasting Regime berries possibly require lead acai.
37	buy acai berry cicerone superiority lfittips	Buy your own berry cicerone superiority ifittips superiority.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry	Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Dietary plan Diet diet.
37	weight loss diet plan living healthy acai berry adi news acai berry promote weight loss imp	Weight loss dietary plan adi berries d' healthy new berries d' promotion of weight loss impedes weight loss.
37	acai berry powder content health weight loss hard figure	It's a great way to make a difference in the world.
37	acai berry nutrient power weight loss diet plan acai berry popularity expanded rain	Diet Plan for Nutritional Weight Loss of Daposberries; açaï has increased rainfall.
37	goodbye pound acai berry weight loss pill acai ultima making larg	It's a good idea to take a few minutes to relax and enjoy the sunshine.
37	weight loss acai berry diet improvement acai berry diet individual large amount accept	Loss of weight acai bberries improve the diet acai bays individual diet large quantity accept.
37	acai berry weight loss diet plan healthy weight reduction	A diet that slows down to the bay d'apos; Acaï provides a healthy reduction in weight.
38	venezuela chavez mark year power	Venezuela has been marking the year of power.
38	venezuela chavez reelection written caracas venezuelan president hugo chavez sunday	Venezuela chavez written re-election caracas Venezuelan president hugo chavez on Sunday.
38	chavez mark year office venezuelan president hugo chavez mark year power promising news	Chavez Mark a Venezuelan bureau president, hugo chavez mark a power that promises news.
38	hugochavez venezuelan commemorate democracy day january rebelleft	Chuchochavez Venezuelan commemorate the Day of Democracy Rebelft January rebellft January.
38	venezuela chavez threatens seize bank efe president hugo chavez threatened expropriate venezuelan	Venezuela Chavez is threatening to foreclose on bank president Hugo Chavez, threatening to expropriate Venezuela.
38	golf venezuelan president hugo chavez enemy golf venezuelan president hugo chavez	Venezuelan golf president hugo chavez Venezuelan golf enemy hugo chavez.
38	chavez mark year office venezuelan president hugo chavez mark year power promising press	Chavez Mark a Venezuelan bureau president, hugo chavez mark a power that promises the press.
38	hugo chavez apologizes venezuelan people ahead election	Hugo Chavez would like to apologize to the Venezuelan people for the upcoming elections.
38	venezuela chavez enemy golf	Venezuela Chavez Enemy golf.
38	right group claim chavez judiciary foe	The right-wing group claims the apos; the criminal enemy chavez.
38	interview venezuela sweetheart champion chavez venezuelan president hugo chavez speaks meeting	Interview come love champion chavez chavez Venezuelan president hugo chavez talk meeting.
39	winter storm hit harder chicago toronto	Chicago Toronto was hit hardest by the winter storm.
39	comed crew restoring power customer chicago	Chicago Electrical Customer Service.
39	national guard called chicago snow storm woow snow chill people	It's called the Chicago snowstorm, and it's called the snow chill people.
39	city regional service brace storm bracing approaching blizzard ldquo historic proportion rdquo city	The city's regional service prepares for the storms at the beginning of the year; approaches to the blizzard.
39	save poptarts tmr chicago foot snow hour forecaster	Save Poptarts from the Chicago Snow Hour Forecaster.
39	crazy lake shore drive downtown chicago shut	The entire lakefront road leading to downtown Chicago has been closed.
39	foxchicago blizzard trap driver lsd hour	Foxchicago blizzard blizzard driver trap lsd hour.
39	chicago city sneer snow brought chicago reuters chicago city sn	Chicago City railler bring snow to Chicago Reuters Chicago city railler Chicago.
39	mayor closed chicago public school	Chicago Public School has been shut down by the mayor.
39	foot snow hour chicago latest blizzard warning don travel stay indoors chicago breaking news	Canadian soldiers take part in Calgary Stampede Calgary, AB – Soldiers from 12e Régiment Blindé du Canada showcase Quebec ́s 400th anniversary.
39	lake shore drive closed blizzard	Driving on the shore of Lake Blizzard closed blizzard.
39	chicago foot snow hour bout blizzard heading hater	Chicago soccer soccer match hour blizzard heading to the top of the league.
39	timesxemail chicago warned brace blizzard barrelling chicago emergency official offe	Warning message from Chicago to Blizzard Blizzard Barricading the Apos; Chicago E.R. Officer.
39	pm latest chicago free blizzard update flight cancelled storm	The last free flight from Chicago to the blizzard bay has canceled the storm.
39	chicago blizzard closed lake shore drive entire length notice	Chicago Blizzard, closed shoreline of the lake, will conduct all the length notice.
39	blizzard break chicago snow record inch expected	Blizzard broke the Chicago snow record.
39	chicago fire department snow mobile reach folk stranded lake shore drive blizzard	The Chicago Fire Department snowfalls to the blizzards on the shores of the lake.
39	chicago lake shore drive death trap closed stranded car blizzard	Car blizzard shut down on Lake Chicago shore.
39	lake shore drive closed chicago blizzard	Closed Lake Drive Chicago blizzard closed.
40	aurobindo pharma receives usfda approval levofloxacin tablet news	Aurobindo Pharma obtains approval from Ufda for new information on the use of levofloxacin tablets.
40	fda approves drug reduce risk preterm birth risk pregnant woman silver spring md feb	The FDA approves a drug that reduces the risk of pregnancy-induced premature birth.
40	fda approves rituxan maintenance follicular lymphoma chemo	The FDA approves chemo for the treatment of follicular lymphoma; maintenance of rituxan.
40	fda ok viibryd treat depression fda approved drug called viibryd treat adult major depressiv	Fda ok viibryd treat the fda depression approved medication called viibryd treat major adult depressive disorder.
40	so sleep update fda clear pgxhealth depressive disorder drug viibryd health treatment	So, sleep update clear fda depressive disorder pgxhealth drug viibryd health treatment.
40	fda approves pharma preterm birth drug embattled drugmaker pharmaceutical reported health reg	The FDA approves the health plan reported by the manufacturer of the drug product for the purpose of preventing premature delivery in a pharmacy.
40	viibryd approved treat depression adult psych central news	Viibryd has approved the treatment of adult psychic and central information depression.
40	fda approves drug treat depression	FDA has approved the drug treatment of depression.
40	fda approved injectable drug called makena reduce risk preterm delivery week	The FDA-approved injectable drug, called makena, reduces the risk of the first week of pregnancy; premature delivery.
40	fda approves premature birth drug philadelphia inquirer share friend top news health	FDA Approves Preterm Birth Drug (PBD) Philadelphia inquire to share friends of first-time health news.
40	fda approves drug reduce risk premature birth time	The FDA will approve a drug that reduces the risk of premature birth.
40	fda approves drug prevent premature birth yahoo share friend health smoking sto	FDA Approves Preterm Birth Prevention Drugs yahoo Share Healthy Friends Smoking Sto.
40	fda approves drug treat nerve pain shingle	FDA approves drugs for the treatment of nerve pain.
40	myl mylan awarded fda approval generic protonix delayed release tablet gerd	Myl mylan obtained generic protonix germ-delayed-release tablet fda approval.
40	npr fda approves drug prevent preterm birth	Drugs that prevent premature births are approved by the npr fda.
40	pharma news fda clear pgxhealth depressive disorder drug viibryd	Pharmaceutical info clear depressive disorder pgxhealth drug viibryd.
40	bioportfolio news fda approves drug reduce preterm delivery risk pharmaceutical busi bioportfolio news	Biochemical Portfolio News The FDA is endorsing biopharmaceutical portfolio news to reduce the risk of premature delivery.
41	beck rating plummeted	Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re Re
41	glenn beck rating year ago fb	Glenn Beck a year ago.
41	sharing neocon robert kagan beck call panic monger	Sharing the Neocon Robert Kagan Beck prompts panic to monger.
41	glenn beck post biggest rating drop cable news january fb	It's been a long time since we've been able to do this, but it's been a long time.
42	huge outdoor slated feb wft newsfrom trophy elk deer hunt trout ba	D' huge news of trophy trout deer hunting ba.
42	fishing rule federal panel table kevin wadlow annual harvest popular recreational fish	Fishing Rules Federal Panel Table Kevin Wadlow annually harvests a popular harvest of recreational fish.
42	better saltwater fishing general	Best salt-water fishing.
42	caption contest win ticket gear fly fishing film tour tim romano fly fishing film tour kick	Subtitle Contest @-@titles Win the Fly Fishing Ticket; Fly Fishing Tournament Fly Fishing Tournament Timano Fly Fishing Coup d' Fly Fishing Tour mailing.
42	prettyman annual fish porn provider coming fly fishing film festival bring subject called	Prettyman, an annual supplier of porno fish to come to the Flyfishing Festival bringing the subject matter known as the so-called topic.
42	sedative free whale fishing	Sedative whaling.
42	cook gun shop offer amp firearm gunsmithing service hunting fishing accessory	They are available in a variety of sizes and sizes, and can be used in a variety of sizes, sizes and sizes.
42	brown trout fishing tip yahoo answer wfnewsi headed alberta july	The board of fishing for brown trout yahoo response has recently been directed to Alberta July alberta news.
42	river monster breede saltwater fishing general fishing fish	River Monster Breede is a saltwater fishing species.
42	saltwater fish marine aquarium fish saltwater aquarium	Aquarium for marine fishes; salt water aquarium for marine fishes; salt water aquarium.
42	info topic fish tank heater aquarium stuff technorati tag aquarium heater aquariu	Information about aquarium aquarium aquarium aquarium aquarium heating technorati tag aquarium.
42	minnesota week extreme ice fishing rescuer boat save stranded fisherman	Minnesota Week Extreme Ice Fishing Rescueer boat saves a fisherman who is in distress.
42	relevance fly fishing rod fly fishing outdoor activity fly fishing seriously exciting fan	Relevance Fly fishing with fishing rods Fly fishing outdoors Fly fishing with a passionate fan.
42	trout steelhead fly fishing supply stretched canvas poster steelhead trout image	Rainbow trout-@-@-@-@-sky Rainbow trout-flyfishing-@-@ in sky.
42	sedative free whale fishing care news network	Non-sedated whaling information.
42	general fishing newscoarse fish today meeting ifi aci angling ireland	The meeting will be held on Wednesday morning at 10 a.m. and will be followed by a press briefing.
42	wisconsin fishing report posted	Wisconsin National Fishery Report posted.
42	eu urged overhaul fishing policy	I have been urging him to review his fishing policy.
42	fish eat complete fishing guide	Fish eat the entire guidebook.
42	cabo san lucas cabo san lucas fishing report january early don plan making dinner	Cabo san lucas cabo san lucas report fishing January morning Don plans to prepare dinner.
42	check price fly fishing lure ebay store info	Check fly-fishing bait prices.
42	bigger boat albert pujols biggest fish catch cardinal chum reel	The largest ship Albert pujols the largest fish catches the Chum salmon coil cardinal.
42	trout biting tackle read urban phoenix az metro lake fishing trip local park	Plate-trout bite fishing form read the urban azro fishing phoenix of the local metro lake park.
42	interesting south indian river fishing report lt lt	Interesting Report on Fisheries in the South of India.
42	friday time pack week ice fishing check canadian	On Friday, Icefishing Week, Canada's national icefishing season.
42	fishing technique fishing maine surf fishing striped bass	Fishing techniques Longline The longline fishery.
42	interested fly fishing guide prague	Fly Fishing Guide Prague interested.
42	gill net fishing closed early ton rockfish poaching bust capital news service photo kerry davis	Gillnet fishing has closed the early poaching of redfish to the Capital News Source Photo Service Kerry Davis.
42	celebrity gossip fishing madison river montana	Gossip from celebrities fishing in the Madison Montana River, right?
42	mike iaconelli bass fishing ike hook big bass difficult situation video ratin	Mike Iaconelli Bass fishing Ike hook Big Bass hook rattle difficult video situation.
42	fishing tackle box zebco ready tackle telescopic multi combo fishing kit	Zebco Fishing Box ready telescoping multi-combo fishing kit.
42	indicator point great fall steelhead fishing	Rainbow trout autumn-in-sky.
42	wilmington nc inshore winter fishing report	Winter Inshore Report.
42	cook trout fresh water fish grilling fish heart healthy recipe cook trout	Cook the trout d' freshwater fish grill heart fish healthy recipe cook the trout.
42	catch catfish hand	Grab the fish fingers-chat.
42	blog post tunkwa leighton lake ice fishing report	Tunkwa leighton reports the lake's ice fishing.
42	youghal bridge fished ther time year small cod angling fishing	Youghal Bridge hooked the little cod this year.
42	dress winter steelhead fishing	Winter trout fishing-in-sky.
42	bass fishing contest android game shuixing casual	Android Shuixing soft-shuixing bass-fishing contests.
42	complete book fly fishing	A full-on book on fly-fishing.
42	saltwater deep sea fishing net will full standard fishing virginia seve	The seine nets will be fully standard for fishing virginia seve.
42	angling free fishing access wft newsby cathy pelletier chronicle dunnville peopl	Free access to news via Dunnville Peopl Chronic Furry Cathy.
42	saltwater aquarium secretthriving marine aquarium secret pet shop dont	Aquarium d' salt water, secret marine aquarium, secret marine aquarium, secret marine aquarium, pet store that does not contain animals.
42	hatteras jack fishing report rodanthe monday january nailed striper	Hatteras Jack fishing report rodanthe Monday nailed January strip-teaseuse.
42	fishing exclusive popular sporting wft newssimple sharp sp	Exclusive wft newssimple sp.
42	family ice fishing clinic derby idaho fishing idaho	Family Derby Idaho Ice Fishing Clinic fishing Idaho.
42	kayak fishing extreme sport wavewalk fishing kayak angler kayak fishing extreme sport	Sport fishing kayaking Extreme wave walking kayaking kayaking kayaking sport fishing line.
42	ice fishing iowa	Ice fishing, Iowa.
42	fly fishing program host replaces columbia country wft newsbob asbury producer	L&apos, host of the fly-fishing program, replaces Asbury, a Colombian newspaper producer.
42	checkout fishing fishinggear deal save	If you are a fisher do not hesitate to contact us.
42	competitive fishing tactic fly everyday fisherman thinking man	Competitive fishing tactic, daily fishing fly, daily fishing fly, man-thinking fisherman.
42	saltwater fish tank harmful human help	The project is expected to be completed by the end of the year.
42	aquarium fish breeding angel fish best technique started breeding angel fish buy	Aquarium Reproduction fish angel fish the best technique has started to reproduce fish angel fish buy angel fish.
42	news annual ice fishing derby	News of the annual Ice Fishing Derby.
42	man tased mpd fight fishing tourney jan year cable wisconsin man	Man Taser MPD Fight Fishing Tourney Jan Year of Wisconsin Man cable.
42	lazer trokar return sponsor boatus collegiate bass fishing championship	Lazer trokar return sponsoring boatus collegial fishing to the bass championship.
42	mastering big chill outdoors fishing news ice fishing kind	Mastering the Severe Cold of Fishing Outdoors New Ice Fishing Like Fishing.
42	hooked ice fishing small sled fishing gear pulling contained fish targeting	Fishing by hook, fishing by hook, fishing by hook, towing by sledge of small fishing gear, targeting of fish.
42	florida sportsman fishing boating saltwater fly fishing stalking red kayak	A Florida sportsman catches a blue fly; salt water catches a red sea kayak in pursuit of a blue fly.
42	american fishing wire duo lock snap size lb sizescorrosion resistant black finish	Lapo Size; U.S. Fishing Fir Duo Lock Lb. Dimensions Corrosion-resistant Black finish.
42	fishing find freshwater fishing lure cheap ebay buy	To fish in fresh water fishing attract cheap ebay buy ebay.
42	watch shearon harris lake jun top water bass fishing	Watch as Shearon Harris Lake fishes Jun Lake's top sea bass.
42	carp fishing book effective angling step step king bop carp fishing book	Book on Effective Harvesting King bop carp book on Harvesting carp.
42	find better deal offshore saltwater fishing boat ebay check	Find a better business off the coast of the fishing boats ebay check ebay.
42	fishing news banner website	Fishing information, web site.
42	discus fish aquarium	Aquarium discus.
42	boatsshopping fishing headline oklahoma metro trout fishing pond instructional clinic pave exciting winter angling html	The Oklahoma Salmon Trout Fishery features the Pacific Salmon Trout Fishery; Apos Pond; Oklahoma.
42	ice fishing bro brohsdahl jason mitchell byron eckhardt special ice fishing schtick	Brohsdahl jason mitchell byron eckhardt fishing on ice.
42	best fishing spot lm clickrealstyle	Best site for fishing in old age.
42	watch montauk kayak fishing blitz video fishing news video	Watch Montauk kayak peach blitz video fishery video video video video news.
42	twenty question walleye pro jimmy bell hunting big life fishing	I'd like to ask you a couple of questions, but I'd like to ask you a few questions.
42	yap palau sport fishing promotional sport fishing video produced video rating	Yap Palau Promotion of Sport Fishing of Sport Fishing video product video filing.
42	ice fishing trip frozen connecticut river vic attardo outdoors current strong flow	Ice fishing excursion on the Connecticut River Vic attardo at the high current.
42	redfishing great cape fear backwater warmer day light wind	In addition, there are a number of small-scale fishing activities in the area.
42	caught lb yellowfin tuna flick fishing flickfishing	J&apos, a longline fishery; yellowfin, a yellowfin, a longline fishery.
42	going fishing today friend hatteras hope find catch fishing cabo slow	I'm fishing today; oil friends Hatteras hope to find slow fishing cod.
42	yell cast jr hartley ad digital era author search fly fishing book dj hunt book read	Yell cast jr hartley and l&apos Numerical era author of research on the book fishing to the dj hunting book read.
42	colorado river colorado fly fishing condition report kynd	Colorado River colorado fishing condition to fly report kynd.
42	pensacola salt water fishing guide undoubtedly best tourist destination map unite	Pensacola saltwater fishing guidebook probably the best joint tourist destination map.
42	eric sharp hot spot ice fishing eric sharp detroit free press eric sharp wisp smelt vi	Ice fishing hot-spot Eric Rive d' Détroit Free Press Rive d'lapos; hardwood smelt.
42	flyfishing big earth publishing flyfishing barry reynolds bass walleye buy john	Fly-fishing The Big Land Industry Fly-fishing Barry Reynolds John John would be bought by the walleye.
42	discus fish aquarium	Aquarium discus.
42	interesting community fishing derby feature angler ice lt lt	Interesting community angling contest showcases anglers.
42	tropical fish tank help aquarium fish tank tropical fish tank fish clean	L&apos, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium.
42	trout fishing duo slated lmfa longview news journal local event trou	Trout fishing duo lmfa longview News local news hole event.
42	treasure coast fishing report jan trout action good river angler sight cast	Atlantic Coast scallop fishery report.
42	three ton striped bass seized illegal fishing net	Illegal fishing nets have seized three tons of striped bass.
42	sow bug round north american fly fishing forum time march mountain	Planting bugs around the North Fly Fishing forum-U.S.A. is moving towards the mountains.
42	red fishing knot book book fishing harry	Book of knots Harry redfish fisherman.
42	cold weather put chill clear lake bass fishing cold weather slowed bass fishing crawl	Cold temperatures caused the coldness of the fishing lake; cold temperatures slowed down fishing for bass.
42	eye rise fishing field stream	It is the most important river in the world.
42	fishing bait bait trout fishing trout fishing type equipment dictate	Fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear; fishing gear.
42	trout fishing tip learn wedding preparation trout fishing tip help catch bigger	Trout Fishing Tips to Prepare for Marriage Trout fishing tips to help catch larger fish.
42	cold huge impact fishing bradenton herald	Huge cold fishing impact, bradenton herald.
42	american fishing book guide value	Guide Value of the U.S. Fishing Book.
42	colorado fishing blog fish explorer bernie keefe	Colorado blog fishing bernie keefe exploratory fish blog.
42	aquarium fish aquarium success good common sense will fir	Aquarium fish success aquarium good sense fish will be sapine.
42	hearing heated sea bass fishing usual fishing year black sea bass specie june	For more information, please visit the Fisheries and Oceans Canada website at http://www.fish.ca/fisheries/fisheries/fisheries.html.
42	fishnewseu issf urge limit tuna fishing capacity international seafood sustainabili eu tweet daily	Fishnewseu are eager to limit the capacity of international tuna fishing for sustainable seafood had daily tweet.
42	barbel fishing float short edited clip barbel day way series top barbel angler mic wo	The barbed fishing floating wire short barbed wire clip daytime barbed wire series high barbed wire fishing wire mic wo wo.
42	popular fly fishing smallmouth bass auction	The most popular of these auctions was the sale of smallmouth bass for fly fishing.
42	eastern sport outdoor harrisburg hunting fishing idea marcus schneck patrio	Outer sport East Harrisburg hunts idea of fishing marcus schneck patrioke idea.
42	guided fly fishing muskegon river trout	Moskegon River Trout Guided Fly Fishing.
42	crappie fishing wild fish recipe fishing tip minnesota fishing news wi	Harvesting wild crayfish Minnesota fishing advice fishing new wi news.
42	south indian river fishing report snook fishing pretty quiet jetty	Fishing in the southern part of the island, India, was carried out on a rather quiet pier.
42	gear salmon fishing	Salmon Fishing with Fishing Gears.
42	fishing report feb surf pier richie knuth fishin shack heard thi	Fishing Report February Surf Wharf Richie Knuth Fishin Shack heard that it was there.
42	fly fishing kunaplaza kunaplaza	Fishing for kunaplaza kunaplaza kunaplaza kunaplaza flies.
42	wind blowing east amazing fishing nearby island gonna plan trip catch barracuda	The wind is blowing from the sea; is amazing fishing in the vicinity of the island; will plan a trip to catch barracuda.
42	fishing hunting pike year sam biever rice lake caught inch northern pike fis	In the year of the pike hunt, Sam biever Rice Lake was captured in northern pike.
42	canada fly fishing canada fly fishing free online article directory submit article top author top	Fly-fishing in Canada Fly-fishing in Canada Fly-fishing in the open air Directory of Fly-fishing in Canada.
42	fact fly fishing rod overstock	Fly rod surplus facts.
42	ice fishing social medium explosion	Explosion of the Social Medium of Ice Fishing.
42	simple tip holding white koi fish pond	A single point containing a pond with white koi fish.
42	flambeau outdoors bazuka pro rod case florida fishing tip wfnewshinged door ea	Flame at the top; outside Bazuka case case of fishing floridian point again hinge door ea.
42	thought dolphin caught pearl hogy rigged oz jig head fish	J' believed that dolphins catch beads, hogy, oz, jig-head fish.
42	brytec fly fishing box brytec fishing	Brytec brytec brytec Flycatch Box brytec peaches.
42	carp secret homemade fish bait recipe catch bigger carp pole bending time tested fish bait	The secret recipe for carp bait catches larger fishes.
42	discus fish secret review discus fish secret	Discus secret fish to revisit discus secret fish discus secret fish.
42	fly fishing	Fly fishing.
42	fishing warm weather fish cold front litening fish feed read fishingreports	Fish fishing in hot weather before cold, throw out fish food read fishing reports.
42	aquarium fish basic plant container garden pl	Fish from the sea; aquarium, garden garden.
42	cressi spear fishing america black snorkel	Throwing crescent trees fishing for the black tuba of d' America.
42	sedative free whale fishing researcher tactic save endangered whale tangled	Free and Sedative Whaling Research Tactics to Save Ended Endangered Whales.
42	southern oregon fly fishing club	South Coast Fly Fishing Club; Oregon.
42	connecting bass fishing	Fishing connectivity; bass.
42	interesting deep sea fishing knowing tide outdoors	Interesting deep-sea fishing, tide-knowing outdoors.
42	patagonia fishing kayak beach hat size tag nr kayak wft newspatagonia fishing ka	Kayak Fishing Patagonia ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka ka
42	fishing southwest ohio realtime article copious system air force job health care medic	Fishing to the south-west of lapos; Ohio real-time article plentiful healthcare system of lapos; army of lapos; air working doctor.
42	news fishing derby today lake neshonoc west salem friend lake neshonoc ice day fishing der	New fishing derby today; Lake Neeshonoc oil west salem friend Lake Neeshonoc ice fishing day at Lake Neeshonoc.
42	fly fishing catch day magnificent fishing lodge	This is a beautiful fishing lodge.
42	check fish report fishmyrtlebeach	Run the reports on the beach fish.
42	virtual master real brings augmented reality fishing hand chris scott barrfishing nice	The real virtual master brings with it the augmented hand fishing reality Chris Scott barrfishing Nice.
42	reel augmented reality fish human takara tomy fishing reel augmented reality	Augmented takara takara human fish increased fishing reel reality augmented.
42	calgary gal fish tank aquarium amp stand access price dropped	The price of the aquarium, the aquarium, the aquarium, the aquarium and the aquarium have all fallen.
42	successful ice fishing perch depth finder successful ice	Successful Discovery of Ice Fishing Pole Depth Successful discovery of ice.
42	vancouver men busted illegal ice fishing three ice fishing prohibited barbed hook ba	Vancouver men demolished three legally prohibited barbed-wire fishing boats on the ice.
42	sedative help free whale fishing whale oceanshash sedative help	Sedative to release whaling whales, oceanic hash sedative.
42	share bass fishing fayetteville	Share the Fayetteville pole fishing.
42	pro fisherman season shop learn tip great guy help teach fish skar	Professional fisherman learns tricks, good guy helps teach skar fish.
42	celebrity gossip start fly fishing	The gossip of celebrities is really starting to catch on.
42	kaufmann streamborn northwest fly fishing blog st steelhead	"Kaufmann s&apos's blog, ""Steelhead"", about fishing with the northern fly,-west."
42	fishing spot small fish soft bait	Soft bait fishing spot.
42	fly fishing magazine guide	Fly Fishing Magazine Guide.
42	fishing striped bass ll fight hard fish pull force lake norman st	Striped Bass Fishery Struggle with hard-bodied fishes Drawing Norman Lake st.
42	gear salmon fishing	Salmon Fishing with Fishing Gears.
42	planning fly fishing trip	Plan your fly-fishing trip.
42	fishing tackle summary	Fishery article summary.
42	annual trout fishing derby set mckinney park department will host annual trout fishing derby	Each year, McKinney Park will organize a trout fishing tournament.
42	wild sport fishing sailfish mutton grouper shark wild sport fishing	Wild Recreational Fishing Shark @-@shark sheep-Blue Mole Wild Recreational Fishing.
42	cressi spear fishing america black snork america black cressi	Throwing harpoon crescents fishing for the apoes; Black America snaps them; Black America is black.
42	tip fishing salmon alaska	Fisheries and Oceans Canada, Department of Fisheries and Oceans.
42	check week water fishing forecast	Check fishing forecasts for the week.
42	good fishing tip finding fish	Fishing advice, find some fish.
42	aquarium fish handbook tropical aquarium fish handbook tropical aquarium fish book discus bree	Aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium, aquarium.
42	wanting fish chesapeake checkout virginia beach fishing charter ad	I would like to take a look at some of the best fishing spots in the world.
42	best worm bait fishing thom conroy helium	Best bait for fishing with thom conroy helium.
42	love fishing fly fishing reel hot seller ebay info	J' loves fly fishing, fly fishing, the salesman on ebay info.
42	apalachicola florida fishing report	Apos fishery report; Apalachicola florida.
42	minnesota walleye ice fishing good morning walleye fishing north eastern minnesota fishing	Minnesota Walleye Ice Fishing Hello North Walleye Fishery-Eastern Minnesota.
42	southwest fly fishing magazine	South-fishing-west magazine.
42	crappie fishing hot percy priest wft newsanyone bass percy priest reall	It's the first time I've heard that I've heard of it, but I don't know if it's true.
42	yell cast jr hartley ad digital era author search fly fishing book dj	Yell cast jr hartley and l' Numerical Age author of fishing fly search DJ.
42	greatest walleye fishing trip canada	Canada's Best Walleye Fishing Trip.
42	fishing piece pmd cycle top bottom fly assortment pale morning dun prolific hatche	Fishery pmapo cycle; light-moment upper-floor flies assorted a prolific hat.
42	top spinning reel inshore salwater fishing	Saltwater inshore fishing begins.
42	bass pro shop rapala pro bass fishing rod peripheral rapala pro bass fishing rod peripheral list	Peripheral list of bass-style fishing rods, pro shop rapala pro bass, on the periphery of rapala pro bass.
42	poway hold youth fishing derby nathan scharn angler will chance test	Poway hold Young anglers at the derby Nathan scharn fisherman will be lucky to be tested.
42	big sport fishing lite android bjd production blog wft newsbig sport fishing	Blog bjd bjd blog production wft newsbig sport fishing.
42	levelled fishing levelled fishing skill level runescape	It is important to keep in mind that there is a high level of fishing activity.
42	game fish seek ferret finding volunteer arizona game fish department offering rare opportuni	Fish-chat is looking for ferrets in the-volunteer fish-hunting service of l'apos; Arizona offers rare fishing opportunities.
42	fishing delaware water gap national recreation area article delaware water gap national recreation	L' article on the National Recreational Area of the Recreational Area of the Recreational Area of the Recreational Area of the Fishing Area of the Delaware.
42	neddesmond posted fishing pic tuesday quiz specie gofishn	Neddesmond posted a picture of fishing on Tuesday's special gofishn quiz.
42	tx fishing news coolfishing day guna fishing	Tx news of cane fishing's fresh-day fishery.
42	grant fishing smile set grant arizona game fish department ki	Giving a smile together Arizona Game Fish Department Ki.
42	carp carp fishing carp fishing usualy involves ultra light rig lb test small tr	Fishing for Carp Carp Carp is usually fished on flat, lightweight, ultra-@-@ forms.
42	fishing ski report detroit free press ice fishing continues heavy snow will travel	Detroit Fishing Ski Report Press freedom on the fishing ice continues to snow heavily.
42	fishing check special closeout item great fly fishing gear buy fishwest check	Fly fishing; help from a special fly-fishing closure scheme.
42	fishing find fly tying material tool cheap ebay info	Fly fishing find material to link cheap tool ebay info on ebay.
42	fish casting bubble bet find	The fishes are throwing bubbles of hope.
42	fly fishing photo essay canada greatest freshwater adventure explore canada greatest fly fishing adventu	Fly Fishing Photo Trial Canada's Greatest Freshwater Adventure Explore Canada's Greatest Fly Fishing Adventure.
42	type fishing rod	Kind of fishing rod.
42	extreme fishing kayak fishing monster fish bluewater jon bluewaterjon bluewater jon schwartz	Extreme kayaking fishing fish monster jon blue water jon blue water jon blue water jon schwartz.
42	choosing fly fishing gear requires patience start	Choosing fly-fishing requires patience.
42	fishing report jetty beach good weather brought handful surf fishe	Fishing Report Beach of the Jetty Weather brought a handful of fish to the surf.
42	good info fishing team winner	It's the first time I've seen it, it's the first time I've seen it.
42	england fishing community current management system broken edf	The Fishing Community Management System; Anxiety, Fishing Community Management System; Anxiety, Fishing Community Anxiety, Fishing Anxiety, Fishing Anxiety, Fishing Anxiety, Fishing Anxiety; Anxiety.
42	caught lb pike flick fishing flickfishing	J' fished for the pike in a film of angling.
42	missouri fly fishing website	Missouri Fly Fishing Site.
42	wanting fish chesapeake checkout virginia beach fishing charter good ad	I'd like to take a look at some of the best fish in the world.
42	mainenance fishing rod preserving rod read	D'apos hand fishing rod; work to preserve the fishing rod.
42	proper fishing tackle catch fish dream	Fish fishing, fishing, fishing, the dream.
42	fishing tackle field stream store hook poking tip barb wine	Catch fish; help fish; fish net; water.
42	fly lt gt fishing lt gt film tour showing providing comfy winter escape	It's a great place to go, and it's a great place to go, and a great place to go.
42	pm pm hosting baited sea fishing contest prize st	PDF hosting the Baited Sea Fishing Contest st.
42	pocketwatch posted ice fishing shack lake tomahawk	The pocket watch showed the Tomahawk Lake ice-fishing cabin.
42	best fly fishing website	Best fly-fishing site.
42	fishing lure bait rig crankbait crankbaits floating lure diving lip bill	Fishing bait bait crankbait floating grankbait bait decoy-plunging hare beak.
42	fishing report jan illinois winter steelhead fishing good driftboaters cop	Fishing report Jan illinois rainbow trout-@-@-arc sky-@-@ drift canoe trolling.
42	session mayo mark people myselfduration pm pmtide started angling fishing	The mayonnaise session mark people me-same duration pm pmtide has also started fishing with the line.
42	florida top freshwater fishing destination	Florida is the main destination for fishing in the fresh water.
42	md striped bass fishing season early	Striped bass season begins at the beginning of the season.
42	cold water aquarium fish water temperature factor consider choosing fish	Temperature factor; water; aquarium; cold water for fish.
42	toyota texas bass classic continue support texas park wildlife department athens toyota texas	Classic Texas Toyota continue to support Texas Wildlife Department Toyota Texas Park.
42	toledo bend report chicken coop providing hot crappie action love bass fishing bu	Toledo fold fold report chickens Coop provide warm action marmot of l' love of drunken bass fishing.
42	gear salmon fishing	Salmon Fishing with Fishing Gears.
42	fishing rapala original floater fishing lure original floating rapala fished fishingkahuna	Original floating hawala fishing original hawala fishing floating kahuna fishing.
42	annual ice fishing extravaganza draw hundred annual jig ice fishing extravaganza held wee	The annual extravaganza fishery yields one hundred pounds of extravaganza fishing on small ice.
42	gallon fish tank rutherfordton gallon fish tank bought year didnt long month	Tank of fish gallon rutherfordton aquarium gallon bought year n' not a long time.
42	caught lb blue marlin flick fishing flickfishing	J' fished for the blue marlin in a film of angling.
42	mainenance fishing rod preserving rod read	D'apos hand fishing rod; work to preserve the fishing rod.
42	patrick asks obama intervene fishing regulation dispute	Patrick has asked Obama to intervene in the fishery-regulation dispute.
42	interesting fishing remains good rest week lt lt	Well, an interesting fishery is still a good week's rest.
42	best deal fishing bait lure ebay best price	Ebay is the best fishing market in the world.
42	fish stock exploited thirty percent fish stock monitored fao depleted	Fish stocks were exploiting a 30% fish stock and monitoring faecal depletion.
42	reading girl guide hunting fishing	Girl Guide Book for the Fishing Hunt.
42	channel cat north american fly fishing forum dual purpose thread figure post	Chemin chat nord-U.S. fly-fishing forum double-goal, double-goal station line.
42	fishin break fishing fish	Fish, broken fish, fish, fish, fish.
42	spartan newsletter spartan fishing team ihsa bass fishing high	Spartan fishing team is a group of fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen, fishermen.
42	platypus dead illegal fishing net animal environment fishing	Ornithorynut dead, illegal netting, wildlife.
42	catchcatfish posted fishing video bait hook shad gofishn	The fish-chat posted the video fishing hook gofishn gofishn bait.
42	steven wright year fishing salvador dali dotted caught fish	The Year of El Salvadoran Fishing.
42	tip fly fishing brook trout stream manual angler ten tip fly	Fly Fishing at Lapos; Brook Trout Manual line fishing at 10-point line.
42	post pet care aquarium fish care basic thing beginner review complete guide tropical aquar	After the care of the pet aquarium fish aquarium basic care thing begin to review tropical guide complete aquar.
42	reel report bass bite best thing going absence fishing graphic today good	It's good to have a good fishing experience, but it's good to have a good fishing experience.
42	fishing live bait	Fishing for live bait.
42	charge fee saltwater fishing license	Fee Requirements Saltwater Fishing Licences are required.
42	fishing relaxing rejuvenating sport fishing relaxing sport solo	Fishing relaxation rejuvenation fishing sport only sport.
42	good set fish stock cleaned ich tank fish today community tank	This is a good example of the kind of fish that has been washed away from the fish.
42	st augustine travel guide florida fishing licence online travel florida usa tour tourism news vacation tip	St Augustine Travel Guide Florida Online Fishing Trip License Florida uses Tour Tour touristiques new vacation tip.
42	update fly fishing tip beginner ultimate guide learn fly fish pro	Update Fly Fishing Advice beginner guidebook learn fish fly pro fish.
42	spinner fishing trout proven system tackle technique strategy catching trout learn	Proven trout-fishing technique in line; wait time The trout-fishing technique is learning.
42	fishing news freshest fishing content delivered directly browser matter web	Fisheries news the latest content of fishing delivered directly to the web of the browser material.
42	pound test bass fishing rod yahoo answer	Fishing rod response; impound test.
42	news photo gallery fly fishing marlboro	Photo Gallery of New Flies Fishing Marlboro.
42	fishing report fishnotes caught bass gofishn	Fishing notes have been taken.
42	best book aquarium owner book best gain knowledge subject fish	This book is the first of its kind in the world to be published in the United States.
42	fly fishing largemouth bass tip manual fly fishing largemouth bass tip lisa gove break st	Fly Fishing Tip of the Spike; Bigmouth Bass Manual Fly Fishing L' Bigmouth Bass L' Bigmouth Bass.
42	tackle buy fishing fishing	Get your own boat.
42	water sport fishing holden beach vacation rental travel holdenbeach	Pêche nautique Holden holiday rental at the beach holden beach beach beach beach beach holden beach.
42	fly box folly north american fly fishing forum ongoing effort achieve system perfection	The Forum on Fly Fishing in North America, a craze for flycrafts, continues to strive for the ultimate perfection of the system.
42	fishing north coast weather steelhead caught	Rainbow trout fishing-@-@ in-sky arc-in-North Coast rainbow caught.
42	catch fish banjo minnow	Fish banjo minnow.
42	south indian river february fishing forecast	Fishery forecasts for February and February in southern India.
42	fish umbra fishhotel aquarium umbra fishhotel award winning modern finned friend mo	This hotel is located in the heart of the old town, in the heart of the city.
42	fish recipe cleaning preparation fillet round fish	Fish recipe, fish round-net cleaning preparation.
42	variety freshwater aquarium fish	Varying fishes; fresh water from the island; aquarium.
42	tbf flw outdooors introduce national high school fishing program national high school fishing program	Tbf flw outdooors introduce the National Fishing Program of l' High School National Fishing Program of l' High School.
43	cnn al wrap hu visit cnn jaime florcruz served time magazine long time bureau	CNN al wrap hu visit CNN Jaime Florcruz has served long desk magazine time.
43	powell hu visit success yep powell suck turncoat	Powell hu visit successful yep powell suck the renegade.
43	hu jintao meet obama china relation today time	Meet Obama China relationship today; time.
43	china praise hu trip fruitful yahoo news	China praises hu trip yahoo-hoo news successful yahoo.
43	chinese president lost translation powerful leader meet expect tran	The Chinese president has lost the powerful translation meet meet wait-you in tran.
43	china half import tax consumer electronics president hu news china will halve	China half tax; e-importing to the general public President and CEO China half as much as China.
43	summit obama praised china reducing tension korea china deal nk shelling	Summit Obama praised the stress-relieving porcelain in South Korea.
43	hu jintao visit fails thaw chinese relation north korea	Visit hu jintao fails to defrost the relationship of China North-Korea.
44	love good upcycle starbucks terrifying trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Love good upcycle Starbucks terrifying glass of trenta containing whole bottle of wine.
44	gross starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	The Starbucks trenta mug has a whole bottle of wine in it.
44	filler starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	The Starbucks trenta fill cup contains a whole bottle of wine.
44	starbucks terrifying trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Terrifying Starbucks cup of trenta contains a whole bottle of wine.
44	starbucks trenta hold entire bottle wine people cougartown	Starbucks trenta contains entire bottles of Cougartown People wine.
44	wine problem solved starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Wine Problem Resolved Starbucks trenta cup containing whole bottle of wine.
44	definitely nuit blanche starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Definitely white night Starbucks trenta cup containing a whole bottle of wine.
44	starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine ounce room spare	The Starbucks trenta mug contains wine bottles.
44	te boozing news starbucks huge trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	L' Starbucks huge cup of trenta contains whole wine.
44	starbucks cup hold entire bottle wine	The Starbucks cup contains a whole bottle of wine.
44	guy starbuck cup size trenta hold entire bottle wine	The Starbuck cup guy trenta cup contains whole bottle of wine.
44	thought sbux couldn fantastic starbucks huge trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Thought sbux could fantastic Starbucks huge cup trenta contain whole bottle of wine.
44	venti trenta starbuck ounce supersize offer crazy fb	Venti trenta starbuck onces super sized offer fb crazy fb.
44	news day starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	News of the day Starbucks trenta cup contains a whole bottle of wine.
44	seriously wonder american overweight starbucks trenta cup unhealthy detail	I seriously wonder if Starbucks American overweight trenta cups of unhealthy details.
44	american wine glass hairpin starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	The Starbucks Trenta cup, made of American wine glass hairpin, contains an entire bottle of wine.
44	bigger beverage bigger american gottlieb memorial hospital loyola university health system	Larger American Drinking Gottlieb Memorial Loyola Hospital University Health System.
44	case needed reason love trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	If you want to have a drink, you should have a drink with a bottle of wine.
44	dangerous starbucks cup hold bottle wine watch	Dangerous Starbucks mug holds wine bottle, watches wine.
44	trenta cup hold entire bottle wine wrong	The whole bottle of wine doesn't fit well in the trenta cup.
44	vooov starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine	Vooov Starbucks trenta cup contains a whole bottle of wine.
44	starbucks trenta cup hold entire bottle wine random starbucks trenta college	Starbucks Trenta Cup contains an entire bottle of random Starbucks trenta College wine.
44	hahaha good news wino starbucks trenta hold bottle	Hahaaha, ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha, ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha
44	starbucks trenta size hold entire bottle wine drink	The size of the starbucks trenta contains a whole bottle of wine.
44	fit entire bottle wine starbucks trenta scary	The whole bottle of spooky Starbucks wine.
44	starbucks trenta size hold entire bottle wine god bless america	Starbucks size trenta contains whole bottle God bless the wine; America.
44	don care starbucks trenta cup bigger stomach	Don't worry, Starbucks trenta cups bigger stomach.
44	tanning iced coffee tazo iced tea hello trenta	Tanned tazo iced coffee, iced tea, hello, trenta.
44	starbucks size trente hold entire bottle wine enjoy	I mean, Starbucks size 30 hold the whole bottle of wine to enjoy.
44	starbucks trenta hold entire bottle wine	Starbucks trenta contains a whole bottle of wine.
44	excess best omg starbucks huge trenta sized drink hold entire bottle wine	It's the best drink in the world and it's the best drink in the world.
45	justin bieber jon stewart body snatching victim video	Justin Bieber Jon Stewart was killed removing the victim's video.
45	fantastic wonderful	Wonderful and fantastic.
45	biebs switch body jon stewart	Biebs is switching bodies with Jon Stewart.
45	justin bieber jon stewart exchange role mtv news quote day	Justin Bieber Jon Stewart exchanges the new day quote role mtv.
46	read goldman sachs manipulated red light photo industry geico ticket higher insurance rate	You'll be able to enjoy a wide range of entertainment, entertainment and entertainment options.
46	legal news study red light camera save life nwindiana	The latest legal news is studying the red light camera to save Nwindiana's life.
46	traffic depot update oceanside green light red light camera ticket traffic	Update of the depot on the edge of the island; ocean, green light, red light, camera ticket.
46	oceanside will install additional red light camera mid march camera helpful hurtful	Oceanside will also install an additional red-light camera in the middle of the walk.
46	traffic depot update study city red light camera fewer fatal accident traffic camera	Updating the depot to study the red city less deadly camera less fatal traffic camera.
46	study red light camera save life	Study the life-saving red-light camera.
46	biggest drop fatal crash involving red light running chandler ariz death dropped	The biggest fatality involving a running red light to Chandler Ariz's death came down.
46	deadly red light camera return va	I'll have a death-light camera back.
46	red light camera save life budget star ledger editorial board star ledger file photored ligh	A red camera saves your life, a budget ledger, a big book from the editorial board, a big book from the stars, a photogenic light.
47	lady army health initiative model fitness nutrition usa today	The Women's Health Initiative (WHI) of the U.S. Army's Model Fitness Nutrition Service was used today.
47	michelle obama coming atlanta bob keefe washington lady michelle obama planning travel	Michelle Obama arrives in Atlanta Bob Keefe Washington Lady Michelle Obama plans a trip.
47	obama praise military healthy initiative lady michelle obama visited army largest training	Obama praises the military initiative; Lady Michelle Obama visited the largest formation of the military.
47	michelle obama coming atlanta lady discus childhood obesity atl	Michelle Obama arrives in Atlanta, California as a recording artist.
47	lady press ahead fitness campaign fort jackson sc obama battling childh	Woman squeezing the Fort Jackson Sc Obama child-fighting fitness campaign.
47	michelle obama coming atlanta	Michelle Obama arrives in Atlanta.
47	michelle obama visit army find whip couch potato shape	Michelle Obama visits the Maple Army to find whipped potato shapes.
47	lady press ahead fitness campaign daily caller obama tell abc good morning america	Women press the daily fitness campaign calling on Obama to say hello to the people of the Americas.
47	michelle obama atlanta move campaign	Michelle Obama d' Atlanta moving campaign.
47	lady obama call move fitness nutrition campaign national	This is what Lady Obama calls a national fitness promotion campaign.
47	uk news lady take campaign childhood obesity army base	A journalist from the UK @-@Uni takes the military base of the campaign against children's obesity.
47	healthy skepticism wal mart healthy push michelle obama partnered wal mart	Healthy skepticism is associated with healthy Michelle Obama growth.
47	lady focus military family childhood nutrition overstatement chi	It's a great way to get a sense of what it's like to live in a military environment.
47	michelle obama coming atlanta washington lady michelle obama planning travel atlanta	Michelle Obama comes to Atlanta Washington, Lady Michelle Obama plans a trip to Atlanta.
47	walmart embrace lady nutrition campaign	Walmart s' engages in a Women's Nutrition Campaign.
47	lady army health initiative model fitness nutrition mimi hall usa today time	L' Women's Health Initiative; Model Army of Fitness and Fitness Mimi Hall used today; time of death; time.
48	three journalist tf detained cairo jan mubarak egypt egipto fb	Three journalists detained in Cairo Jan Mubarak egipto egipto ebgypt fb.
48	update al jazeera english reporting egypt security police arrested al jazeera arabic bureau clief aj journalist cairo	Al-Jazira reports that Egyptian security police have arrested Arabic bureau d&apos reporter ajairo al-Jazira.
48	foreign secretary described intimidation harassment journalist unacceptable egypt	The Egyptian Foreign Affairs Minister described the Egyptian journalist's attitude to harassment and harassment as unacceptable.
48	egypt journalist targeted hilton hotel cairo pro mubarak supporter led army rio	Targeted Egyptian journalist, Hilton Hotel Cairo pro Mubarak supporter, run by the Rio Army.
48	list journalist attacked egypt	The journalist on the list, he attacked the apos; Egypt.
48	attack journalist escalate egypt	Scaling up of the Apos; Egypt.
48	yikes list journalist attacked egypt hour abc news	Yikes list attacked Egyptian Hour Press Abc News.
48	nut war medium continues al jazeera journalist arrested cairo camera equipment seized egypt jan aljazeera	The journalist d' Al-Jazira has stopped Cairo's seized camera equipment in Egypt.
48	guardian journalist arrested beaten egypt	Journalist arrested Egypt beaten.
48	day bloody clash egypt foreign journalist arrested	D'apos Day, bloody foreign Egyptian journalist arrested.
48	alarabiya crew attacked pro mubarak protester cairo egypt	Alarabiya attacked Egypt's pro-Mubarak protester.
48	thing rapidly degenerating egypt attack journalist cairo egypt	What quickly degenerates is the Egyptian journalist's attack on Cairo, Egypt.
48	journalist harassed attacked detained cairo nigh cnn ben wedema	He's a stalker who's been held in detention in Cairo, near cnnnn ben wedema.
48	al jazeera english journalist released detained equipment held	He also said that he wanted to be able to take part in the debate.
48	reporter including cnn cooper beaten egypt manila bulletin newspaper online	CNN Cooper beat Egyptian online newspaper Manila.
48	ap journalist attacked mob detained cairo damn liberal medium front line history	Reporter ap attacked mafia detained cairo-fucking liberal media from l' front-line story.
48	list journalist hurt harassed egypt	Hurled the apos; Egypt harassed.
48	egypt crack foreign journalist guardian jan	Foreign journalist's caretaker Jan.
48	horrible journalist attacked detained egypt yahoo news	L' horrible journalist has attacked the apos; Egyptian news yahoo detained.
48	journalist beaten threatened egypt	Beat-up journalist threatens apos; Egypt to death.
48	ahmed mansour prominent journalist beaten arrested egypt aljazeera jan	Ahmed Mansour, eminent journalist, beaten, arrested Egypt Aljazeera Jan.
48	ki medium journalist egypt targeted beaten detained mubarak support	Middle-Ki journalists targeted Egyptian battered support detained Mubarak.
48	attack journalist send message lt gt cnbc twitter lt gt	It's a good idea to send a message to the editor.
48	reporter attacked attack journalist send message	A journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; sent a message to Apos; help from Apos; a message.
48	security news medium fire egypt	Egyptian Fire Safety News.
48	reporting arrest journalist cairo	Arrested in Cairo.
48	journalist attacked cairo journalist covering scene ground target	A journalist assaulted a Cairo journalist who was taking targets on the ground.
48	condemns attack journalist egypt ap ap white house spokesman robert gibbs systematic	Condemns Egyptian attacker Robert Gibbs-White House spokesman.
48	reporter egypt broad assault	The Egyptian reporter's launched a full-scale assault.
48	mt committee protect journalist rpts st journo die covering egypt jan	Egyptian journalists are occupied by the Committee for the Protection of Journalists.
48	journalist targeted pro mubarak force egypt video	The reporter targeted the video of Mubarak's force in Egypt.
48	egypt turn internet long broadcast violence strongarms journalist leave	Egypte Internet tour long duration of diffusion of the violence; journalists from the D' handguns leave.
48	mte time cpj journalist targeted egypt	Egypt was the target of the newsmagazine.
48	network anchor leave egypta amid crackdown increased violence intimidation directed journalist	L&apos, the channel's host, is leaving Egypt in a context of increased repression of intimidating journalists.
48	journalist beaten website blocked amid protest egypt cpj	Journalist bat site blocked in the midst of Egyptian cpjj protest.
48	egyptian army start rounding journalist jpost	L&apos, the Egyptian army, began to gather the journalist Jpost.
48	canadian journalist detained harassed foreign journalist targeted cairo	Canadian journalist detained, foreign journalist harassed, targeted cairo.
48	cpj egypt instigates medium blackout police target journalist	Cpj egypt causes the police target's average blackout.
48	egyptian army start rounding journalist egyptian military rounded journalist thursday	L&apos, the Egyptian army, began to gather the Egyptian military journalists together on Thursday.
48	ynet egypt police target reporter israel	Ynet egypt font israel israel.com.
48	egyptian demonstrator attack journalist cnn will madness	The Egyptian journalist at the airport, who had been attacked by a protester, is about to go crazy.
48	risk taker mike cairo january afp egypt police arrest al jazeera english journalist channel	Risk taking Egyptian police Cairo January afp Egyptian arrest al Jazeera English TV journalist al Jazeera.
48	list journalist threatened attacked detained reporting egypt	The reporter on the list threatened to kill prisoners in Egypt.
48	gang hunt journalist right worker egypt nytimes jatkhs	Gang-hunting journalist, right-wing egypt-jatkhs sometimes jatkhs.
48	french journalist arrested cairo	Cairo was arrested by the French journalist.
48	skipped romanian crew journalist threatened attacked detained reporting egypt	A journalist from the Romanian crew has dropped, threatening to assault a detainee who is bringing home the apo; Egypt.
48	egypt protest gauntlet officer beating stick	An Egyptian officer batting a stick protesting gantelet.
48	journalist attacked detained egypt big hollywood	The reporter just attacked the fat Hollywood man being held in Egypt.
48	happy changed headline egyptian protester attack foreign journalist prejudicial	Egyptian protester attacks damaging foreign journalist.
48	engel today egyptian unrest continues journalist targeted egypt jan	It's the first time I've heard of the Egyptians, and it's the first time I've heard of them.
48	journalist van trouw mishandeld ro nieuws	I'm a journalist, and I'm a journalist.
48	egyptian journalist dy gunshot wound egyptian reporter shot clash week ago died	The Egyptian journalist DY GSW The Egyptian journalist who was shot and killed died a week ago.
48	journalist egypt brutally silenced equipment confiscated freedom press	The Egyptian journalists brutally silenced the equipment that had been confiscated from the free press.
48	egyptian army start rounding journalist egypt jan medium journalist	L&apos, the Egyptian army, began to arrest the Egyptian journalist Jan, an average journalist.
48	guardian journalist arrested beaten alongside protester egypt secretly record ordeal	Beaten by an Egyptian protester secretly taping the proof.
48	al jazeera journalist detained cairo police hotel room equipment confiscated jan	Jazeera was detained in Cairo, and the equipment of the hotel was confiscated Jan.
48	cbc news foreign journalist attacked egypt	Foreign journalists from the CBC attacked L'apos; Egypt.
48	american journalist bloodied detained egyptian force dozen foreign journalist egypt attac	Bloody American journalist detained by Egyptian forces dozens of Egyptian foreign journalists attacked.
48	egyptian army start rounding journalist	L' army of the Egyptians starts to gather the journalists.
48	foreign policy day hunting journalist ashraf khalil	On foreign-policy day, journalist Ashraf Khalil is hunting.
48	yikes egyptian army start rounding journalist	L&apos, the Egyptian army, began to arrest journalists.
48	journalist attacked detained egypt rtdna condemns assault	The journalist attacked the Egyptian detainee, Rtdna, who had been held in prison, condemning the attack.
48	breaking al jazeera journalist arrested cairo egypt crowd grows tahrir	It's the first time in the history of the world that you've had a good time.
48	al jazeera english journalist freed cairo state dep asked release egypt jan	Al Jazeera, a British journalist who was released from Cairo, has called for Jan Egyptians to be released.
48	desperate gasp dying regime list journalist detained beaten egypt	The desperate list of the dying prison-afflicted journalist in Egypt.
48	amazing guardian journalist record audio arrest transport egypt police van jan	An unbelievable journalist and security guard recorded the video; arresting the transport of the Egyptian police.
48	list journalist beaten jailed missing	List of beaten journalists who have been imprisoned.
48	extraordinary stuff arrested beaten egypt police	Extraordinary thing has been stopped and it's beaten the Egyptian police.
48	abc news compiled list journalist threatened attacked detained egypt	The list of journalists at risk from the attack on the Apostles, Egypt, has been compiled.
48	bloodied beaten bbc journalist camera report going hospital egypt democracynow	A battered and bloody BBC reporter's video camera announces that the Egyptian hospital is now a democracy.
48	wash post tweet cairo bureau chief photographer reportedly arrested egypt	It is alleged that the chief photographer of the office in Cairo stopped l'apos; Egypt.
48	mubarak silencing voice egypt journalist targeted read jan tahrir	Mubarak silent voice Egyptian targeted journalist read Jan tahrir Jan tahrir.
48	egyptian military rounding journalist egypt pm issue apology star egypt live blog jan	L' Egyptian army round up Egyptian journalist pm d' blogger apologies live Egyptian star Jan.
48	reporter attacked attack journalist send message	A journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; attacked journalist from Apos; sent a message to Apos; help from Apos; a message.
48	hillary clinton egypt state hillary clinton treatment journalist coveri	Hillary Clinton in Egypt Hillary Clinton's treatment of covert journalist.
48	clinton bugun misir hk nededi secretary clinton condemns attack demonstrator journalist egypt vide jan	In the meantime, the blogosphere is being used as a source of news and information for the blogosphere.
48	fox news correspondent beaten hospitalized fleeing molotov cocktail egypt video treated spy military	Correspondent of hospitalized Fox News fleeing the Egyptian Molotov video called military espionage.
48	journalist return central cairo threat remain	The threat from the reporter back in Cairo is still central.
48	catalan tv team foreign journalist detained military police cairo	He is also a member of the International Federation of Journalists (IFPI) and the International Federation of Journalists.
48	pro mubarak rioter chase reporter cairo hotel beaten threatened beheading	Pro Mubarak Rioter Chase cairo reporter battered hotel is threatening beheading.
49	espn nba celtic kendrick perkins knee surgery will season debut tuesday cavalier celtic	The first Celtic cavalry season will be the Celtic Celtic Perkins Celtic Kendrick Perkins knee surgery.
49	sending prayer marquis daniel boston celtic pray going okxo	Send Marquis prayers Daniel Boston Celtic praying okxo.
49	ainge team month nba trade deadline celtic president basketball	One month; NBA deadline; exchange Celtic president basketball-ball.
49	videotwitter net boston celtic kendrick perkins play cleveland cavalier kendrick perkins coming	Video producer Boston Celtic Kendrick Perkins playing Cleveland rider Kendrick Perkins come on.
49	uploaded youtube video nba final lakers celtic game memory highlig	J' put online youtube video nba final highlig lakers celtic game memory.
49	tceltics davis leaf game sun sore hamstring boston celtic nbanewsfeed	Tceltics advice foliage soothing sun play boston bamstring celtic nbanewsfeed.
49	celtic marquis daniel leaf game stretcher	The Celtic marquis, Daniel Buttercup, on a stretcher.
49	boston celtic kendrick perkins play cleveland cavalier ad	Boston Celtic Kendrick Perkins plays Cleveland Cavalier Adventure.
49	boston celtic jermaine neal arthroscopic knee surgery recovery period week espn nba	Boston neo-arthroscopic neo-jerry surgery knee recovery period spn nba week.
49	doc river ll wait chris forsberg boston celtic captain paul pierce departed thursday	"""Doc River II is waiting for Chris Boston Celtic,"" Captain Paul Pierce left on Thursday."
50	half men charlie sheen lost teeth	Half the men, Charlie Sheen, lost teeth.
50	exclusive charlie sheen doesn rehab charlie sheen refusing enter reh	Charlie Sheen does not re-educate Charlie Sheen, who refuses to go back to school.
50	television network cbs write episode half men include charlie sheen	TV cbs write mi episode-men include sheen charlie.
50	drug rehab work charlie sheen reportedly receiving help clearest benefit pat	Charlie Sheen's rehab work would've been helped.
50	porn star kacey jordan wild charlie sheen party scene ve destructive	Kacey porn star Jordan Wild Charlie Sheen Scene party.
50	charlie sheen leaf hospital medical emergency	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
50	charlie sheen leaf hospital medical emergency	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
50	charlie sheen rehabs filed charlie sheen nurse	Charlie Sheen dropped off Charlie Sheen Nursing.
50	teamfollowback charlie sheen rehab tv hold los angeles reuters half aday	The team follows Charlie Sheen Rehab on TV and holds Los Angeles Reuters at mi-time.
50	charlie sheen leaf hospital medical emergency	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
50	charlie sheen abuse	I think Charlie Sheen's pushing it.
50	charlie sheen abuse	I think Charlie Sheen's pushing it.
50	dtn hollywood charlie sheen troubled timeline charlie sheen trouble pretty alw	Charlie Sheen troubled in time Charlie troubled in time.
50	whatproblem charlie sheen enter rehab cbs halt production hit series	Oh, what a problem Charlie Sheen getting into rehab cbs stopping the production series of production successes.
50	hollywood charlie sheen men team help biggest star	Hollywood Charlie Sheen helps the biggest star.
50	sky news charlie sheen enters rehab hospital well	This is the first time Charlie Sheen has ever been in a rehab hospital.
50	charlie rating soar big bonus short rehab	L' Charlie's evaluation is driving up the rehab bonus.
51	death rock roll sunday farmer market sunday farmer market crisis bu	Death rock roll on Sunday Farm Market on Sunday Farm Market on Sunday Farm Market Drunk Market Crisis.
51	molto vega farmer market shut county	The Molto Vega Farmers Market has closed the county.
51	love farmer market long beach	J' loves the long farm market beach.
52	djokovic murray australian open title ap	Opening title:Djokovic Murray Australia.
52	murray congratulation djokovic winning men australianopen championship nice work going bed	Murray jjokovic winning australianopen championship men's jokovic beautiful work go to bed.
52	yr russian won australian open	Your Russian wins the Open D' Australia.
52	djokovic murray australian open final interesting match novak	This is the last game of the game and the last game of the game.
52	long awaited era djokovic australianopen replay	L' Australian jokovic long-awaited open replay Australian open replay era.
52	murray miss open title	Murray's still missing the open title.
52	novak djokovic win australian open well deserved played amazing couldn help feel andy murray	Novak djokovic Australian open-played surprisingly well-deserved Novak djokovic might help you feel Andy Murray.
52	djokovic murray australian open title ap	Opening title:Djokovic Murray Australia.
52	tennis star hoping third time lucky scottish tennis star andy murray set break duck grand	Tennis star Andy Murray is hoping that the third time, Scottish tennis star Andy Murray has staged the big duck break.
52	don djokovic pleb tennis equivalent bum fucking murray moment australianopen	Don djokovic pleb tennis is like a bum-fucking-murray australianopen.
52	win djokovic won australian open	Winning the Australian Open Jokovic Championship.
52	holy ball bloody omg novak djokovic australian open	D&apos name; a saint name; d&apos name; an Australian open djokovic novak.
52	yeahboy nadal australianopen djokovic murray	Yup, yup, yup, yup, yup.
52	djokovic murray australian open ap	Djokovic Murray from Australia.
52	murray djokovic happened	Murray Djokovic s&apos is produced.
52	novak australian open champion	Australian Champion of D' opening day Novak.
52	murray play final pressure	Murray play the final pressure.
52	game set match novak djokovic grand slam defend	Game set novak djokovic great slam defend.
52	watch australian open men tennis final live online will history andy murray	Watching the online open Australian men's tennis finals live will be l' story Andy Murray.
52	congratulation novak djokovic winning australian open tennis final melbourne played fantastic game	Congratulations novak djokovic Australian Open Final Melbourne played a fantastic game.
52	open golf djokovic murray australian open title cbc	Open djokovic golf murray Australian title open cbc.
52	mouratoglou murray djokovic classic yahoo	Classic yahoo yahoo yahoo murray djokovic mortatoglou.
52	australian open final novak djokovic andy murray live blog bleacher report contributor scott	Australian open novak final djokovic Andy Murray live blog blacher blog contributor report Scott.
52	andy murray australian open final will face djokovic atptennis yeg	Andy Murray Australian Open Final will face atptennis yeg djokovic.
52	andy murray loses australian open final tennis ausopen	Murray lost the Australian Open Tennis Final.
52	tennis murray set djokovic final andy murray battle reach australian open men single	Tennis Murray set djokovic final Andy Murray battle to reach the Australian men's unmarried and open Australian men.
52	murray mania sweep uk good luck message flood andy murray scottish tennis star play	Murray Mania sweeps uk message of good luck flood Andy Murray Scot Scottish game of tennis star.
52	djokovic british hope fading usual sorus murray	Jokovic l' l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos, l&apos.
52	djokovic thrash murray win australian open	Djokovic Thrash Murray wins the race in Australia.
52	australian open grand slam final live djokovic win rmang	Australian Open Grand Slam final live djokovic will win rmang rmang.
52	tennis murray crushed djokovic awesomeness murray clinch st break point hope alive	Murray Tennis Crushed djokovic Awesomeness Murray clinch St break hope point alive.
52	congrats novak djokovic played brilliant tennis definitely deserve title	Congratulations novak djokovic playing Brilliant Tennis certainly deserves the title.
52	dreamed men ship game ausopen murray djokovic great showdown	Ausopen Murray Djokovic, the dream man game, went through a great ordeal of strength.
52	djokovic win second set leading stage murray mum shell shocked	Djokovic wins second plateau murray Mum Shell shocked.
52	novak djokovic champion australian open	Novak Djokovic Australian Champion is open.
52	novak won australian open champion gotta beat champion	And Novak won the Australian Open Champion Must Beat the Champion.
52	murray djokovic battle fill vacuum	The Battle of Murray Djokovic has filled the void.
52	djokovic longer slam wonder novak djokovic enjoyed crushing australian open final triumph andy murray	Djokovic longer novak djokovic novak wonder slam enjoyed the final Australian open triumph overwhelming Andy Murray.
52	australian open men final andy murray novak djokovic	Australian Open Men's Final Andy Murray Novak djokovic.
52	tomorrow australian open tennis final men andy murray navok djojovic ganna win murray fan murray	Tomorrow Australian men's tennis opening final and Murray Navok djojovic ganna winning men's tennis Murray fan murray.
53	love khloe kardashian	J&apos loves Khloe Kardashian.
53	hate kim kardashian snookie funny	I hate funny snookie kim kardashian.
53	keeping wit kardashians mystery hollywood dead	Keeping the spirit of Kardashians... a Hollywood mystery dead.
53	ohhh kardashians will fav stupid	Ohhhh Kardashians is going to favor stupid.
53	eye will definetely glued tv screen love kardashians	L' eye permanently glued to the TV screen, loves kardashians kardashians.
53	going watch keeping kardashians love	Watch the kardashian like kardashian.
53	kardashian family	Kardashian family.
53	wished looked lucy hale kourtney kardashian pretty	I wish Lucy Hale Kourtney Kardashian was pretty.
53	kardashian love yu sooooo	Kardashian t&apos loves so much.
53	shoutout lmao kim kardashian real live slut	"Yell ""lmao kim kardashian kim kardashian bitch"" live."
53	love kardashians	J&apos loves kardashian.
53	sunday episode kktny crazy	This Sunday, it's crazy kktny.
53	kardashians suicide bomb fuck outta shit hate entire internet	Kamikaze kamikaze kamikaze kardashians.
53	doesn kim kardashian	Is-what is the name Kim Kardashian kim kardashian.
53	keeping kardashians family love	To keep the apos; love of the Kardashians family.
53	fave kardashian phillyblack fuckin hate khloe kardashian	F Faith phillyblack fucking khloe kardashian kardashian khloe.
53	love kim kardashian ur hot wooohoooo lol	J' love hot woooooo lol kim kardashian.
53	kardashians pier morgan stupid answer question perfect	Kardashians Pier Morgan stupid perfect question.
53	bruce will fave kardashian lol	Bruce avoids Kardashian Lol.
53	dont imma kourtney kim khloe fave interested	Kourtney khloe khloe khloe that interests me.
53	kinda wished lived life kim kardashian	J&apos. would have preferred Kim Kardashian to live her life.
53	watching material keeping kardashians lol love	Watching the hardware keep lol kardashians love.
53	hey kris big fan watch kardashian lot love day	Hey Kris big fan watch kardashian lot-love day of l' love.
53	lovee thee kardashians lt hehe seasonn nee episode righhht noww watch watch watch lt	It's the first time I've seen this episode, and it's the first time I've seen it.
53	kardashian love mami	Kardashian loves mami.
53	love kardashian doll fave doll khloe gt	J' loves kardashian and Khloe Gt dolls.
53	loved larry good pier thought kardashians bimbo type fun loving great kudos	J' liked Larry Pier thought bimbo kardashians bardashians fun type liking big kudos.
53	love kardashian	J&apos loves Kardashian.
53	love kourtney kardashian	J&apos loves Kourtney Kardashian.
53	watching kourtney kim khloe loving waiting forever	Watching kourtney kim khloe khloe khloe like to wait forever.
53	kim kardashian fine piece bubble butted sweetness love stuck	Kim Kardashian beautiful bubble piece butted sweet gentleness stuck.
53	joined totally loving khloe kardashian	J' have joined the khloe kardashian, totally in love with J&apos.
53	ahh kardashians craziest family television	Ahh Kardashians Family Television, the craziest.
53	doesn watch kardashians	It doesn't look at the Kardashians.
53	watching keeping kardashins lol	Watch keep Kardashins Lol.
53	khloe kardashian loved reality star social medium top three month	And Khloe Kardashian loved the reality star, the top three-month social medium.
53	love khloe alexandra kardashian biggest fan kuwait will meet	The biggest kuwait fan Khloe Alexandra kardashian will meet Khloe Alexandra kardashian.
53	waiting kktn tonight love kardashians	Waiting for this evening's kardashians love kardashians.
53	crystal clear kim kardashian single fucking idiot	Kim Kardashian, a fucking idiot, one-time-only, crystal-clear, crystal-clear idiot.
53	love reali kardashian saludos mexico	J' loves the real Mexican kardashian saludos.
53	prob love	There's another already, and there's still another.
53	favorite kardashian love khloe	The favorite Khloe Love Khloe kardashian.
53	kardashians episode good	It's a good game, it's a good game.
54	head mossad week ago stuxnet set iranian nuke plan decade fox news iran nuke yr	A week ago, Stuxnet put in place an Iranian nuclear plan for Iran nuke yr.
54	citing option iran reject uranium deal diplomat nytimes	The Iranian diplomat, quoting the Iranian option, rejects the text; agreement on uranium.
54	iran year nuclear weapon iranelection	L' Iranelection in Iran; Nuclear Weapons of the Iranian Year.
54	mi head iran sanction nuke program technical expertise create mat	It's the first nuclear program in the world, and it's the first nuclear program in the world.
54	future iran nuclear talk ahmadinejad afp afp iran president mahmoud ahmadinejad	The future Iranian President Ahmadinejad afp afp afp Iran speaks Iranian nuclear mahmoud Ahmadinejad.
54	idf intelligence chief iran nuclear bomb year haaretz	Iran's Chief of Intelligence, the haaretz of the Year of the Nuclear Bomb.
55	option credit card debt consolidation loan	Loan d' Credit Card Debt Consolidation Option.
55	credit card debt bankruptcy alternative legally settle bad credit card debt great economic crisis	L' alternative of bankruptcy of the debt of the credit card legally settle the bad debt of the credit card great economic crisis.
55	credit card debt consolidation debt settlement option credit card debt consolidation debt sett	Credit Card Debt Consolidation Debt Settlement Option Credit Card Debt Consolidation Credit Card Debt Consolidation Composition.
55	help consolidation consumer debt ehow	The Government of Canada is committed to ensuring that Canadians have access to the services they need.
55	post debt consolidation debt consolidation	The Government of Canada's debt-to-GDP ratio is expected to decline in the coming years.
55	lower credit card debt	Decrease in credit-card debt.
55	suffering bad credit history bad credit debt consolidation loan pay debt	Bad credit file Bad consolidation credit Debt consolidation credit.
55	debt settlement lawyer debt settlement easier lawyer day debt settlement beco	Debt Settlement Advocate Debt Settlement Easier Advocate Debt Settlement Day because they settle debt because.
55	debt consolidation help avoid bankruptcy debt consolidation involves single loan	Debt Consolidation Helps Avoid Bankruptcy Debt consolidation also involves a one-time loan.
55	offbeat idea eliminate credit card debt month offbeat idea eliminate credit card	It's a good idea to get rid of the credit card debt; the idea of a month's credit eliminates the need for a credit card.
55	credit card debt consolidation gt credit card studentloans info conso	Debt Consolidation by Credit Card gt Student Loans information conso conso.
55	credit card debt relief program avoid bankruptcy settle debt day reliable	Debt Reduction and Repayment Program; Credit Card Debt Reduction and Repayment Program Avoid Bankruptcy Debt Repayment Day.
55	debt settlement program ftc law debt settlement better article learn	Debt Settlement Program FTC Debt Settlement Act Better Learn article.
55	personal loan debt consolidation	Consolidation of Personal Loan Debts.
55	swift debt relief valuable tip debt consolidation consider	Debt relief is provided on a fast-track basis to ensure that the debt consolidation takes into account the debt situation.
55	secured unsecured debt consolidation loan settle credit card debt cost debt consolidation	Unsecured Guaranteed Debt Consolidation Loan (Unsecured Guaranteed Debt Consolidation Loan) to settle debt consolidation related to credit card charges.
55	debt consolidation augment debt problem finance money	Debt consolidation increases the debt-financing problem.
56	great win packer christina land blunder	Christina Land, the big winner, made a mistake.
56	christina aguilera bungle national anthem three thing singing nationa	Christina aguilera bungle bungle national anthem three things singing singing nationa.
56	christina aguilera forgets national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera has forgotten the Super Bowl national anthem.
56	christina aguilera fluff american national anthem super bowl xlv	Christina Aguilera American fluff, national hymn super bowl xlv.
56	christina aguilera wrong lyric usa national anthem superbowl	Christina Aguilera misquoted her lyrics and used them as a national superbowl superbowl song.
56	ifwt video christina aguilera mess national anthem superbowl	If the video Christina Aguilera will spoil the album?
56	endsmeat christina aguilera mess lyric national anthem super bowl	End of the Meat Christina aguilera lyrical mess national hymn super bowl.
56	christina aguilera fumble national anthem lyric super bowl tonight super bowl xlv kickoff christina	Christina Aguilera fumble national lyrical hymn super bowl tonight Christina christina launch super bowl xlv.
56	twitter explodes christina aguilera mess national anthem super bowl	Twitter Blows Christina Aguilera Mess National Anthem Super Bowl.
56	christina aguilera botched national anthem superbowl notice	"Christina Aguilera has botched the ""Superbowl"" national anthem."
56	super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem espn	I'm sorry, but I don't think it's a good idea.
56	aguilera flub national anthem christina aguileraflubbed belt	Aguilera flub hymn national christina flub aguileraflubbed belt.
56	today talker aguilera botch star spangled banner clip survey colt	It's a good idea to have a lot of fun, but it's a lot of fun to do.
56	christina aguilera fluff national anthem	Christina Aguilera mimics the National Anthem.
56	full video super bowl national anthem singer christina aguilera fail imalive	L&apos singer; national Super Bowl anthem, Christina Aguilera, failed imalive.
56	local christina aguilera fumble national anthem christina aguilera flubbed belted	Christina Aguilera Local Fumble National Anthem Christina aguilera flubted belt.
56	artsbeat christina aguilera flub national anthem nytimes share friend art classical musi	Artbeat Christina Aguilera flub hymn national nytimes share classical classical art classic musi musi.
56	conan blast christina super bowl anthem blunder time	Christina blowing out the cones of Super Bowl hymn blunder time.
56	watch christina aguilera screw national anthem super bowl	Watching Christina Aguilera fuck her way through the Super Bowl national anthem.
56	christina aguilera national anthem super bowl flub happen york daily news fox	Christina Aguilera National Anthem Super Bowl flub is playing York Daily Fox Fox Journal.
56	usa national anthem hard song sing	The song is written in the national anthem, and the song is written in the national anthem.
56	feel super bowl national anthem fail christina aguilera lion den university	Feeling national super bowl hymn fail Christina will aguil lion the university.
56	check video christina aguilera super bowl national anthem mistake mess err	Watch the video of Christina Aguilera Super Bowl error of l' national anthem.
56	christina aguilera flub star spangled banner lyric super bowl sport	Christina aguilera celebrity flub spangled singer-songwriter Super Bowl sports banner.
56	watch christina agulilera botch national anthem super bowl michael mccarthy usa today heard	Watching Christina Agulilera Botch National Super Bowl Song Michael McCarthy was heard today.
56	perez hilton christina aguilera mess lyric national anthem super bowl ooop hitechcj	Perez Hilton Christina Aguilera lyrical super bowl super bowl ooop hitechcj.
56	christina aguilera mangle national anthem super bowl xlv superbowlxlv fb	Christina Aguilera mangle hymne national super bowl xlv superbowlxlv fb.
56	christina aguilera flub national anthem singing er rampart watched gallant	Christina Aguilera national anthem flub singing her rampart looked gallant.
56	haha christina aguilera spelled bad sing fucked national anthem super bowl lol	Ha ha christina aguilera spelled bad singing fucked super bowl super bowl national hymn.
56	christina aguilera destroys national anthem superbowl	Christina Aguilera destroys the superbowl national anthem.
56	packer win super bowl christina aguilera national anthem wrong news sky xy	Packer win Super Bowl Christina Aguilera national bad news xy xy national anthem.
56	aguilera fluff super bowl anthem	L' hymn of super bowl; aguilera fluff.
56	social medium blast christina aguilera national anthem super bowl flub day social medium	Social means breath Christina aguilera national hymn Super Bowl flub social media day.
56	christina aguilera mess national anthem start super bowl xlv	Christina Aguilera national hymn mess start Super Bowl Xlvv.
56	christina aguilera mangle star spangled banner super bowl abc news sb	Christina Aguilera mangle star spangled Super Bowl banner abc news sb.
56	airhead christina aguilera screw national anthem super bowl xlv tcot tlot	It's a great game, it's a great game, it's a great game, it's a great game.
56	heard christina aguilera flubbed superbowl national anthem night	Christina will aguilera flirted with the night of l'apos; national superbowl anthem.
56	christina aguilera national anthem politicsthe votechristina aguilera national anthem flubbed itth	Christina Aguilera national political anthem l' national votechristina aguilera flub it flub it.
56	super bowl national anthem singer christina aguilera fail video	L&apos singer; national Super Bowl anthem, Christina Aguilera, failed to make the video.
56	christina aguilera explains super bowl national anthem flub	Christina Aguilera explains the flub of the Super Bowl National Anthem.
56	bronco christina aguilera flub national anthem kmgh denver	Bronco christina aguilera national kmgh denver hymn flub.
56	aguilera flub national anthem christina aguilera flubbed belted natio nfl steelers	Aguilera fluba national anthem Christina aguilera flubera natio nf steelers belt.
56	super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem	The Super Bowl Xlv, starring Christina Aguilera, repeats the lyrics of the anthem.
56	funny happened aguilera repeat national anthem yahoo news	It's the first time you've heard the song of yahoo news.
56	rocking christina aguilera explains national anthem flub christina aguilera well aware	The christina aguilera rocking explains the apos; flub christina national anthem will aguilera well know.
56	christina aguilera flub national anthem singing er rampart watched gallantly	Christina aguilera flub flub hymn national song er rampart watched gallantly.
56	case missed christina aguilera butchered national anthem	It's the first time I've ever heard of a case that's gone bad.
56	christina aguilera explains national anthem flub movie tv caught	It's the first time I've seen it, and it's the last time I've seen it.
56	christina aguilera mess national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera ruined the Super Bowl of the national anthem.
56	christina aguilera screw national anthem	Christina Aguilera is a French singer and songwriter.
56	video christina aguilera sings national anthem loud super bowl xlv post sbnation	Video Christine Aguilera sings l' national anthem post sbnation.
56	dtn hollywood christina aguilera apologises national anthem flub feedburner share friend	"Dtn Hollywood Christina Aguilera apologizes to the ""Friend of the Apos""; the program Flub Feedburner de l'apos; national anthem."
56	defglam christina aguilera apologizes screwing national anthem	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I didn't get it.
56	christina aguilera defends fumbling national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera has defended the Super Bowl of l' national anthem.
56	christina aguilera defends fumbling national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera has defended the Super Bowl of l' national anthem.
56	klassy breeze music blog black eyed aguilera love	Klassy breeze music blogblack eyes aguilera love.
56	gossip christina fumble lyric national anthem fail christina agu	Christina Fumble gossip, lyrical national anthem, failed Christina agu christina.
56	post christina aguileras national anthem apology slammed taylor hick christina aguileras nation	After Christina Aguileras, the Apostle's apologies, the national anthem, hit Taylor Hick Christina Aguileras nation.
56	opinion christina sounded amazing super bowl america making big deal	The American Super Bowl sounded great when Christina d&apos made a big fuss.
56	christina aguilera apologize flubbing national anthem	It's the first time I've ever heard of it, and it's the first time I've ever seen it.
56	sport super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem christina aguilera smokinsession	The game is a great game and the game is a great game to play.
56	honor epic fail national anthem top ten list time worst	Honoring the Apos; Epic National Anthem Failure Top 10 Worst Times List.
56	celebrity butchering national anthem digg christina aguilera flawlessly sung national anthem	A celebrity slaughtering the Apos; the national anthem of digg christina aguilera sang the lyrics of the Apos; the national anthem.
56	super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem christina aguilera flubbed nfl	Nieuwe blijk niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet niet.
56	christina aguilera great job national anthem	Christina Aguilera excellent work hymn national.
56	christina aguilera screwed forgot national anthem american event deporther fail fb	Christina Aguilera forgot the U.S. national deporther event fb.
56	christina aguilera messed national anthem super bowl xlv dep	Christina Aguilera has screwed up the Super Bowl of the Super Bowl.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem ap ap christina aguilera flubbed hawaii alohatone	Aguilera repeats the words of the national anthem ap christina aguilera flubled hawaii alohatone.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem	L' aguilera, repeats the apos; national anthem.
56	christina aguilera flubbed national anthem lost moment bw	It's the first time I've ever heard of a song by a woman.
56	watch christina aguilera screw national anthem super bowl post	Watching Christina Aguilera fuck her own Super Bowl Post song.
56	christina aguilera screw national anthem super bowl xlv judge	Christina Aguilera screws the super bowl national anthem xlv judge.
56	christina fail ulera ear bleed time hear sing fucking national anthem forshame	Christina E escaped bleeding ear while hearing singing fucking d*apos; national hymn of shame.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem ap	L'Asociación de la Comunidad de la Comunidad de Derechos.
56	knew national anthem messed lol sang christina aguilera sang	He knew that I*apos; national anthem sali lol singing Christina aguilera singing Christina singing.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem supposed sing er rampart	Aguilera rehearse the apostles, the national anthem, which is supposed to sing the rampart.
56	kold aguilera repeat national anthem	Kold aguilera repeats the lyrics of the lyrics.
56	christina aguilera fumble national anthem christina aguilera flubbed belted nat	Christina aguilera fumble bursting national anthem Christina aguilera flubbed natbed belted nat.
56	christina aguilera ruin national anthem super bowl xlv beyonce band escort nf	Christina Aguilera ruined the national anthem Super Bowl escort band.
56	christina aguilera apologizes messing national anthem christina aguilera suffered publ	It's a great pleasure to be here, but it's a great pleasure to be here.
56	latest christina aguilera botch national anthem super bowl kickoff	This is the last Christina Aguilera Super Bowl Super Bowl song to be released.
56	christina aguilera muffed lyric national anthem	Christina Aguilera has stifled the apostles, the lyrical national anthem.
56	topix super bowl football gree jpg christina aguilera flubbed belted	Topix Super Bowl jpg christina jpg football aguilera belt flubted flub.
56	poll christina aguilera botch national anthem super bowl	Get a feel for Christina Aguilera's super bowl.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem ap ap christina aguilera flubbed belted	Aguilera repeats the apostle; the national anthem ap christina aguilera, with a belt.
56	super bowl xlv christina aguilera repeat national anthem espn	I'm sorry, but I don't think it's a good idea.
56	christina aguilera mess star spangled banner super bowl dumb bitch	Christina Aguilera messes star-spangled super bowl-slut banner.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem ap ap christina aguilera flubbed belted	Aguilera repeats the apostle; the national anthem ap christina aguilera, with a belt.
56	christina aguilera fu nat anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera f fu fu nat hymn super bowl.
56	christina aguilera defends fumbling national anthem super bowl	Christina Aguilera has defended the Super Bowl of l' national anthem.
56	aguilera repeat national anthem	L' aguilera, repeats the apos; national anthem.
56	twitter explodes christina aguilera mess national anthem super bowl twitter abuzz commen	Twitter explodes Christina aguilera national hymn mess super bowl-twitter abuzz Begin.
56	christina aguilera flub national anthem ap celebrity news	Christina Aguilera flub hymn national apologies new celebrities.
56	hear christina aguilera mangled star spangled banner superbowl twilight reaming	Christina Aguilera tore up the Starry Banner of the Super Bowl Twilight.
56	christina aguilera botch national anthem super bowl washington post	Christina Aguilera Boots the National Super Bowl Washington Post anthem.
56	poll christina aguilera botch national anthem super bowl singer repeat accidentally tarnishing othe	Christina Aguilera's Christina Aguilera poll sing-along national super bowl song repetition accidentally tarnishes the apos; other.
57	watching blue blood cbs	Watching Blue Blood Cbs.
57	gothic abby cbs	I'm Abby Cbs from Gothic.
57	late night time watch crime solving tv ncis csi sky looooove	Late at night, watching the resolution of the crimes TV.
57	love ncis arc outcome funeral	J&apos loves NCIS funerals.
57	caught criminal mind finally work castle watch time watch ncis true love	It's time to go to work, and it's time to go to work.
57	love shirt store ncis	J' I like the Ncis Shirt Shop.
57	obsession gt ncis	NCIS obsession.
57	ncis stupidest fucking television	NCIS is the stupidest damned television.
57	loooooooooooove ncis	NCIS loooooooove.
57	gibbs father love ep ncis	Gibbs' dad loves this episode.
57	ncis bomb love	Bombing of the bomb.
57	yeah don csis nciss enjoy mentalist	Yeah, the Nciss like the mentalists.
58	nominate shorty award food love food ve eating mcds year yea	You will be able to enjoy a variety of food and be prepared to eat.
59	wlcentral yemen day rage february egypt jan yemen feb	In February, Egypt Jan Yemen feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb feb.
59	protest start yemen despite concession president hundred anti government protest	A protest against the government was launched against the government, despite a 100-cent concession from the president.
59	yemen call emergency meeting ahead protest yemen president ali abdullah saleh called emergen	Yemen calls for a meeting of d'apos; emergency to protest against Yemeni President ali Abdullah Saleh, known as Emeren.
59	thousand protest yemen	Yemen protests.
59	lat ten thousand turn rival rally yemen	Last ten grand, spinning the rival yemen rally.
59	yemen join uprising trend protest start yemen despite concession president yemen jan	Yemen joins the uprising movement to protest starting yemen despite Yemeni president Jan's concession.
59	yemen republican guard dispatched roaming street sana reliable source	The Yemeni Republican Guard has just sent a reliable source, Sana, wandering the streets.
59	anti government protest start yemen	Yemen begins protesting against the government.
59	correcting link yemen latest arab state join unrest activist demonstrating	Correct yemen Arab last state link join activist of the apos; protest agitation.
59	breaknews yemen street day rage yemeni filled street sanaa	New yemen on street days Yemeni rage is filling the streets sanaa sanaa.
59	yemen president extend term aljazeera	The President is appointed by the President of the Republic.
59	ticker thousand yemeni call president quit	Thousands of Yemenis are calling the President to resign.
59	yemeni president ali abdullah saleh will seek extend presidency appoint son role current	President Ali Abdullah Saleh of Yemen will seek to expand the presidency to name his current role.
59	egypt yemen demand change government well gt news tcot	Yemeni Egypt calls for a change of government.
59	protest reform start yemen hundred anti government protester gathered sanaa	Launch of the Yemen Protest Reform 100 protesters against the government gathered sanaa.
59	yemen pres salih will seek term step egypt pres mubarak	Yemen near salih will be looking for a term that is a step forward in the direction of the world.
59	anti government protest spilling yemen business	Anti-government protests, outpouring of Yemen's business.
59	st tunisia egypt yemen	Tunisia and Egypt; Yemeni.
59	yemen protest intensify arrest journalist tawakkol karman	The protests in Yemen are intensifying the situation; the arrest of the journalist Tawakkol Karman.
59	worldchanging yemen president facing protest will seek extend term expires	The president of Yemen, who is changing in the face of protests, will seek to extend the term of office that has expired.
59	march yemen president day rage	Yemen's President's Day Rage march.
59	yemen unsettled president vow relinquish power yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh will stand current mand	Unstable President Yemen vows to relinquish power The current mandate of the Yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh will remain unchanged.
59	wonder will fill political vacuum tunesia egypt yemen tunesia egypt yemen	L' amazement will fill the vacuum of political power.
59	indy yemen president saleh step yemen president told parliament will seek term	President d'apos; Indy-yemen announced in Parliament that he would be running for office.
59	thousand march yemen president middle east independent	Independent President of the Middle Kingdom-Orient.
59	reuters top news yemen president won extend term pas son	Reuters top news President Yemen has just won an extended term with his son.
59	yemen protest february day rage video news egypt jan mubarak syria libya jordan ugc	Yemen Protests on Rage of News Videos Day in February in Egypt Jan Mubarak Syria Libya Jordan ugc.
59	protest erupt yemen	There have been protests in Yemen.
59	great bbc piece summarising unrest north africa middle east	It's a big article from BBC summarizing the troubles to the north of l'apos; Africa of the Middle-East.
59	yemeni president won seek term	The President has obtained a mandate.
59	yemen ali abdullah saleh won seek reelection year power amazing happenning mid east	Yemen ali Abdullah Saleh has won the run for the year of incredible re-election occurs at the Middle-Orient.
59	dueling protest yemen unfold peacefully thousand pro antigovernment demonstrator held peaceful	Thousands of pro-demonstrators-government peacefully demonstrated in duel.
59	yemen president won election	Yemen's president won.
59	revolt contagious anti government protest spread yemen tcot tlot jan sidibouzid	Jan sidibouzid's contagious anti-government uprising has spread the yemen tcotlot.
59	yemen president signal won stay freedomwar egypt jan syria feb	The Yemeni President's signal has won the war on the freedom of the country; Egypt Jan.
59	thousand yemeni call president quit thousand yemeni demonstrated capital thursday	Yemen's 1,000th president-elect has called for a thousand Yemenis to leave Yemen's capital on Thursday.
59	thousand rally government yemen	You know, like, a thousand government-yemen rallies.
59	protest start yemen despite concession president hundred anti government protest	A protest against the government was launched against the government, despite a 100-cent concession from the president.
59	obama minute citizen rally president resign egypt	Rally of citizens from Apos; Obama, President of Apos; Egypt has resigned.
59	yemeni president won extend presidential term yemen	The President of Yemen has obtained an extended term in office in Yemen.
59	yemen president ali abdullah saleh quit	Yemeni President Abdullah Saleh has resigned.
59	deutsche welle yemen unsettled president vow relinquish power	Deutsche Bundesche werden werden.
59	al jazeera report region yemen pres extend term protest call syria	"Al Jazeera reports that the region of Yemen is expanding the term ""Syria"" for protests."
59	yemen girds day rage saleh vow step bloomberg	Yuy girds day rage saleh swear not bloomberg.
59	join yemen day rage	Join us-in Yemen's Day Rage.
59	news growing anti regime protest spread yemen	The news from D&apos, an anti-mobility protest, has spread to all over Yemen.
59	protest yemen	Protests Yemen.
59	middle east news ten thousand fill yemen street day rage haaretz follow	Middle @--@ Orient News 10,000 fill day yemen with rage street haaretz follow.
59	thousand rally government yemen breaking	Thousand yemen of rallying, government breaking yemen.
59	mass rally yemen day rage anti government protester gather yemen capital sanaa day rage	Mass rally on the day of rage against the government protesting gathering sana'a day of rage yemen capital.
59	ten thousand march yemen president ap news	I'm sorry, I'm sorry.
59	egypt ripple ally yemeni prez ali abdullah saleh power year won seek term	I'm a member of the Council of Europe, and I'm a member of the Council of Europe.
59	street yemen day rage	The Rage of the Day in Yemen from the streets.
59	yemen president ali abdallah saleh power year periodically announces won election	The President of Yemen ali Abdallah Saleh periodically announces that the elections have been won.
59	yemen president extend term egypt jordan tunisia	President Yemen extends the term of office of the Egyptian President Jordan tunisia.
59	yemeni rally president	President of the Yemeni Rally.
59	yemen arrest anti government activist yemen	An anti-government activist-yemen government.
59	yemen president facing protest will seek extend term expires	The Yemeni president, in the face of the protest, will be seeking to extend the term of office.
59	yemen protest call president saleh	Yemen's protest movement calls for President Saleh.
59	student activist stage rival demonstration yemeni university	Student activist, competing demonstration Yemeni University.
59	dtn singapore yemen president won stand term sanaa yemeni leader ali abdullah saleh facing	Dtn singapore yemen president has secured the term of office of yemeni ali abdullah saleh leader face-to-face.
59	anti government rally yemen stay calm	Anti rally-yemen government remain calm.
59	newsshare yemen president won extend term pas son reuters	President Newsshare Yemen won an extended reuters term.
59	street yemen day rage sanaa reuters yemeni	Yemeni riots sanaa reuters yemeni.
59	pak thousand yemeni demand govt change thousand yemeni street capital sanaa inspir	Pak 1,000 yemeni is asking the government to change 1,000 yemeni capital street inspired 1,000 yemeni.
59	thousand yemeni demand change government thousand yemeni demand change gov hiring send cv	Yemeni Thousand Are Requesting Change of Government Yemeni Thousand Are Requesting Change of Government.
59	yemeni doubt president won step	Yemeni doesn't think the president won, step by step.
59	ten thousand yemeni protest sanaa ten thousand yemeni staged day rage calling	Ten thousand Protestant Yemeni sana'a 10,000 Yemenis dramatized the day's rage by appealing for anger.
59	turmoil hit yemen yemen president won seek election hand power son cnn	The agitation struck yemen won president seek to hand power CNNN son.
59	president yemen ali abdullah saleh will seek extend presidential term pas power son jan yemen feb	Yemeni president ali abdullah saleh will be seeking to extend his son Jan Yemen feb's presidential term.
59	cnn anti government protest yemen hundred anti government protester gathered news	Hundreds of anti-government protesters have been gathering information.
59	yemeni protester urged president ali abdullah saleh step muhammadjusuf	A Yemeni protester has urged President ali abdullah saleh step muhammadjusuf.
59	pre empting mass anti government protest ali saleh vow seek extension pas rein	Mass Preemption Anti-protest government ali saleh vire seek extension not kidney.
59	yemen thousand protest government worldnomads travelsafety	Thousands of government-sponsored protests travel safely.
59	domino working well yemen call emergency meeting ahead protest cnn	It's a big deal, but it's not a big deal, and it's a big deal.
59	protest sanaa yemen feb	Sana'a-yemen feb protest.
59	police open fire yemen protester sanaa yemen ap witness police opened fire break	Sana'a yemen protestor ap eyewitnesses Police opened fire.
59	bbc yemeni rally president thousand yemeni demonstrating capital sanaa calling president ali abdullah	Bbc Yemeni rally President Thousand Yemeni Capital protest sanaa call president ali abdullah.
59	yemen president quit february updated	The President of Yemen resigned in February updated.
59	anti government rally hit yemen	Anti-government-rally has hit Yemen.
59	start era middle east	Middle Era-Orient.
59	factbox group challenging yemen government reuters	Discussion Group Challenging the Government of Yemen Reuters.
59	yemen day rage draw ten thousand	Yemen's Day Rage attracts 10,000 people.
59	tunisia egypt yemen	Tunisian Egyptian Yemen.
59	today president alisaleh yemen vowed election support peaceful transition power feb	But today, President Alisaleh Yemen promised that the elections would support a peaceful, feverish transitional power.
59	protest start yemen despite concession president cnn	Launch of the Yemeni protest despite the President of CNN Concession.
59	blemish org ten thousand turn rival rally yemen los angeles time reuterstens thousand turn	In spite of this, tens of thousands of people are turning against each other.
59	ten thousand march yemen president sanaa yemen ten thousand lukewilliamss	Sana'a Yemen Sana'a Yemen Sana'a Yemen Sana'a Yemen Sana'a Yemen Sana'a Yemen.
59	protester hit street yemen	A protester has been beating Yemen from the street.
59	yemen protest february day rage lt lt lt video yemen protest jan ali abdullah saleh news	Yemen protest in February, rages, there's a video of the protest by the Yemeni, Jan ali abdullah saleh news.
59	yemeni president ruled decade ll seek extend term pas power son reuters	The President of Yemen reigned 10 years after seeking to extend the term of office of his son, Reuters.
59	watching yemen	Watching Yemen.
59	teepeecreek ten thousand march yemen president ap teepeecreek	Teepeecreek March 10,000 Yemen President ap teepeecreek.
60	chipotle face ice inspection state reuters reuters chipotle mexican grill	Chipotle vs. Ice Inspection State Reuters chipotle Mexican chipotle grill reuters.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs los angeles dallas reuters chipotle mexican grill lot going	The fast-food has spotted the apos; immigration in order to fry the Los Angeles Reuters Chipotle Mexican Grill.
60	chipotle caught immigration crosshairs yahoo news knew genuine mexican working	Chipotle took the pod; online immigration of Yahoo news was aware that authentic Mexicans were working.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs los angeles dallas reuters chipotle mexican grill lot	The fast-food took refuge in the Los Angeles Reuters targeter Mexican chipotle grill lot.
60	ih industry news chipotle scrutiny ice	News from the Chipotle Ice Monitoring Industry.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs reuters	The fast-food drew attention to Immigration on Reuters.
60	chipotle face ice inspection state reuters	This is the first time you've had a chance to check the ice.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs	The fast-food attracted the attention of l'apos; immigration.
60	chipotle scrutiny illegal worker	Chipotle Control Illegal laborer.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs	The fast-food attracted the attention of l'apos; immigration.
60	fast food caught immigration crosshairs reuters	The fast-food drew attention to Immigration on Reuters.
60	ice scrutiny chipotle broadens	Chipotle of ice; examination of ice; broadens.
60	chipotle ice problem investigation state news immigration	Investigating the Ice Problem: Chipotle Update; Immigration.
60	surprise day immigration crackdown bad american access burrito	Day-surprise of the repression of l' immigration bad American burrito burrito access.
60	chipotle fire hundred immigration raid immigration probe forced mexican chain chipotle fire	It's been a long time since we've been able to get to the U.S. and the U.S.
60	chipotle mexican grill received immigration custom enforcement notice inspection restaurant	Mexican Chipotle grill has been notified by Immigration Customs.
61	iphone share smartphones phone	Share mobile phones with Iphone.
61	pcworld android tablet smartphone boost samsung	Pcworld android smartphone booster tablet samsung.
61	iphone profit swamp competitor iphone cheap smartphone load codswallop	Iphone Competitive iPhone Cheap Smartphone loading codswallop.
61	mobile market grew smartphones android driver will drive marke	The mobile s&apos market; is developed smartphones android driver software will drive Marke.
61	motorola post earnings android	Motorola after winnings Android.
61	iphone share smartphones phone asymco chart	Iphone share your smartphone asymc graphics asymc phone.
61	apple account percent smartphone market profit	Percent Apple Account of the Smartphone Market.
61	android tablet smartphone boost samsung samsung electronics reported fresh time sale high	The android smartphone booster samsung samsung electronic tablet android pointed out the high retail time.
61	idc apple lead rim worldwide smartphone maker	Idc Lead Ring Apple Global Smartphone Manufacturer.
61	blackberry beating iphone smartphone battle	Blackberry defeats the iPhone Smartphone Battle.
62	avani news gop senator seek change born citizen usa today	Today, U.S. Senator Gop has been looking for citizen-initiated change.
62	florida immigration law focused employer hasn enforced politics ap miamiherald	Immigration to Florida imposed the apamiherald miamiherald policy.
62	arizona bid block citizenship illegal immigrant anchor baby	Arizona's candidacy for the post-secondary school is blocking citizenship, immigration, and the baby's illegal immigration.
62	report immigration law enforced consistently ap	Report that the Immigration Act has been systematically applied.
62	isg alert visa program gao report congress reform needed minimize risk cost immigration	It is important to note, however, that there is a need to reduce the cost of immigration.
62	georgia hb immigration reform bill creates staggering cost taxpayer tweak existing law	The proposed Immigration Reform Bill will impose exorbitant costs on taxpayers who amend existing legislation.
62	immigration law enforced consistently	The Immigration Act is applied consistently.
62	vote delayed immigration verify bill house labor subcommittee adjourned debate directed dep	The House of Commons Labour Committee sub-adjourned the debate.
62	sodahead state inspired arizona illegal immigration law face tough fiscal reality state iowa	The Illegal Immigration of Immigrants Act of Arizona is inspired by the apos; the harsh fiscal reality of Apos; Iowa.
62	commerce bos immigration reform	This is the first time that we have had the opportunity to do so.
62	lawmaker question practicality ky immigration bill	The feasibility of the Immigration Bill has been questioned by legislators.
62	state follow arizona lead push immigration bill power	L' Estate follows the apos; Arizona and pushes the bill on immigration.
62	arizona bid block citizenship illegal immigrant anchor baby tcot tlot	The candidacy of Arizona blocks citizenship, l&apos, illegal immigrant, baby tcot tlot.
62	stein report gt south dakota bill target illegal immigration	The Stein Report indicates that the South Dakota Bill targets illegal immigration.
62	house kill arizona style immigration bill rep rick rand house pas ari	The House Kills Home; Arizona, the Immigration Bill, Representative Rick Rand, the House not Ari.
62	washington legislature wade immigration debate oregonlive summary requires employe verify	Washington legislature debate on oregon immigration summary requires verification by the employer.
62	arizona immigration law blocked judge	Arizona impeached the judge.
62	riz khan arizona immigration law	Khan Arizona Rice Law; Immigration.
62	missouri court rule immigrant adoption right terminated illegally missouri supreme court tuesday ove	The Supreme Court of Missouri ruled that the right to adopt immigrants had been unlawfully applied to the Supreme Court of Missouri on Tuesday evening.
62	missouri court rule immigrant adoption right terminated illegally missouri supreme court tuesday overtu	The Missouri Court ruled that the Immigrant Adoption Act ended unlawfully in the Missouri Supreme Court on Tuesday.
62	splc report examines motivation effect anti immigrant law local state level immigration	The report looks at the impact of anti-mobility policies on the rights of migrants at the local level.
62	michael johnston colorado legislator state tuition illegal immigrant proposed necn	Michael Johnston, a lawmaker in the state charged with tuition fees for illegal immigrants, proposed Necn as an alternative.
63	stuxnet lead chernobyl russian	Stuxnet Lead Russian Chernobyl.
63	science fiction author futurist william gibson stuxnet	Science author William Gibson Stuxnet-Futuristic fiction.
63	duck security expert warn stuxnet boomerang security	L' duck safety expert, warns Stuxnet boomerang security.
63	duck security expert warn stuxnet boomerang security	L' duck safety expert, warns Stuxnet boomerang security.
63	duck security expert warn stuxnet boomerang security	L' duck safety expert, warns Stuxnet boomerang security.
63	russia stuxnet caused chernobyl david brunnstrom reuters david brunnstrom reuters rus	David Brunnstrom reuters David Brunnstrom reuters Rus Rus.
63	stuxnet concern iranian health ministry york time published report week describing stuxnet	Stuxnet is about Iran's Ministry of Health, the timing of the Stuxnet report.
63	william gibson stuxnet panzergeist sez piece cyberpunk author william gibson share finding	William Gibson Stuxnet panzergeist sez authored cyberpunk William Gibson share find.
64	check article fox news sideline test detect concussion minute	Read the article by Fox News about the secondary test for the detection of concussion.
64	aggressive tackling learn lasting damage concussion teen	Aggressive plating teaches long-term adolescent concussion.
64	buck belief nba concussion protocol three year ago ucla luc richard mbah moute sust	The belief nba protocol of concussion three years ago UCLA luc Richard mbah moute sust.
64	multiple concussion raise teen athlete health risk health news	Multiple concussions increase health risks for adolescent athletes.
64	aaron rodgers concussion nfl playoff packer quarterback hiding brain injury	Aaron Rodgers' NFL concussion, playoff quarterback, hides brain injury.
64	impact sensor slated nfl helmet season playbook	NFL headset detector; impact programmed for the NFL headset season.
64	sideline test accurately detects athlete concussion minute	Key-line control will accurately detect the minute of concussion in the athlete.
64	footballer destroying kid brain game	He's a football player who's trying to destroy a child's brain.
64	nfl official mike quick pa sport concussion bill tough mentality permeates youth sport	The NFL's draft law on rapid concussions in sports has had a profound impact on young people's sports.
64	live discussion concussion sport start est join hash tag cdcheadsup	Begin chat live sport commussion is attached cdcheadsup hash tag.
64	national hockey league concussion rise sidney crosby marc ap sport staff associated pressp	The National Hockey League causes Sidney Crosby Marc ap, the sports-related media personnel, to suffer a concussion.
64	sidney crosby concussion raise safety debate hockey spark discussion	Soldiers improve target precision on sniper course Valcartier, QC – Course tests ability to hit targets in varying weather.
64	pa committee approves youth sport concussion bill harrisburg pa whtm state senate education committ	The Committee approves the Harrisburg Bill on Youth Sports Commotion and Education in the Senate.
64	usa today sport buck forward belief nba concussion protocol	It's the first time I've had the pleasure of being able to work with you.
64	multiple concussion raise teen athlete health risk yahoo	Multiple concussions increase the risk to teenage athletes.
64	nytimessports oversight group vow pursue update football helmet standard	The Nytimessports Monitoring Group (NYPSG) is committed to updating the football helmets standard.
64	school tackling cut teen concussion	L' S&apos school; Attack with adolescent concussion.
64	hosting live chat concussion cdcheadsup rehearsed emergency plan chat	Live chat, chat, chat, chat, chat, chat, chat, chat, chat.
64	usa hockey considering proposal increase safety	This is the only way you will be able to enjoy the game.
64	nfl concussion people survey wix jsquared concussion	Concussion people examine Wix Jsquared concussion.
64	mbah moute nba concussion protocol usa today share friend sport basketball nba	Mbah moute nba commotion protocol today; today we share friends sport basketball Nba NBA.
64	vital sign helmet guard aaron rodgers	Vital Signs - Helmet Guardian Aaron Rodgers.
64	doctor lounge multiple concussion raise teen athlete health risk	The risks to the health of adolescent athletes are increased by the multiple concussions in the doctors' lounge.
64	news pa lawmaker concussion response standard student athlete	Parliament's Response to Standard Concussion D'apos; Student Athlete.
64	multiple concussion raise teen athlete health risk medline	Multiple concussions increase the risk of teenage athletes' health.
64	sidney crosby concussion raise safety debate hockey spark discussion	Soldiers improve target precision on sniper course Valcartier, QC – Course tests ability to hit targets in varying weather.
64	school tackling cut teen concussion bull ring drill football	He was attacked by a young victim of a concussion.
64	sherrington player steerlers james harrison concussion seriously super bowl xlv news sportsdaydfw	Sherrington Steerlers player James Harrison seriously concussion super bowl xlv sportsdaydfw news.
64	testing track student recovery sport concussion milford daily news	Testing the Recovery Trail for Student Sports Concussion Milford Daily Journal new concussion.
64	aaron rodgers helmet saved concussion bear green bay packer qb aaron rodgers believ	Aaron Rodgers helmet saved commotion green packer bear Aaron Rodgers believe.
64	press release nocsae urge parent athlete fact concussion football	Press release, nocsae squeezes the parent athlete, who is a concussion footballer.
64	nfl concussion news goodell order super bowl played hand touch	Nflussion news Goodell Super Bowl Order hand-played touch.
64	school tackling cut teen concussion bull ring drill football	He was attacked by a young victim of a concussion.
64	sidney crosby concussion rule change braine hope pray doesn sight	Sidney Crosby, concussion, rule change, hopes that the prayer n&apos is not visible.
64	sideline test detect concussion minute foxnews	Foxnews minute commotion lateral test.
64	don agree hines ward nfl concussion hypocrisy	I don't think it's a good idea, but I think it's a good idea.
65	best buy future proof tech purchase buy program cost complete range con	It is better to buy the next technology; test the product; purchase the complete program with the full range.
65	best buy sell verizon iphone best buy announced wednesday will offer verizon iphone	It's the first time you'll be able to buy an iPhone, but it's not the only way to do that.
65	best buy future proof tech purchase buy program cost istockanalyst press release	The best to buy future software technology istockanalyst program proof purchase istockanalyst press release.
65	find best buy upgraded upgrade buy program	Best Buy updated the d&apos program; purchase upgrade.
65	maclife best buy selling verizon iphone starting february verizon customer pic	Maclife best buy iphone Verizon sales from February onwards Verizon Verizon customer image.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program ap ap timing shopping gadget	Best Buy Electronics purchase program ap ap-time gadget shopping gadget.
65	post best buy buy official free february	Best purchase after February.
65	quora will best buy electronics buy consumer answer	Quora better buy electronic consumer response.
65	best buy buy program don upgrade major electronic equipment	The Best Buy programme does not upgrade the main electronic equipment.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program	Best purchase e-launch program; purchase.
65	report hint best buy stock verizon iphone launch best buy outlet will varying amoun	The report suggests that the Best Buy inventory will vary from one point of sale to another.
65	alert best buy announces buy program electronics news alert	It's a great place to shop, and it's a great place to shop.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program ap	Best e-procurement purchase to purchase the ap-programmer.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program timing shopping gadget socialmedia	Best e-buying to buy the program cadencement gimmick socialmedia.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program timing shopping gadget	Best e-buying to buy the Quick Start Gadget Timing program; purchase.
65	best buy launch electronics buy program	Best purchase e-launch program; purchase.
65	best buy target launch buy electronics offer currently rachel blog travel industry news	Best Buy Target Buy Electronics is currently offering rachel's latest news blog from the travel industry.
65	catch best buy buyback extended cut full info	The most advantageous buyout option has been extended, and all the information is available.
65	best buy buy official free february best buy gadget repurchase breakingnews fb	Best Free Official Purchase February Best Free Fb Buy Fb Breaknews fb Buyback Gadget.
66	joanna yeates suspect court img	Joanna Yeates suspects the court.
66	vincent tabak appears court charged murder	Vincent Tabak seems to have been charged with the murder.
66	sun man charged killing jo yeates police tonight charged year vincent tabac murder	L' sunshine man accused the police of killing Jo Yeates tonight, accused of the crime scene; year Vincent tobacco murder.
66	msn today joanna yeates suspect court	Joanna Yeates is a suspect.
66	vincent tabak man accused jo yeates murder deeply saddened death	Vincent Tabak Man accused Jo Yeates of grievous death.
66	breaking news jo murder accused remanded	I've just received the latest news that Jo has been taken into custody for murder.
66	neighbour remanded jo yeates murder	Neighbor just fired Jo Yeates for murder.
66	vincent tabak charged murder joanna yeates	Vincent Tabak accused Joanna Yeates of murder.
66	joanna yeates murder accused vincent tabak remanded custody vincent tabak man accused murdering	This is Joanna Yeates, a murderer charged with murder Vincent Tabak, and Vincent Tabak, a man charged with murder.
66	uk news neighbour remanded jo yeates murder	Uk news from neighboring Yeates jail.
66	real life murder freaked dutch man killer gt	Real murder scared a Dutch killer.
66	joanna yeates vincent tabak charged murder	Joanna Yeates Vincent Tabak was accused of murder.
66	man charged joanna yeates murder	One accused Joanna Yeates of murder.
66	vincent tabak man accused jo yeates murder deeply saddened death telegraph	Vincent Tabak Man has accused Jo Yeates of murder, deeply sad telegraph of death.
66	avon somerset police charged vincent tabak murder jo yeates hope life ruined	Avon Somerset has accused Vincent Tabak of Jo Yeates's murder.
67	chicken dumpling	Chicken balls.
67	pesto presto chicken pesto presto chicken feel good favorite cozy meal famil	The pesto chicken pesto presto pesto pesto chicken feel good family of favorite cozy meals.
67	check delicious chicken recipe	Check the delicious chicken recipes on the menu.
67	diablo chicken chili recipe	Chili diablo recipe.
67	super smoker sweet spicy wing perfect sunday sb smokedrecipes footballfood recipe	The hotel is located in the heart of the city, close to the beach and close to the beach.
67	seriousy gt super bowl food level recipe rock tequila spiked wing luv	It's a very good game, but it's a good game and it's a good game.
67	favorite thing chicken breast	Favorite stuff,chicken breast.
67	delicious chicken curry recipe hope will	A delicious recipe for curried chicken that will inspire hope.
67	luv gt mock chicken fettuccine alfredo grocery store dinner	L' love also mocking chicken dinner alfredo dinner; deli dinner.
67	learning recipe doesn cream potato soup cream chicken soup	The recipe for learning does not cream the soup of potatoes soup soup soup soup soup of chicken to the cream.
67	cook seared chicken apricot sauce chili rubbed steak pan salsa	Chili apricot chicken stir-fry with Steak Pan salsa salsa.
67	karaage japanese fried chicken recipe blog	Karaage blogger japanese fried chicken recipe fried chicken.
67	ultimate chicken soup	L&apos, l&apos, L&apos, L&apos, L&apos.
67	chicken parm classic comfort food katie lee share recipe add garlic bread good measure anyon	Classic chicken parmesan comforting katie is sharing the recipe to add bread to bear.
67	mama favorite easy chicken pasta mother knew food knew hand	Mom liked the easy chicken pasta more than the mom knew the food knew the way.
67	grilled chicken tomato salad	Chicken-chicken tomato salad, please.
67	healthy super bowl snack superbowl recipe	The Super Bowl Healthy Snack Super-Superbowl recipe.
67	recipe chicken cutlet	Chicken chop recipe.
67	sinfully spicy easy easy eat reshmi chicken kebab roll indianfood recipe indianfastfood	Easy-to-eat spicy registration reshmi kebab chicken kebab Indian roll Indian fast food Indian recipe.
67	wing healthy oven fried wing drip pan fat drain	Air-fired, fried drop drop-to-drop fat drain.
67	bbc food recipe thai green chicken curry	Thai bbc Green Chicken Curry Recipes.
67	cozy scene recipe gluten free fried chicken hsoul	A cozy, gluten-free, chicken-fried hsoul scene.
67	gourmet mom anise chicken recipe	Mama's gourmet chicken-chicken recipe.
67	orange chicken twist chinese delicious	Chicken at lapos; delicious Chinese twist orange.
67	spicy food popular child quick thai style chicken soup will hit	Popular spicy food Thai children chicken soup fast will hit.
67	best recipe caesar salad caesarsalad	Best Caesar Caesar salad.
67	quick avgolemono orzo chicken soup recipe	Quick recipe for chicken orzo avgolemono orzo soup.
67	marinated roast half chicken	Half-eaten roast chicken-chicken.
67	simple easy prepare vintage fried chicken recipe	Simply and easily prepare a vintage chicken-fried recipe.
67	yummy recipe tuesday chicken fricasse	Delicious recipe Tuesday, chicken-fricky.
67	creamy recipe fettuccine alfredo chicken recipe	Creamy fettuccine fettuccine alfredo recipe chicken.
67	menu tonight chicken curry recipe	Tonight's special, recipe for chicken curry.
67	baked slow cooker chicken crockpotrecipes	Crockpotrecipes slow-simmer baked.
67	recipe super bowl slider super bowl party food big comfy flavor ease day	Recipe Super Bowl Super Bowl slider Super Bowl party food great great great flavor comfortable day of taste ease.
67	perfect super bowl chili	The perfect chili from the Super Bowl, man.
67	basic chicken saute recipe	Chicken stir-fry base recipe.
67	super bowl recipe buffalo chicken pizza	Buffalo Chicken Pizza Super Bowl Recipe.
67	chicken cutlet caper sauce recipe simply recipe	The recipe for the Caper Sauce of Chicken Chops is simply a recipe.
67	chicken piccata dinner yum	Chicken piccata yum.
67	blog post farm fresh recipe idea easy chicken wing week farm fresh recipe idea geared towar	Firm blog post-farm idea of fresh week wing chicken recipe easy idea of fresh war-oriented recipe.
67	super bowl recipe gumbo fried chicken grilled salmon ciabatta patch top notch recipe	Super bowl Gumbo chicken fried salmon top-of-the-line premium recipe patch ciabatta.
67	rp cooking update italian recipe food cooking recipe	Update on Cooking Italian Recipes Cooking recipe.
67	creamy chicken mushroom pot pot pie topper abc news rachael ray share meal reheat	Mushroom Creamy Chicken pot pie to top abc news rachael Ray share the heating of meals.
67	shredded chicken hope guide shredded chicken helpful al	Ripped Chicken, Handbook of Hope, Ragged Chicken, Helpful, para.
67	recipe roast chicken warm lemon herb potato salad recipe day	Roast Recipient Hot Chicken Lemon Grass Potato Salad Recipient Potato Salad Recipient Day.
67	moroccan roasted chicken orange juice recipe recipe moroccan roasted chicken orange	Recipes of Moroccan roast chicken roast Moroccan roast chicken roast chicken roast chicken orange juices.
67	easy weight loss recipe healthy recipe learn transform favorite food weight	Easy Weight Loss Recipe Healthy recipe Learn how to transform weight from fast food.
67	super bowl recipe gumbo fried chicken grilled salmon ciabatta serve big party	Recipes of super bowl of grilled gumbo salmon ciabatta to serve great party.
67	twitter tweet perennial plant january bloomnflower recipe recipe	Twitter tweet perennial plant January flower recipe flower from the recipe flower of the January flower.
67	time superbowl start time start planning wing recipe great wing recipe	Superbowl time begins time planning large recipe wing big wing.
67	crispy chicken drumstick ranch dressing recipe	Ranch salad dressing for crispy chicken fingers.
67	recipe chicken cutlet	Chicken chop recipe.
67	easy recipe ranch house casserole recipe	Easy-to-prepare recipe, ranch stew.
67	kung pao chicken recipe	Kung Pao Chicken Recipes.
67	rp cooking update chicken vegetable stir fry recipe readyseteat food recipe cook	Update on baking Chicken, Vegetables, French fries, ready meals-to serve and ready meals.
67	special chicken stew recipe chicken recipe stew recipe jamie oliver recipe love oliver bright star	Special recipe chicken stew recipe chicken stew jamie recipe oliver recipe d'apos; love oliver star bright oliver.
67	ayam goring fried chicken rinse chicken inside cold running water pat dry paper tow	Chicken should be rinsed at the same time; cold water running while tapping dry paper towed.
67	chicken vegetable herb brown rice	Chicken grass, brown rice.
67	reading chicken taco rice chicken taco rice yum yum yum eat plate coul	Reading chicken taco rice chicken taco rice miam miam miam eat plate coulis.
67	parmesan chicken broccoli pasta cocktail mom recipe husband love	Chicken broccoli cocktail chicken Parmesan pasta mama recipe husband love recipe.
67	chicken brick mark bittman simple delicious recipe mark bittman ny time column	Chicken Brick Bittmann Brand Simple recipe tasting bittmann brand ny time column bittmann ny.
67	east chicken fettuccine recipe chicken recipe cooking	Chicken fettuccine; East, recipe chicken, cooking.
67	perfect super bowl party food bbq chicken pouch post	The perfect post-chicken bbq chicken-pocket bowl party.
67	winter coleslaw chicken salad sandwich kitchen season ross dobson wo	Chicken salad, chicken salad, coleslaw, Ross Dobson's cooking season.
67	chicken cavatelli soup	Chicken soup, cavatelli.
67	low fat recipe lunchbox idea diet plan dinner tonight	Low-fat lunch-box idea, diet, dinner tonight.
67	fabulous recipe mexican caldo pollo chicken soup jalepeno cheese cornbread	Wonderful caldo Mexican recipe pollo chicken soup Jalepeno corn bread with corn cheese.
67	delirious today feeling well time jewish penicillin chicken soup	It's been a long time since I've had the pleasure of working with you.
67	healthy recipe dinner sue healthy lifestyle	Sue Healthy Living Cookie Luncheon.
67	orange glazed chicken wing recipe	Ice-cold orange wings.
67	chicken rice melange recipe chicken recipe cooking	Chicken, rice, blended, cooked chicken, cooked chicken, cooked chicken, cooked chicken.
67	red cabbage add color noodle salad soba salad chicken cabbage	Red chou rouge add the noodle salad color soba chou chicken salad.
67	salty bacon creamy avocado succulent chicken classic delicious salad	Savour delicious avocado cream bacon bacon classic delicious chicken salad.
67	totally making delicious meal tonight	Making a delicious dinner tonight.
67	supermarket diet easy recipe quick healthy meal good lose weight delicious easy coo	Supermarket diet, easy recipes, quick healthy meals, good to lose weight, delicious, easy to bake.
67	continuing cooking winning streak awesome lemon fennel pot roast chicken chicken boring	Continue the winning chicken lemon mixture fennel potted chicken boiled chicken.
67	chicken vegetable herb brown rice	Chicken grass, brown rice.
67	casserole recipe bruschetta chicken bake submitted heather simple creative chicken meal mimic	Recipes pot saucepan bruschetta cooking of heather-subdued chicken simple and creative mimic chicken flour.
67	shredded bbq chicken slider creamy cole slaw recipe	Shredded chicken bbq slider creamy cabbage recipe cole slaw.
67	check delicious chicken recipe	Check the delicious chicken recipes on the menu.
67	ancho chicken tortilla soup ancho chicken tortilla soup feel good favorite cozy meal	Ancho Chicken Tortilla Soup and Ancho Chicken Tortilla Soup make you feel right at home.
67	read cook enjoy recipe israel couscous	Reading to cook and enjoy the israel couscous israel recipe.
67	chicken chili pillsbury	Chiliburybury Pill Chicken.
67	dinner idea dinner recipe easy weekly meal plan check going	Meal plan dinner recipe idea easy to check out.
67	super bowl recipe todd dirt dirt man shared recipe patch ve ta	Super bowl recipe Todd dirt man has shared his patchwork recipe.
67	article updated chicken stroganoff recipe	Article updated recipe stroganoff chicken chicken recipe.
67	easy honey mustard mozzarella chicken recipe chicken recipe cooking	Easy mustard mozzarella chicken chicken recipe chicken chicken recipe cooking recipe chicken recipe chicken recipe.
67	chicken wing momofuku octo vinaigrette	Momofuku Chicken Wing octo octo salad dressing.
67	recipe fried chicken liver mexico chilies	Fried chicken liver, Mexican chili peppers.
67	chicken taquitos recipe epicurious	Chicken taquitos are an epic recipe.
68	expected king speech top oscar nomination	It was hoped that the speech of the King would be the first Oscar to be named.
68	sag prediction award tracker hmmmm	Sagmmmm forecasting price plotter.
68	oscar reaction guess king speech	Guess the King's speech.
68	fighter king speech lead nominee tonight sag award beverly hill courier	Fighting King speech-nominated headline tonight's Sag award Beverly Hill messenger.
68	king speech rule oscar nomination	Oscar nominations are governed by the King's speech.
68	case missed full list year oscar nominee	Missing Cases l' Year of the Complete Oscar Nominee List.
68	king speech notch top director award movie running darren aronofsky	The King's speech marks Darren Aronofsky's first award-winning film.
68	king speech top list academy award nominee nomination true grit inception social network	The king's Oscar-nominated speech for the nomination of the real Grit Creative Social Network.
68	oscar nomination king speech rule nod	Appointment Oscar King speechwriter nods his head.
68	king speech top film producer award azcentral	Award for Best Film Productor Azcentral.
68	social network king speech aim oscar	Oscar is the target of the social networking king's speech.
68	king speech notch top director award bbc news	King's speech at the awards ceremony for Best Director BBC News.
68	dtn uk director guild screen actor guild award picture weekend blur	Dtn uk screen guild director actor guilds weekend prize blur photo picture week-end.
68	sag award colin firth best actor natalie portman best actress honor	Colin Firth Award Natalie Portman Best Actress Honoured.
68	oscar nomination academy award nominee watch	Oscar nomination; Academy nominated for Academy Awards.
68	geegood post king speech rule oscar nomination ap	Geegood post king-speech rule oscar appointment ap ap.
68	king speech best ensemble sagawards	I'm sorry, but I can't help it.
68	king speech won director guild award best director	The King's speech earned the Directors' Guild Best Director Award.
68	breaking news king speech take top honor hollywood actor honor best sunday night annual screen ac	Latest news from the King take the podium; honor d' Hollywood actor d' Sunday night's annual best Sunday night screen honor best.
68	colinfirth nominated oscar best actor role kingsspeech	Colinfirth has been nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actor, Kingsspeech.
68	fast track sag award king speech roll los angeles time	Fast track Sag Award King Speech Roll Angeles Time.
68	weekend wrap king speech rule sag dgas portman pick trophy weekend	Weekday-end wrap king speeches rule pick trophee weekend dgas portman-end.
68	natalie portman modern family king speech crowned sag winner	Natalie Portman, speech by King of the Modern Family crowned sagger winner.
68	hooper earns top dga prize king speech hooper won david fincher social network	Hooper has won the first Dga King speech hooper award to win David Fincher social network.
68	king speech crowned head oscar nominee colin firthphoto afpbritish historical drama king speech	Speech of the King crowned head of the candidate for the Academy Awards Colin Firthphoto afpbritish historical drama speech of the King speech.
68	king speech true grit top oscar nomination	Talk of the king real courage Oscar top nomination.
68	king speech awarded best ensemble cast screen actor guild award	The King's speech also awarded the prize for Best Actor Guild of the Apos; Ensemble Cast screen.
68	king speech lead academy award nomination including best picture full list nominee	Appointment for the title of Leader of the King's Speech at the Apostles Academy, including the name of the best candidate on the full list.
68	safon oscar nomination list academy award nominee	Oscar Safon Nominated List Nominee for the Academy Awards.
68	king sspeech finally win best picture award pga overtake socialnetwork oscar	King Sspeech has finally won the award for Best Pga Film Beyond Social Oscar Network.
68	king speech lead oscar race nomination reuters reuters king speech british drama	King Leader Oscar Reuters Race Reuters Speech King UK drama.
68	king speech win major guild award discus sag award win	The King won the Grand Prize of the Discus Sag Award.
68	king speech odds oscar glory guardian	Oscar, the King of Luck, the Keeper of Glory.
68	latest headline king speech lead oscar field british star colin firth helena bonham carter nominate	The last major title of the King's speech, the British star Oscar Field, Colin Firth, and Helena Bonham Carter, was named the nominee.
68	blog post academy award odds king speech lead oscar nomination oscar	Blog post Academy of Probabilities first Oscar-nominated King Oscar speech.
68	king speech win top director british movie king speech awarded top honour year direct	The King's Speech wins the award for Best British Film Director The King's Speech for Best Year of D' Honour.
68	king speech reign producer guild award news india stock	The Producers Guild of the King's Speech rewards the actions of India.
68	sag award recap king speech conquers king town king speech recogn dating	ASC Review King's Speech Conquering City King's Speech The King's Speeches recognize meetings.
68	king speech lead oscar race film stuttering british monarch movie founder	The Oscar-winning film-making British monarch monarch monarch founding film.
68	film king speech win producer guild top prize los angeles king speech claimed crown	King of the Cinema Speech Wins Producers Guild First Prize The King of Los Angeles Speech claims the crown.
68	movie nod king speech stir oscar race factbox gt news race	The King's Address to the Head Shaking of Oscar Race Film Made of D'apos; News & Events.
68	king speech rule obvious batch oscar bait	Of course, the Oscar bait is set by the King's speech.
68	oscar nominee academy award	Academy nomination.
68	oscar king speech haven black swan	This is the first time that the world has seen a black swan.
68	king speech usurps throne oscar leader ap queen elizabeth ii dad albert ge movie	The king's speech usurped the Oscar-leader ap Queen Elizabeth.
68	king speech lead oscar nomination	The King's speech led to the appointment of Dapos, an Oscar winner.
68	king speech social network locked oscar battle rttnews academy award nomination	Oscar battle rttnews award-nominated Oscars Academy Award-nominated social network speech.
68	hollywood director honor king speech reuters	Hollywood honours King Reuters' speech.
68	oscar anounced morning	Oscar is up in the morning.
68	king speech top film producer award ap ap king speech claimed crown be	King's Speech, Award for Best Film Producer ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap Ap.
68	dtn hollywood king speech win top honour director guild award london jan ani historical	King Hollywood's speech won the Directors' Guild Award for Best Director Guild in the History of London.
68	oscar nomination king speech nomination actor colin firth helena bonham carter geoffrey rush	Actor Colin Firth Helena Bonham Carter Geoffrey Rush.
68	boardwalk empire king speech top sag award	Empire, King's Speech, Sag Award for Best Speech.
68	king speech lead academy award nomination memphis commercial appeal	Appointment for the title of Leader of the King's Speech at the Commercial Appeal Academy.
68	oscar nominee best picture announced morning social network king speech	In the morning, on social media, the best photo of the King was nominated for an Academy Award.
68	weekend wrap king speech rule sag dgas portman pick trophy weekend	Weekday-end wrap king speeches rule pick trophee weekend dgas portman-end.
68	great expectation award natalie portman colin firth screen actor guild	Great Expectations Natalie Portman Award Colin Firth actor guild.
68	king speech lead oscar nomination	The King's speech led to the appointment of Dapos, an Oscar winner.
68	watch king speech win award	Watch King win speech award.
68	ap maker academy award favorite social network king speech competi	King's Speech Contest on the Favorite Social Network of L&apos creators.
68	screen actor guild sag award winner full list	The winner of the Sag Prize of the Guild of Cinema Actors has received the complete list.
68	tom hooper king speech winner dga award besting social network david fincher	This is a good way to get to know people and get to know them.
68	king speech win top honor director guild award	The King's Speech wins the Award for Best Directors Guild.
68	king speech boardwalk empire score sag award big weekend king speech director	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
68	oscar nomination list king speech lead nomination	Oscar Nomination List King's Speech as Principal Appointment.
68	academy award nominee	Academy Award nominee.
68	king speech win big dgas award season tight race social network	The King's speech wins the season-tight prize dgas on the social network.
68	social network king speech aim oscar	Oscar is the target of the social networking king's speech.
68	king speech rule obvious batch oscar bait ap	The King's speech obviously sets the Oscar ap ap bait lot.
68	blog post oscar nomination nominee announced king speech nomination	The candidate for l' Oscar for Best Blog has announced the nomination for the King's speech.
68	king speech lead oscar nomination nomination	Oscar for the King's speech.
68	oscar nomination king speech well worth euro afternoon	Speech by the King of the Oscar nomination which is worth an after-midi in euros.
68	king speech honored santa barbara fest ap	The feast of Santa Barbara ap.
68	king speech dominates sag award win best picture osacrs sagawards thekingsspeech	The King's Speech dominates the prize to earn better image osacrs sagawards thekingsspeech.
68	list academy award nomination chicago sun time	Chicago Suntime Academy Award nominations.
68	natalie portman colin firth king speech winner sag melissa teo christian bale	Natalie Portman Colin Colin, recipient of the Canada Day King's Speech, Mel sagissa Teo Christian Whaletian.
68	full sag award movie winner	Best Sag film winner.
68	king speech lead oscar nomination fact wrong king speech impresse	King's first appointment made wrongly King speech impressionne speech.
68	thrilled colin firth won best actor sag award well king speech best ensemble woo hoo	Colin Firth has won the Best Actor Award for Best Speeches and Speeches together woo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo hoo.
68	bbc news king speech lead oscar field	BBC News King Speech Leader Oscar Field.
68	king speech wint twee screen actor guild award	The King's speech included the prize of the Guild of actors.
68	king speech dominates oscar nomination	Oscar nominations are dominated by the King's speech.
68	screen actor guild award nomination full list peer review academy award ch	If you have any questions, please contact us at 1-800-959-8281 or e-mail us at 1-800-959-8281.
68	sag award winner list king speech fighter boardwalk empire rack trophy mawu	The list of winners of the S.A.S. award includes the Imperial Walk of the Warrior Speech King trophy.
68	full list oscar nominee	Oscars nominees are listed in full.
68	king speech true grit lead oscar nomination	Speech of the King true courage Oscar nomination of the Oscar-nominated chief.
68	harry potter ftw complete list annual academy award nomination oscar	Harry Potter ftw lists the annual Academy Award nominations.
68	king speech lead oscar list film stuttering british monarch movie founder	The Oscar-winning master of speech listings of the British monarch's stammering films that were the foundation of the film.
68	king speech oscar nomination ridiculous state union isn till tonight	Speech of King Oscar appointment ridiculous union d' state is until tonight.
68	celebnews king speech tom hooper reign supreme director guild award celebritynews	Tom Hooper reigns supreme guilds of directors rewarding newsc celebrities.
68	gbmiii ap king speech top film producer award los angeles ap king speech claimed	Gbmiii ap king speech Award for Best Film Producer of Los Angeles ap king speech.
68	oscar nominee	Academy Award nominee.
68	nominee announced annual academy award	The name of the candidate was announced for the annual prize of l' academy.
68	colin firth natalie portman best actor actress thinking king speech social network	Colin Firth Natalie Portman Best Actress Thinking King Social Network Talk.
68	congrats firth portman bale leo sag award best picture highest award best ensemble king speech	Congratulations to the Firth Portman Ball Leo sag Award Best Picture Best Feature Award Best Together Speech from the King.
68	beverly hill calif ap british monarchy saga king speech lead academy award	Beverly Hill Calif saga of the British King Speech Lead Academy Award.
68	twelve oscar nod king speech approved don understand academy hate leonardo dicaprio	Twelve Oscar nod king-approved speech do not include académie haïr leonardo dicaprio speech.
68	oscar nomination nolan snubbed king speech roll washington post	Oscar Nolan was appointed to the Washington Post, but he ignored the Washington Post King's speech.
68	king speech rule producer guild award king speech claimed crown best film	King's Speech Guild Award King's Speech Declared Best Film of the Crown.
68	oscar nomination king speech earns nod true grit	It's a great way to make a difference in the lives of people.
68	imdb firth portman king speech triumph sag award	Portman King Speech Sag Award for Triumph.
68	big surprise colin firth natalie portman win sag award	Colin Firth Natalie Portman won the Sag Award.
68	haha funny news king speech top film producer award ap	Funny ha ha ha, new King Best Film Producer speech ap price ap ap ap.
68	oscar nod best picture torn king speech inception	Oscar nods the best shot torn footage inaugurated King speech.
68	whitneyport king speech tom hooper reign supreme director guild award	Tom Hooper wins the Supreme Director Guild Award.
68	social network king speech aim oscar ap ap academy award voter poised set	Social Network King Speech aims at Oscar Academy of Voting Prizes ready together.
68	firth portman bale leo win screen actor prize ap king speech won best actor trophy sunday	Firth Portman Ball leo winner of the prize at l' actor at l' King speech winner of the Best Actor award on Sunday.
68	mark kermode oscar tip mark kermode verdict year academy award nomination news	Mark kermode oscar tip mark oscar kermode verdict kermode year academy appointment of new academic awards.
68	king speech land nomination award season favorite social network trail true grit	The season for nominations for the title of King of the Speech on social media favorites is shaping the true path of courage.
68	king speech oscar nomination beverly hill calif british monarchy saga king speech	King Oscar's Address Appointed Beverly Caliph British Monarchy saga King's Speech.
68	gt annual academy award nomination announced man ve best picture noms	The film was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Picture.
68	social network king speech aim oscar ap ap academy award voter poised set showd	Social network King speech aims oscar ap academy Award Elector prepares together shown.
68	king speech usurps throne oscar leader ap	The King's speech usurped the Oscar Throne Leader ap.
68	king rsquo speech oscar nod daily beast	King Rsquo oscar's speech will shake his head every day.
68	king speech true grit lead oscar race king speech british drama stammering monarch	King's true courage speech Oscar race King English speech monarch stutter drama.
68	imdb road oscar academy award	IMB Road Oscar Academy award.
68	king speech win producer guild award three year pga winner win acade	The King's speech won the three-year prize of the Guild of Producers, winning pga winning acade winning acade.
68	oscar king speech true grit lead nomination examiner	Oscar King Real speech, courageous first reviewer.
68	king speech boardwalk empire score sag award big weekend king spe	King speech boardwalk empire scoreboard award big weekend King spe.
68	king speech garnered oscar nomination assuring hollywood handful general public watched movie	The King's speech won the Oscars nomination, securing Hollywood as a place for a handful of people to watch the movies.
68	entent complete list nomination annual academy award	Please read the full list of nominations for the annual Academic Awards.
68	carpetbagger will oscar friend nomination academy award will academy award oscar	Carpetbagger will be Oscar Oscar Academy Academy Award friend.
68	king speech rule obvious batch oscar bait news cnews canada	The King's speech of course fixes new cnews canada oscar bait lot.
68	thefighter best ensemble film king speech will win best picture oscar	And the best fighter in the best set of King speech movies wins the best Oscar picture.
68	firth portman bale leo win screen actor prize king speech won best actor trophy sunday col	Firth Portman Ball leo winner of the Prix de l' actor at l' King Speech screen won trophy for Best Actor Sunday Col.
68	oscar nomination full list academy award nominee	Oscars Nomination Listing Complete Oscars Nomination List.
68	full list nominee official oscar website	Complete list of nominees on the Official website of l' Oscar.
68	king speech top directing prize	First Prize for Conducting the King's Speech.
68	mynews oscar nomination king speech real contender king speech brit mynews	The King's Best Speech Oscar, my new King's Speech.
68	king speech win best film gong king speech win best film accolade producer guild ameri	The Speech King wins the Best Gong Film King of Speech wins the Best Bitter Producers' Guild acolade.
68	hooper boost oscar chance dga win king speech tom hooper won director movie	Hooper booster oscar dga win King speech Tom Hooper win film director.
68	king speech star santa barbara international film festival santa barbar artimpactnetpr	Santa Barbara International Film Festival Santa Barbar artimpactnetpr.
68	king speech top screen actor guild award winner mtv movie music	This year's awards are presented to the Canadian Film and Video Production Association.
68	bbc news king speech lead oscar field	BBC News King Speech Leader Oscar Field.
68	dtn hollywood king speech dominates oscar nomination feedburner share friend ente	The Oscar nomination process is dominated by the Hollywood King speech.
68	portman firth speech win sag award los angeles jan upi star king speech ho	I've got a lot to do, but I've got a lot to do.
68	reuters celebs hollywood actor honor king speech los angeles reuters oscar front runner king	Reuters famous Hollywood actor honorary speech by King Los Angeles reuters Oscar Oscar King Oscar head runner.
68	fantastic news gt king speech lead oscar field nomination	The king's new and fantastic speech leads to Oscar nomination in the field.
68	king speech won top prize weekend hollywood actor director securing standing	The King's speech won the first prize of the week-Hollywood end d' stand-up security director.
68	king speech lead academy award nomination including best picture	He was appointed leader of the King's speech at the academy, including the title of the best photograph.
68	king speech top directing prize	First Prize for Conducting the King's Speech.
68	screen actor guild award list winner sag king speech reign supreme edie falco	The list of winners of the Guild of Film Actors sag King speech supreme Edie falco speech supreme reign.
68	lfc king speech nominated oscar bad considering game	In the King of the Apos speech, Oscar was also named bad because of the game.
68	oscar race speed sag award news	Oscar run speed-sag news.
68	oscar nomination box office help king speech soar tuesday dilemma box	The Oscar nominations box helps the King's speech at s' elevating to-above the Tuesday Dilemma Box.
68	king speech lead oscar race nomination nominee annual academy award	Nominated for l'apos; Academy Award for Best orator for the World Champion Award.
68	king speech boardwalk empire nab sag award king speech continued reign hbo prohibiti	King speech boardwalk empire nab sag award King speech continued to reign as the reigning hbo prohibiti.
68	hellothere king speech win sag award king speech win best actor trophy sunday bythere	Where the King's speech wins the prize, the King wins the trophy for Best Actor on Sunday.
68	yesterday brilliant deserves oscar gold hooper top dga prize king speech abc	Yesterday, brilliant award winner Oscar or hooper top dga Speech from the Abbott King.
68	annual academy award nomination announced film	Nomination at the Annual Academy of Advertised Films.
68	el talent king speech cast honored santa barbara international film	The speech by the King of Talent paid tribute to the international film, Santa Barbara.
69	court third party sue retaliation case	Third party's suing a retaliation case.
69	court third party bias protection broad washington jan upi supreme court ruled unanimously	The unanimous Supreme Court of Washington ruled in favor of protecting third parties from bias.
69	fox news	Fox news.
69	supreme court refuse hear appeal anti gay	The Supreme Court refused to hear the appeal against the decision of the Supreme Court.
69	supreme court pass poultry case	The Supreme Court dismisses the Poultry Case.
69	supreme court nasa intrusive background check	Nasa Supreme Court Intrusive Background Check.
69	high court third party sue retaliation case	A third party in the High Court is prosecuting a retaliatory case.
69	supreme court rule man sue firm retaliation	The lawman of the Supreme Court sues the company in retaliation.
69	supreme court issue landmark decision constitution void	The Supreme Court renders a historic decision, since the Constitution is null and void.
69	supreme court doubtful personal privacy false person	Supreme Court of Suspicious Personal Privacy fake person.
69	supreme court fiancee complaining worker protected retaliation	The Supreme Court's fiancee, the plaintiff, has been protecting the worker from retaliation.
69	supreme court refuse reinstate circuit global warming case	The Supreme Court has refused to reinstate the trial on global warming.
69	supreme court temporarily halt georgia execution	The execution of Georgia is temporarily suspended by the Supreme Court.
69	decision amount dressing circuit	Band-Aid Circuit of the Decision Amount.
69	supreme court stay okla water fight	I'm going to have to do something about it.
69	justice extend protection workplace retaliation supreme court ruled employer sued	In the case of an employer, the employer is responsible for the employer's compliance with the Act.
69	recognized supreme court harmful organic sector organic	Recognized by the Supreme Court as biologically harmful.
69	supreme court considers foia protects corporate personal privacy public record law	The Supreme Court has held that the faitha protects the privacy of legal persons.
69	justice extend protection workplace retaliation supreme court ruled employer sued	In the case of an employer, the employer is responsible for the employer's compliance with the Act.
70	invite read cap blog connection join dialogue bullying	Reading Cap blog connect to join the dialogue on bullying.
70	golden rule treated jolla high take stand bullying	The D'apos rule, however, did treat Jolla High as a bully.
70	child safety fredericksburg three key preventing bully encounter	Children's safety and security Fredericksburg three keys to prevent the thugs from meeting.
70	ashley nj teen launch anti bullying program	Adolescent Ashley N.J. launches an anti-bullying program.
70	charity slam asbo replacement plan tackle anti social behaviour will repla	The slam-as-bo replacement anti-social-behaviour plan will be repeated.
70	resource teacher parent film consequence schoolviolence bullying	The main teacher has filmed the consequences of the violence in the school by intimidating the students of the school.
70	teen creates anti bullying school program	Teenagers create anti-bullying school programs.
70	national attention technological harassment cyber bullying	National Attention Technological Harassment - cyber-bullying.
70	parent student educator tip preventing bullying ten district school organized event	In addition, a number of students attended the event, including a teacher, a teacher, a teacher, and a teacher.
70	book guide child therapist calling week parenting stopbullying	Therapist-guide for children who calls week d' parent education to stop the apos; intimidation.
70	bully sense anxiety relaxation technique	It's just that bullies can sense the relaxation technique of anxiety.
70	standing bully employee leading example excellent article	It's a good example of the kind of work you're doing.
70	bull parent educator guide cyber bullying facebook twitter like changing lif	Guide to Facebook; Peer Educator Cyber Bullying Facebook as Changing Life.
70	final post series bullying work place business handle bullying	L' post-final workplace series s' occupies the intimidation.
70	recording artist michael marisa help bullying victim amazing song video	Michael Marisa, the recording artist, helps the victims of apos; intimidation to make a video of incredible songs.
70	st andrew st michael school hold second annual bullying awareness conference	St. Andrew St. Michael's School is hosting its second annual St. Andrew St. Michael's School Outreach Conference.
70	parent feel helpless bully picking kid tip bully proofing child	Parents feel powerless to choose children.
70	calling participate calling week january	Call for participants January week.
70	ll sporting mine will mac wednesday february anti bullying day	It's going to be my turn on Wednesday, February, the day that I'm going to have to fight it.
70	news workshop preventing bullying positive behavior support school	It is important to understand the role of the police in the prevention of bullying and the prevention of bullying.
70	hurriyet turkish center help workplace bullying victim return job market	The Turkish Hurriyet Centre assists victims of domestic violence to return to the labour market.
70	autism awareness month education key bully	Awareness Month; Autism Education of Key Bullying.
70	loved sense humor article help bully proofing child gt	J&apos loves to write about sensual humour that helps tyrants protect children from bullying.
70	penalty law biased favor bullying school workplace issue	The Sanctions Act promotes intimidation in the workplace.
71	boosting america fashion	I want to boost American fashion.
72	smart money future mixed ahead data earnings market update stock future mi investing money	L' Future Prospects; Smart Money Future Data Market Updates of Future Stock Earnings Me invest money.
72	check finance news stock market gain money stock exchange time famous	Check out the latest news on the stock market to earn money from the famous stock market.
72	wall street set edge labour market data eyed gmt future dow jones	Wall Street's labor market data highlighted the future dow jones.
72	stock future higher investor refocus economy york reuters stock	It's a good idea to invest in a new company, but not in a new one.
72	winning large stock market winning large stock market individual trading stock	Winning large stock exchanges earn large individual stock exchanges.
72	today stock market dow jones industrial average dji nasdaq	The price of the product is the same as the price of the product.
72	stock climb merger deal stock boost onslaught corporate merger market open monday	In addition, the company announced that it would be able to increase its shareholdings by the end of the year.
72	invest stock market money rich investment advice	You can find out more about the latest news on stock markets, stock markets, wealthy investments, wealthy investments and investment advice.
72	market today today stock market dow jones industrial average dji nasdaq info	In addition, there are a number of other markets that offer a range of products and services.
72	stock share online stock trading buy stock online today stock market news sabmiller tale inves	Online stock exchange d' purchase of online stocks today; new spin-off stocks are investing.
72	stock market daily stock market analysis january nse asi retreat	Daily Stock Market Analysis (DSME) January to December.
72	stock climb merger deal stock boost onslaught corporate merger market open monday	In addition, the company announced that it would be able to increase its shareholdings by the end of the year.
73	nyc feb entrepreneur fashion lover networkers join brightnight join	Nyc feb networker fashion-loving entrepreneur join the sleepless night reach.
73	nyfall fashion week feb ny fashion week fall will feb	Fashion Week Fashion Week Fashion Week Fashion Week Fashion Week Fashion Week Fie feb.
73	fashion week fall fashion week hot list hot list fall fashion week check	Fashion Week, Autumn, Fashion Week, Blacklist, Fashion Week, Autumn.
73	eve fashion week nyc entrepreneur fashion lover networkers join brightnight	On the eve of Fashion Week, we are joined by a group of fashion-minded entrepreneurs for a night off from work.
73	brightnight networking entrepreneur smallbiz owner top influencer nyc	Good night, Smallbiz Entrepreneur Networking owner, Smallbiz top influenceur nyc.
74	horse wagering legal sport lounge bet zieralski mike merrigan wife lisa oc tave	Horse betting in legal sports halls was made by Zieralski mike merrigan's wife, Lisa ocve.
74	horse racing handicapping	He's got a handicap in the horse races.
74	laying horse betfair route	Horse fair route.
74	race santa anita friday horse betting money race santa anita park friday janu	The race anita santa silver horse bet money santa anita santa park Friday Janu janu.
74	horse wagering legal sport lounge bet mile existing racetrack tra	Bet on horses in a sports room at kilometre d' an existing racetrack.
74	comment horse racing tip free daily thoroughbred tag betting tip delta down fairground	Comment Horse Runners free tip tag pure-daily blood tip Delta Down Fairground.
74	horse racing factor bet reliable	The horse-racing factor, he's betting on reliability.
74	horse racing oc tavern bar state offer track horse betting	Horse-racing tavern bar, offers horse-betting.
74	saturday horse racing betting advice	I'll give you an update on the betting on the horse races.
75	facebook privacy setting jour	This is the first time that j&apos has come into contact with them.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	facebook privacy setting user facebook privacy setting extremely detailed	Privacy Configuration User Facebook Privacy Configuration Extremely detailed.
75	watch video learn protect privacy identity personal safety facebook profile	Watch Video Learn to Protect Privacy Personal Identity Personal Security Profile facebook.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	social medium marketing medical field facebook privacy hcsm	Social media medical media Facebook Privacy field hcsm hcsm.
75	facebook profile harvested setting dating site facebook user unwitting	Facebook Facebook Facebook encounter profile collected involuntary Facebook user.
75	changing facebook place privacy setting opportunity business location based mobile marketin	It's a very important part of the business, and it's a very important part of the business.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	naughty facebook started sharing personal detail site day turn fb	Naughty facebook started to share personal details on day fb tour fb.
75	facebook privacy breakthrough	Facebook has made a breakthrough in the area of privacy.
75	change facebook privacy setting	Change the privacy settings of Facebook.
75	stealth mode making invisible facebook personal finance news yahoo fina	This is a stealth mode that makes invisible personal financial news facebook yahoo fina.
75	facebook privacy setting nicholas jackson facebook privacy option	Nicholas Jackson Facebook Privacy Privacy option.
75	protect personal facebook	Protect your own facebook.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	facebook finally offer http change setting	Facebook Finally offer the http Change Configuration.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	news update step checking facebook privacy	Facebook Privacy Verification Update.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	stealth mode making invisible facebook personal finance news yahoo fina	This is a stealth mode that makes invisible personal financial news facebook yahoo fina.
75	facebook bug allows personal data access phishing repaired washington feb facebook security	The facebook bug will allow you to hide your personal data from the repaired Washington facebook security.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	cnn hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature pa	Cnn hack facebook will unlock facebook security by adding the security function pa pa.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	great tip protecting privacy facebook receive lot question	This is a great way to protect your privacy and receive lots of questions.
75	minute update setting facebook secure enabling http	Configuration of the update of the facebook minutes securing l' activation of http.
75	will facebook privacy seriously site import facebook profile permission cnn	Confidentiality facebook seriously site d' allow Facebook profile import.
75	official facebook video talking privacy setting watch	The video on Facebook talks about d' a private life.
75	facebook instant personalization endangers online privacy consider disabling	Instant personalization of Facebook puts privacy on-line at risk.
75	full http support facebook making site secure user fb	Full http facebook support render the site user secure fb.
75	stealth mode making invisible facebook personal finance news yahoo fina	This is a stealth mode that makes invisible personal financial news facebook yahoo fina.
75	blog protect facebook account hacker fbs security feature	Blog protect your facebook hacker fbs account security feature.
75	facebook roll encryption wake ceo fan hacked security central facebook	Facebook is rolling wake fan fan encryption fan Ceo hacked the central security facebook.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	cnn tech hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature afte	Cnn tech hack unlocks facebook security by adding an after-the-fact security feature.
75	change security setting facebook protect account international business time	Configuration of the security of change-of-facebook to protect your user time; international account.
75	famous facebook flip flop social networking goliath number hasty move year	The famous Facebook flip social network flop number Goliath move fast moving year fast.
75	hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature pair	Hack facebook will unlock facebook security by adding a pair of security features.
75	facebook adding full http support website secure user fb	Facebook add the complete secure user-friendly http web site fb.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	changing facebook place privacy setting roll facebook place location glo	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
75	tech hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature pair	Facebook techno hack will unlock facebook security by adding a pair of security features.
75	facebook great personal careful reveal online privacy security	Facebook is a great way to reveal the security of your personal life online.
75	privacy setting facebook user	Configuration of the user's privacy.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	facebook instant personalization privacy setting sharing innermost secret	Instant confidentiality of the most intimate secrets-sharing facebook personalization.
75	tech cnn hack facebook unlocks security facebook adding security feature	Facebook PCN hack technology unlocks facebook security by adding a security feature.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
75	facebook privacy setting user	L' Privacy User Facebook is a user.
76	sundance time catch celebrity sighting glimpse going sundance festival	L' hour of the sun dance allows the celebrities to see the sun dance festival.
76	huffingtonpost sundance film festival james franco three company installation	Huffingtonpost Sundance Festival James has three of the company's facilities.
76	james franco sundance drag	James Franco sundance's drag.
76	paul rudd jesse peretz bushy beard sundance comedy idiot brother paulrudd jesseperetz sundance	Paul Rudd Jesse Peretz, bearded actor, idiot, brother Pauludd Jesseperetz, bearded actor.
76	james franco wig sundance jared blogging inside decked bing bar	J'ai aussi disponible en français.
76	actress farmiga sundance directing debut reuters reuters vera farmiga big breakout	L&apos farmographic actress sundance realizing early reuters reuters will farmiga great escape.
76	anton yelchin choked felicity jones mtv sundance celebrity photo booth	Anton Yelchin smothered Felicity Jones mtv Sundance photo stand of celebrities.
76	star head sundance	Sundance of the sun's head; star.
76	kristin kreuk sundance stroll rachael leigh cook kristin kreuk rachael leigh cook greet crowd	Kristin Kreuk Sunset Walk redeemedael leigh kristin kreuk kitchen redeemedael leigh cooking leigh greeting crowd.
76	sundance film festival celebrity sighting	Sun Film Festival, celebrities in sight.
76	star head sundance	Sundance of the sun's head; star.
76	james franco wear blonde wig sundance	James Franco wears a blonde wig, sundance.
76	moviefone intrview makingof interview sundance filed celebrity interview video sundance film fe	Moviefone intrview making of interview sundance deposited a video of the interviews of celebrities sundance film f f f f f f f f f f f f.
76	elizabeth olsen sundance film festival debut sister footstep theatrical	Elizabeth Olsen Sundance Film Festival First Sister No Theatrical Theatre.
76	check interviewing danny glover houseofswagg sundance thedreamisreal	Check out Danny Glover House ofswagg sundance's Thedreamisrealreal interview.
76	hott cold sundance film festival lola blog	Hott cold Sundance festival film lola blog.
76	photo sundance film festival star park city utah	Sundance Photo Festival star film park Utah city.
76	celebrity sighting sundance film festival	Celebrities catch a glimpse of the Sun Dance Film Festival.
76	sundance day strange celebrity encounter steve carell elijah wood full day sundanc	On Sundays, strange celebrities meet Elijah Wood all day.
76	james franco suzanne summer will nom tmrw	James Franco Suzanne Summer appointed tmrw.
76	james franco best actor nom mobbed sundance film festival	James Franco Best Actor Name Mobbed Sundance Film Festival.
76	demi moore ashton kutcher sexy sundance showbiz spy	That's Moore Ashton Kutcher Sexy Sundance, show biz spy.
76	chelsea handler cozy andre balazs sundance	This is Chelsea Handler Cozy andre Balazs Sundance.
76	james franco sundance drag	James Franco sundance's drag.
76	james franco sundance drag tmz	James Franco sundance... drag tmz.
76	booker tweet sundance film festival brings brick city park city	The booker has been tweeting the Sun Film Festival bringing Brick City Park City.
76	mnh photo sundance film festival	It's called the Sun Dance Film Festival.
76	photo blair underwood sundance film festival park city utah promoting film homework	Photo by Blair Underwood Sundance Film Festival Town Parc d' Utah Film Duty Promotion.
76	cent sundance work progess	C' is a d&apos work; before-garde.
76	james franco sundance drag	James Franco sundance's drag.
76	celebrity sighting sundance film festival	Celebrities catch a glimpse of the Sun Dance Film Festival.
76	catch janelle monae prince msg unreal sundance sexytime park city	Chop Janelle Monae Prince Msg irresistible Sundance Sextime Park City.
76	sundance interview demi moore airing tonight	Interview with Sunance Demi Moore aired tonight.
76	post celebrity news chelsea handler recount sundance weekend kendra wilkinson hugh hefner	Chelsea handler reports on Sundance's weekend-end Kendra Wilkinson Hugh Hefner.
76	sundance day strange celebrity encounter steve carell elijah wood full day sundanc	On Sundays, strange celebrities meet Elijah Wood all day.
76	john salley sundance	That's John Salley Sundance.
76	bryan safi brett erlich sundance bryan safi brett erlich braved cold swiped swag	Browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse browse.
76	mary kate ashley olsen younger sister hit sundance	Mary Kate Ashley, Olsen's younger sister, has hit Sundance.
76	sundance today tobey maguire demi moore kate bosworth tobey maguire waitin	Today in Half Maguire Moore Kate Bosworth in Maguire to wait in Maguire.
76	sundance film festival bing style check scene sundance film festival bing	Sun Film Festival Bing style verification scene Sun Festival Bing Sun Film Festival bing.
76	anton yelchin choked felicity jones mtv sundance celebrity photo booth	Anton Yelchin smothered Felicity Jones mtv Sundance photo stand of celebrities.
76	sundance sexytime park city sundance	This is Sundance Sextime Park City Sundance.
76	makeshift portrait studio sundance	The Sun Dance in the Fortune Portrait Studio.
76	elizabeth olsen sundance breakout star elizabeth olsen hit premiere movie martha marcy marl	Elizabeth Olsen Sundance Star Elizabeth Olsen premiered Martha Marcy Marl.
76	phife dawg atcq speaking sundance film festival video	Phife dawg atcq, talking about the Sundance Film Festival video.
76	kate bosworth happy sundance day	Kate Bosworth Happy sunny day.
76	post james franco sings sundance	"James ""and, Sundance &quot."
76	best photo day sundance swag edition eminem chuck dueces best pic	Best Sunday photo of the swag eminem chuck edition of the swag best photo.
76	penn badgley snowboarding sundance penn badgley snowboard burton snowboard park city mountai	Penn badgley snowboard sundance penn badgley snowboard burton snowboard city center Mountai.
76	robert redford open anniversary sundance film festival protest planned	Robert Redford organizes a celebration of the Sundance Film Festival.
76	sundance familiar territory elizabeth bank omg	Elizabeth Bank Omg.
76	tmz sez james franco sundance drag filed james franco hitechcj	Tmz sez james fran sundance drag james hitechcj.
76	gallery celebrity sighting sundance film festival	Sun Dance Film Festival with celebrities in the gallery.
76	le site picked bmw lab james franco blond sundance advice wannabe nude art model	The site has chosen a blonde-blond-blonde-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-blond-haired model.
76	star head sundance	Sundance of the sun's head; star.
76	mario lopez rick foxx dr jackson avery grey sundance	Mario Lopez Rick Foxx Dr Jackson very gray Sundance.
76	best picture lil jon sundance	Best Picture Lil Jon Sundance.
76	sundance zooey deschanel rocking miniskirt blazer degree weather	Sunance zooey Deschanel throw blazer blazer miniskirt degree weather.
76	celebrity sighting sundance film festival	Celebrities catch a glimpse of the Sun Dance Film Festival.
76	urban gossip iphone app event fab ybf celebs hit sundance film festival yb africanamerican	Urban rumors iphone fab event ybf celebrities hit the yb Afro U.S. sun film festival.
76	photo star sundance hollywood contingent set shop mid	It's the only place where you can get the information you need.
76	lizzie olsen storm sundance film festival kevin dolak buzz worthy film premiering week	Lizzie Olsen Storm Sundance Kevin Dolak Film Festival buzzing movie first week of film.
76	eliza dushku drop sundance adorable ll admit thing eliza dushku	"Dushku Drop Sundance ""Admit-on."
76	james franco platinum blonde hilarious jac	James platinum hilarious Jac.
76	chris hemsworth lead celebrity storm tao sundance ministry appreciates sundance film festival founder	Chris Hemsworth, Prime Minister of the Sunstroke Ministry, credits the founder of the Sunstroke Film Festival.
77	whycollegenow present college scholarship fantastic post college scholar	Why Collegenow present the Fantastic University Scholarship post-university.
77	financial aid low income student sdut	Low Income Student Financial Assistance sdut.
77	cost financial aid chicago school professional psychology	Financial Assistance Professional psychology; School of Chicago.
77	workshop offer help student aid form regional workshop open help faf	The program is designed to provide students with the tools they need to make the transition to a knowledge-based economy.
77	student juvenile arthritis apply college scholarship staff report arthritis foundation	Soldiers improve target precision on sniper course Valcartier, QC – Course tests ability to hit targets in varying weather.
77	master phd scholarship university manitoba canada beasiswa scholarship	Graduate Studies at the University of Manitoba Canada.
77	calum miller mba scholarship university edinburgh uk beasiswa scholarship	Postdoctoral Fellowship; Miller Mba de l'apos, PhD; Edinburgh University of Beasiswa.
77	pell grant set academic year	The Pell Scholarship is awarded annually by the University of British Columbia.
77	time thinking financial aid join fafsa day sunday dean	Time to think about the next generation; financial assistance to join the dean's office on Sunday.
77	fuji xerox setsutaro kobayashi memorial fund foreign student grant japan beasi	Fuji xerox setsutaro kobayashi Memorial Fund for Japan beasi beasi Foreign Students.
77	tracyjones college student file fafsa fafsa government eligibility	Tracyjones University student file, Fafsa fafsa, eligibility of the government.
77	assistance offered student aid form	In addition, there are a number of initiatives underway to improve the quality of life of Canadians.
77	cal grant financial aid application california student launched student maximize aid option app	If you want to apply for a grant, you have to apply for a grant, and you have to apply for a grant.
77	great info college financial aid time apply	Great Info Time d' College Financial Assistance; Applied.
77	announcement lyon township high school host free college financial planning seminar feb patch	Announcement that lyon township high school d' organize free seminar of financial planning of the colleges feb patch fe fe fe fefe.
77	toyota renews scholarship program donation american indian college fund denver jan prnewswi	Toyota is renewing the U.S. Denver Jan prnewswi Native American College Scholarship Program.
77	unique college scholarship student	He is a one-time student at the University of British Columbia.
77	mba scholarship nottingham university business school uk beasiswa scholarship	MBA Scholarship for l' Business School of l' University of Nottingham Scholarship Uk beasiswa.
77	uic scholarship aid uic honor college business student university illinois chicago scholarship	University of Apos; University of Illinois; University of Apos; University of Applied Sciences; University of Chicago; University of Chicago.
77	college best financial aid arizona state university	University of Apos, Arizona.
77	black men america scholarship deadline february female student apply	The deadline for the Black Men's U.S. Scholarship Program is February.
77	kid set college time fill fafsa	Time spent at the university by children fills the gap.
77	asia pacific entrepreneur award golden key international honour society beasiswa scholarship	A Beasiswa Scholarship from the International Society of Apos; Honour.
77	find free college grant money find free college grant money find free college gran grant	Finding the place; Scholarship money; Free studies; Finding the place; Scholarship money; Free studies; Finding the place; Scholarship money.
77	applying financial aid groundless myth	Applying the Principles; Financial Assistance Unfounded myth.
77	live state massachusetts financial aid college	It's a good idea to go to school.
77	international scholarship bangor university uk beasiswa scholarship	This program is available in English, French, German, German, German, German, German, German, German, German and German.
77	thing private scholarship college solution usnews	This is a scholarship, a school, a school, a school.
77	beth yarrow memorial award medical science university south wale australia beasi	Beth Yarrow Memorial Award Winner for Medical Science University of South Wale australia beasi.
77	scholarship advice inside financial aid office college planning help	It is also important to note that there are a number of factors that influence the success of the program.
77	applying federal student aid fear fafsa	Federal support for students is fearful.
77	phd position biophysical chemistry lund university sweden beasiswa scholarship	Ph.D. Ph.D. degree in Biophysics and Chemistry, University of Lund sweden beasiswa.
77	news release high school student apply scholarship novec electric cooperative	Press release Students apply for a scholarship to study at a co-operative in Ottawa.
77	cash college workshop tomorrow find location	University's money tomorrow.
77	master scholarship international relation austria beasiswa scholarship	Scholarships and fellowships are awarded to students in the field of international relations.
77	strader organ scholarship competition college conservatory music university cincinnati usa university	Cincinnati University Conservatory Music School; Cincinnati University Music Conservatory; Cincinnati University Music School.
77	sixth annual avnet tech game offer scholarship networking opportunity winning student will	Sixth Annual Technology Game d' offering Student Winning Networking Awards will be.
77	asia center graduate summer grant harvard university usa beasiswa scholarship	University of British Columbia, University of British Columbia, Faculty of Arts, University of British Columbia.
77	financial aid help woman school hispanic scholarship	Financial assistance to assist Hispanic students to obtain a scholarship.
77	financial aid proper method financial aid education applying financial aid financial aid essay	Financial assistance Financial assistance Financial assistance Financial assistance Financial assistance Financial assistance Financial assistance; financial assistance; financial assistance.
77	beaumont quartet scholarship beaumont high girl signed letter intent college	Scholarship of the Beaumont Beaumont High Girl quartet Signed letter d' intention college.
77	undergraduate scholarship international college hotel management australia beasiswa schola	Scholarship for the international undergraduate degree in the management of hotels in Australia.
77	college scholarship white picket college tag college financial aid college scholarship money college sch	Fellowship, Studies, Picket, Fellowship, Studies, Financial Assistance, Fellowship, Studies, Fellowship, Studies.
77	post financial aid college lt gt financial advice lt gt popular lt gt lt gt	After that, the college offers financial assistance.
77	winning scholarship college third edition in college scholarship auction ebay	University of Calgary; University of Calgary; University of Calgary; University of Calgary; University of Calgary; University of Calgary; University of Calgary.
77	undergraduate scholarship university ontario institute technology uoit canada beasiswa	This program is available to students who wish to pursue a post-graduate degree.
77	academic merit scholarship melbourne institute business technology indonesia beasiswa	Melbourne University Award of Merit - Institute of Commercial Technology, Inconesia beasiswa.
77	financial aid pry money cold stingy finger financial aid office appeal fafsa finan	Financial assistance; financial assistance; financial assistance; financial assistance; financial assistance.
77	find college scholarship money scholarship institute	Find a bursary institute; university studies.
77	time start applying college scholarship literally thousand scholarship	It's time to start applying the scholarship to the university, and to start applying it to students.
77	lh ainsworth cancer scholarship university south wale australia beasiswa	Lh ainsworth Fellowship in Cancer Studies The University of South Wale australia beasiswa.
77	john orr award university edinburgh uk beasiswa scholarship	Dr. John Orr is a graduate student at the University of Edinburgh.
77	college funding financing help free scholarship money technorati tag college funding college	University funding assists with scholarships; free technology studies college funding; university.
77	postdoctoral fellowship cancer duke university usa beasiswa scholarship	Postdoctoral Fellowships in Cancer Research Duke University of Alberta Beasiswa Fellowship.
77	crowley expands scholarship program nicaragua exemplary student awarded scholarship	Crowley is expanding the Nicaragua Scholarship Program.
78	tax proposed fund flood relief	Proposed environmental tax; mitigation of environmental damage; flood.
78	cost australia flooding enormous news atlanta nyc	It's a great opportunity to learn more about water quality and water quality.
78	cbc ticker southeast australia brace flood australia deadly flood crisis forced people	The southern cbc ticker-is from the island; Australia's flood pinnacle flood crisis; deadly flooding forced people to use force.
78	australia flooding cost enormous	Floods in Australia are also very expensive.
78	australia flooding cost enormous flooding australia people making	It was the first flood in the world to take place in Australia.
78	australia deadly flood crisis forced people flee home monday vast swath muddy water spr	It is estimated that the number of people displaced from their homes in the region will increase by about 10 per cent from the previous year.
78	australia brace flood	Flooding d' an Australian-made neck brace.
78	australia brace flood giant inland sea floodwater will spread australian state vi	In addition, there are a number of other sea-levels, such as the Great Lakes, the Great Lakes and the Great Lakes.
78	scary cyclone yasi compare latest news queensland flood news au	Terrible Cyclone Yasi compares breaking news of flooding in Queensland.
78	queensland flood blog arrived brisbane january surprised green	The blog Queensland flood blog came brisbane January surprised green.
78	southeast australia set week flood	It's been a long time since we've been able to make a difference in the world.
79	check darth vader superbowl ad hysterical vw academy commercial starring bill hater hadder	Check out superbowl darth vader and hysterical vw trade academy featuring Bill Hater Hadder.
79	watch bud light superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Look at the superbowl of bud light, the commercial chain youtube ad blitz.
79	motorola attack apple superbowl commercial motorola apple	Motorola attacks commercial superbowl apple motorola apple.
79	superbowl commercial kale fooducate	This product is available in a variety of formats.
79	video favorite superbowl commercial cute	Video Preferred Super Bowl advert cute.
79	ford commercial win superbowl	It's the Ford brand winning the Super Bowl.
79	kia epic ride commercial	Kia epic rides, Kia epic rides, Kia epic rides.
79	motorola xoom super bowl commercial tip hat apple spot video	Motorola Xoom Super Bowl commercial video peak apple video spot hat.
79	superbowl commercial doritos pepsi stoked commercial sucked	Doritos pepsi commercial super bowl stoked commercial suce aspirated pub.
79	bud light good start superbowl	Superbowl light bud good start, superbowl.
79	chrysler air super bowl commercial	Commercial Super Bowl Chrysler Air.
79	enjoyed vw beetle commercial superbowl favorite	J&apos liked the beetle's favourite commercial superbowl.
79	commercial superbowl beer doritos car	Superbowl of doritos commercial doritos beer.
79	cb super bowl commercial favorite	Cb Commercial Preferred Super Bowl.
79	best super bowl commercial year bridgestone beaver	Best Super Bowl in the Bridgestone Beaver Commercial Year.
79	eminem brisk bizarre hip hop commercial	Eminem suddenly weird, weird hip-hop advert.
79	check video super bowl heineken commercial verry funny	It's a gameplay video of the Super Bowl heineken.
79	cutest vader volkswagen star war commercial air super bowl	This is the cutest Vader Volkswagen Star War in the world.
79	waiting tasteless violent pepsi tribute ronald reagan commercial superbowl	Waiting for a violent tribute pepsi of bad taste to Ronald Reagan, superbowl commercial.
79	best commercial superbowl imported detroit chrysler spot	Best commercial super bowl imported from Detroit Chrysler spot.
79	volkswagen sneak peek cute superbowl commercial fav	Volkswagen takes a look at some of the best-loved and best-selling commercial Super Bowl Eyes.
79	commercial liking superbowl pepsi	Commercial who likes super bowl pepsi.
79	issue super bowl commercial	Advertise the Super Bowl.
79	volkswagen super bowl commercial force	Super Bowl Volkswagen sales force.
79	gonna lie bud light commercial musketeer pretty funny superbowl	I will m&apos m' elongate light bud commercial musketeer quite funny superbowl fun.
79	superbowl kia optimum epic ride big game commercial bimarketing blog comunidade market	Superbowl kia optimal epic big commercial game comunidade blog bimarketing market.
79	problem doritos commercial punchline start superbowl	Doritos problems Super Bowl SuperBowl commercial startup joke.
79	complete list super bowl commercial advertiser youtube	Complete listing Super Bowl advertizing advert youtube.
79	dorritos pepsi commercial tyrant superbowl commercial	Pepsi Dorritos commercial tyran superbowl commercial superbowl commercial superbowl.
79	chevy volt commercial prolly best simple tell great story nicely brandbowl superbowl	Chevy Commercial Volt prolly better simply tell a beautiful story markbowl superbowl.
79	cutest superbowl commercial darth vader	Cutest commercial Super Bowl ever made by Darth Vader.
79	watch chrysler superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Watch the chrysler superbowl, the commercial superbowl youtube ad blitz channel.
79	happy friday volkswagen super bowl ad ur fav superbowl ad time	Happy Friday Super Bowl Volkswagen Super Bowl and Super Bowl time.
79	best superbowl commercial year stella adrian brody	Best Super Bowl in the Stella Adrian Brody Commercial Year.
79	bad best commercial movie trailer random urge buy doritos bud light superbowl	The trailer announces the best commercial movie bad wish to buy budding doritos superbowl light.
79	don rooting superbowl volkswagen budweiser best commercial	I'd like to thank you for your time and for your support.
79	ad watch blogging commercial nyt	Watch commercial advertising nyt nyt bloger nyt nyt.
79	super bowl commercial	Super Bowl ads.
79	volkswagon commercial superbowl	Commercial Volkswagon Superbowl.
79	watch sony ericsson superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Look at Ericsson superbowl commercial blitz channel youtube.
79	happy friday volkswagen super bowl ad ur fav superbowl ad time	Happy Friday Super Bowl Volkswagen Super Bowl and Super Bowl time.
79	favorite superbowl commercial doritos snicker darth vader volkswagen commercial pretty funny	The commercial super bowl, the commercial super bowl, the super bowl, the super bowl, the super bowl, the super bowl.
79	best commercial hold closer tiny dancer budlight superbowl	Best advert to keep close the superbowl of dancers' light.
79	lmao didn feistyoldpeople chevy commercial superbowl	Imao napos has not driven people from Chevy Superbowl commercial.
79	imported detroit best commercial superbowl chrysler	From Detroit, the best superbowl of all time.
79	beetle commercial creative superbowl great teaser	Superbowl commercial, creative, big-teaser beetle.
79	favorite superbowl commercial vw	Preferred VW Commercial Superbowl!
79	motorola xoom superbowl ad reference	Motorola xoom superbowl.com.
79	doritos pepsi zone commercial woman bear superbowl	Doritos pepsi is a commercial area for women.
79	dumb as skechers commercial wack as kimkardashian superbowl worst	Stupid as the skechers advertising wack like superbowl superbowl kimkardashian worst.
79	watch volkswagen superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel escarabaajoos	Look at Volkswagen Superbowl ads youtube ad blitz canal escarabaajoos.
79	vote best superbowl commercial time awesome	Vote the Best Advertising Time of the Super Bowl.
79	superbowl budweiser product placement favorite commercial	Superbowl Budweiser Preferred Commercial Investment Product.
79	brasky doritos commercial win superbowl	Brasky Doritos wins the superbowl.
79	chevy run deep chevrolet commercial superbowl ad check imabuzzagent	Chevrolet deep Chevrolet superbowl advertisement check imabuzzagent.
79	andreawoo talked chrysler superbowl commercial	Etreawoo just mentioned the Chrysler Superbowl commercial.
79	doritos superbowl commercial	Commercial Super Bowl Doritos.
79	pepsi max bringing nite wait mcdonalds note commercial rule nfl superbowl brandbowl	Pepsi max bringing nite mcdonalds expectation note the nfl commercial rule superbowl markbowl rule.
79	popular superbowl commercial superbowl view feb fb share tweet	The popular commercial superbowl fb fb fb superbowl game shares the tweet.
79	volkswagen commercial force superbowl toocute	Volkswagen superbowl sales force toocute superbowl.
79	diddy star superbowl ad mercedes diddy featured superbowl ad mercedes	It's a good thing that you're looking for, but it's not a good idea.
79	doritos creep best commercial superbowl	Doritos attract the best commercial Super Bowls in the world.
79	budwiser continued commercial air superbowl sunday swag	It's not a big deal, but it's a big deal.
79	superbowl commercial kale fitblog	This is a superb commercial kale fitblog.
79	best super bowl commercial commercial super bowl cream advertisi	Best Commercial Super Bowl Super Bowl Super Bowl Advertisi Cream Advertising.
79	hilarious doritos commercial pitched superbowl	Laughing commercial Doritos have launched the Super Bowl.
79	ditto pepsi max commercial win lmao superbowl	Says Pepsi max advertising earn lmao superbowl.
79	watching superbowl check chrysler commercial omg	Watch Superbowl check omg commercial Chrysler omg omg.
79	super bowl commercial	Super Bowl ads.
79	motorward kia optimum epic ride super bowl commercial	Kia Epic Optimum Epic Super Bowl Ring Engine Commercial.
79	ford paid shit load commercial air time superbowl	Ford paid for the shit, the apos time, commercial antenna superbowl.
79	youtube video sauna doritos superbowl commercial ad	Superbowl commercial advertisement video Youtube sauna doritos superbowl.
79	fast black beetle	Oh, quick black beetle.
79	audi commercial best superbowl	Audi, the Best Commercial Super Bowl.
79	superbowl ad ehhhh doritos funny lame brandbowl	It's a fun game to play with.
79	teamfollowback super bowl commercial doritos don hurt dog dog	Commercial Super Bowl Doritos do not harm dogs.
79	great commercial vw america video volkswagen passat super bowl xlv commercial	I've got a lot of video ads from the U.S.A. and a lot of commercials from the Super Bowl.
79	hit em kenny love audi commercial superbowl	It's a great way to get to know a lot of people.
79	feed epic sci fi car ad kia optimum super bowl commercial video trendhunter supe	Feed epic car science and optimal Super Bowl commercial trendhunter video supe.
79	worth daughter loved chrysler commercial watched time hulu save detroit	A girl worthy of the name loved Chrysler ads and watched as Hulu saved Detroit.
79	volkswagen star war commercial dominates super bowl twitter buzz	War Star Volkswagen, War Advertising, dominates the buzz twitter super bowl.
79	pug dorrito commercial best	Pug dorrito is one of the best in the business world.
79	super bowl commercial	Super Bowl ads.
79	guru guide super bowl commercial favorite watch	Guru Guide Super Bowl - Preferred Commercial Watch watch.
79	chrysler minute commercial worth penny	Chrysler-minute penny-worth commercial.
79	super bowl prediction volkswagen commercial force beat audi goodnight commercial seo	Super bowl prediction volkswagen commercial strength beating audi good commercial night seo night.
79	pack vw superbowl darth vader commercial easily best well vw	Vw superbowl varth vader vader vw superbowl pack.
79	revenge pug doritos nailed super bowl commercial	Revenge pug doritos commercial Super Bowl nailed.
79	wait vw beetle great commercial superbowl commercial beetle bug	Wait for VW coleoptera large commercial superbowl insect commercial insect beetle insect.
79	didn doritos commercial boring superbowl	Dull commercial doritos, superbowl.
79	doritos didn superbowl commercial dead	Doritos has a super bowl commercial dead.
79	commercial motorola xoom suck people apple tool sb superbowl	The commercial engine xoom suck people's apple tool sb superbowl.
79	mercedes benz class coupe sl amg roadster revealed superbowl commercial tmr	Mercedes coupé class benz amg roadster has revealed its commercial superbowl tmr.
79	watch chevrolet commercial superbowl	Watch Chevrolet Superbowl commercial.
79	doritos commercial vote funniest superbowl commercial	"Doritos ""Voting; Doritos"" Doritos ""Voting; Superbow&quot."
79	superbowl sucked pepsi max commercial prob best	I'd like to thank you very much for your time.
79	favourite commercial superbowl volkswagen commercial force	Volkswagen Superbowl Preferred Commercial Strength.
79	view detriot chrysler superbowl commercial	For more information, please visit our website at www.cra.gc.ca.
79	best ad super bowl darth vader passat commercial	The best Super Bowl advert for Vader Passat is the Vader Passat advert.
79	awesome bold superbowl commercial seriously going consider xoom tablet ipad	This is a super-daring ad for a superbowl that will seriously consider a new Xoom ipad tablet.
79	motorola xoom super bowl commercial tip hat apple spot video	Motorola Xoom Super Bowl commercial video peak apple video spot hat.
79	eminem brisk super bowl commercial	Commercial Super Bowl live Eminem.
79	chevy cruze comm fb feed captain america hell carmax comm superbowl commercial	Chevy cruze comm fb fb feed U.S. Captain Hell carmax com superbowl commercial.
79	pepsi putting mobile play super bowl advertising marketing branding mobile pepsi superbowl pr	Pepsi put mobile play Super Bowl marketing advert brand superbowl mobile pepsi.
79	budweiser wild west tiny dancer commercial definitely favorite superbowl	Budweiser Wild West mini commercial dancer definitely favourites superbowl.
79	vote favorite superbowl commercial poll don love	Vote for a survey of opinions.
79	car commercial boring volkswagon enjoyed superbowl spot	A boring commercial car, the Volkswagon, enjoyed the superbowl spot.
79	darth vader volkswagen commercial best super bowl commercial youtube	Darth Vader Volkswagen is the best commercial Super Bowl commercial youtube youtube.
79	favorite superbowl motorola xoom tablet swipe apple tonight	Superbowl favorite xoom tablet motorola slide apple tonight.
79	chrysler air super bowl commercial	Commercial Super Bowl Chrysler Air.
79	thumb xoom super bowl commercial great dig earphone	The Xoom Super Bowl is a super-sophisticated, high-performance, high-performance headphones.
79	missed chrysler riveting imported detroit superbowl ad eminem youtube	Chrysler missed the superbowl imported from Detroit.
79	music featured motorola xoom super bowl commercial	Music featured Xoom Super Bowl commercial motorola.
79	dragon cute drinking cola superbowl cocacola commercial	A dragon-cute drinker of superbowl cola, a Coca-Cola commercial.
79	commercial going sunday super bowl favorite word beetle superbowl	Advertising goes on Sunday to Super Bowl favorite word, beetle superbowl.
79	doritos commercial funniest	Commercial Doritos is the funniest.
79	sneak peak superbowl ad lover super bowl ad watch big game	Super Bowl is a great game to watch and enjoy.
79	volkswagen darth vader commercial good bet super bowl wager	Super Bowl bets Volkswagen darth commercial vader.
79	inproductive minute brilliant volkswagen commercial aired superbowl trekkie	Brilliant unproductive Minute Volkswagen broadcast superbowl trekkkie.
79	check video chrysler eminem imported detroit super bowl commercial ad	"Watch the video ""Chrysler Eminem"" imported from Detroit Super Bowl."
79	completely freaky sense sony xperia play commercial kind awesome creepy thumb superbowl	Scary Xperia sound plays commercial genre, scary scary scary superbowl.
79	great advertising vw passat darth vader commercial	Vw passat darth commercial vader advert.
79	ffing football watching commercial st half doritos bridgestone faves superbowl	Watching the St. Doritos Bridgestone ads is a great way to play football.
79	best commercial superbowl doritos guy saved best haha	Superbowl's finest player Doritos saved the best haha.
79	worst best super bowl commercial video	This is the worst commercial video ever made in the history of Super Bowl.
79	super bowl commercial report card ranking winner loser bleacher report	Super Bowl, trade bulletin, winners' rankings, losers' reports, filing cabinets, filing cabinets.
79	force strong great ad volkswagon superbowl commercial	Make the Volkswagen Super Bowl a big advertisement.
79	youtube video brisk eminem super bowl commercial	Eminem Super Bowl is a game that you can play on video.
79	audi green car superbowl commercial top ten super bowl commercial time	Top 10 Super Bowl Commercial Super Bowl Commercial Super Bowl Commercial Time.
79	love coke commercial dragon superbowl	J' loves the Coke Superbowl.
79	audi dream superbowl commercial	Commercial Audi Dream Superbowl.
79	volkswagen commercial force best commercial darthvader passat	Volkswagen's market power is the best in the business.
79	decide win hyper masculine super bowl audience doritos super bowl ad	The Super Bowl Super Bowl announces that the Super Bowl will be won by the Super Bowl Super Bowl.
79	angry bird commercial superbowl afk kill	It's the first time I've heard of a superbowl.
79	youtube chili pepsi max super bowl commercial pepsi max super bowl commercial jamaal al din nfl	Chili pepsi YouTube max commercial super bowl pepsi max commercial super bowl jamaal al din nfl.
79	face chrysler commercial freaked best superbowl lt	Commercial chrysler freaked out best super bowll lt.
79	commercial video eminem lipton brisk super bowl commercial	Eminem Lipton eminem eminem Lipton Super Bowl commercial video.
79	love hate crime pepsi max commercial lol nice superbowl	J' loves Pepsi Max commercial hate crimes lol super cool super bowl.
79	prudential whale chevy superbowl commercial	Cautious Whale Chevy Super Bowl Whale Commercial Superbowl Commercial Superbowl.
79	audi luxury prison break super bowl commercial	Commercial Audi Luxurious Super Bowl Break Prison.
79	great commercial superbowl audi pretty good jab mercedes	I liked the quality of the gameplay and the gameplay.
79	youtube video gm chevy super bowl commercial bumblebee	Gm video YouTube super bowl bumblebee gm video bumblebee commercial.
79	audi super bowl commercial online video audi	Audi Super Bowl Commercial Video Online Audi.
79	favorite superbowl ad pepsi max	I'm a big fan.
79	budwieser commercial tiny dancer hate superbowl	Commercial dancer Budwieser hates superbowl.
79	justin bieber roseanne barr super bowl ad wacky bunch superbowl commercial	Justin Bieber Roseanne Super Bowl and Wacky Bunch Superbowl Commercial.
79	vw superbowl commercial imho winner sweet adorable	Advertising superbowl winner imho sweet adorable.
79	favorited youtube video gm chevy super bowl commercial bumblebee	Youtube favorite video gm video super bumblebee super bumblebee super bowl.
79	advertising social medium technique combine super bowl tv commercial	The advertising of social media technique combine commercial super bowl tv.
79	status chevy cruze super bowl ad love superbowl commercial check imabzzagenr	Chevy Cruze Super Bowl Superbowl commercial love status check imabzzagenr.
79	super cute adzone volkswagen force superbowl ad vader kid think control car	It's very nice to be able to enjoy the game, but it's good to be able to enjoy it.
79	chrysler super bowl commercial brilliant case haven	Commercial Chrysler Super Bowl shiny Haven case.
79	chrysler commercial eminem best bad car terrible superbowl	Commercial Chrysler eminem worst terrible superbowl terrible car.
79	homerun ohio chrysler superbowl commercial struck chord detroiters	Homerun ohio chrysler ad superbowl hit chord of detractors.
79	kia optimum epic ride big game commercial	Epic optimal ride ride Kia commercial game great game.
79	superbowl force volkswagen commercial stellar mrx	Mrx Volkswagen Commercial Stellar Power Superbowl.
79	daddy prefers vw commercial messing mini darth superbowl dadstalking	Dad prefers that I' we're just marketing a mini-superbowl that harasses daddies.
79	kia spent lot money optimum superbowl commercial	Kia has been spending a lot of money; optimized commercial superbowl money.
79	doritos commercial raising dead best night superbowl nfl	Doritos Advertising Rise Death Best Night Super Bowl NFL.
79	pepsi max people laughing commercial kind laugh american idol audition superbowl	Pepsi max people who laugh at the adverts like American-style laughs superbowl audition.
79	youtube video eminem lipton brisk super bowl commercial	Video YouTube eminem lipton vivid Super Bowl commercial.
79	budweiser spamming crappy commercial superbowl beer suck drink micros quit die	Budweiser spamming superbowl commercial beer sucks beverage microphones.
79	kia optimum commercial dumbest	Kia, the stupidest commercial optimum.
79	check video bridgestone unexpected obstacle super bowl xlii commercial	Watch the unexpected Bridgestone video Super Bowl Xlii Xlii Commercial Xlii Impediment.
79	commercial winning audi time luxury prison pepsi max dieting wife husband superbowl	The winning ads audi times deluxe prison Pepsi max max diet woman husband superbowl.
79	top three super bowl commercial	Super Bowl's top three.
79	mercedes benz super bowl commercial	Commercial Benz Super Bowl Mercedes.
79	eminem eminem lipton commercial super bowl bsckids	Eminem eminem ads Super Bowl bsckids.
79	youtube video bud light hack job superbowl commercial	Youtube video bud job hacking superbowl advertisement superbowl.
79	superbowl audi commercial	Commercial Audi Superbowl.
79	volkswagen present best super bowl commercial going second version brill	Volkswagen presents the best Super Bowl advertisement for the Brill Super Bowl.
79	sony ericsson xperia play official super bowl commercial full launch coming february	Sony Ericsson xperia is officially playing the Super Bowl, a commercial game launched in February.
79	watching superbowl darth vader commercial awesome love dude	I'm watching Super Bowl Darth Commercial Vader great love dude.
79	best worst super bowl commercial	Worst-ever Super Bowl commercial.
79	pepsi max ad pepsi refresh message superbowl commercial	Pepsi max ad pepsi will refresh your commercial Superbowl message.
79	superbowl volkswagen commercial force	Volkswagen Superbowl is a supermarket force.
79	superbowl commercial volkswagen force smaller darth vader	This is a great way to get to know a lot more about the game.
79	superbowl pepsi commercial angry girlfriend pretty funny	Pretty funny commercial Superbowl Pepsi angry girlfriend.
79	cc omg love commercial detroit superbowl brandbowl	Cc omg is a big fan of the Detroit Commercial Super Bowl.
79	lt vote budlight commercial thumb superbowl	"Vote for a ""super bowl"" commercial."
79	fave st half commercial doritos grandpa superbowl	Half the big commercial doritos-father superbowl.
79	super bowl commercial	Super Bowl ads.
79	doritos commercial clear doritos work superbowl	The commercial doritos clear doritos are working superbowl.
79	lololol doritos pepsi max killing superbowl commercial	Lolol doritos pepsi max will kill commercial superbowl.
79	newcar audia watch audi superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Newcar Audia watching Audi Superbowl advertising youtube Blitz Channel.
79	physically congratulate pepsi woman physically harmed making commercial brandbowl superbowl	Physically congratulating the physically injured Pepsi by doing commercial superbowl.
79	best superbowl commercial good game night good ad top superbow	The best good-night commercial superbowl good-playing game from the top of the list; rainbow.
79	terrific mercedes benz commercial superbowl extended version promising future	The Mercedes Benz commercial superbowl has been extended, and promises the future.
79	favorited youtube video brisk eminem super bowl commercial	Eminem Super Bowl is a gameplay video game.
79	vw black beetle commercial favorite super bowl ad night	VW Black Beetle Super Bowl Favorite Commercial Night of Advertising.
79	volkswagen commercial black beetle spot st century beetle cutting edg	Mountain Pine Beetle Commercial Volkswagen.
79	kia optimum epic ride super bowl commercial nfl fanhouse	Super Bowl Super Bowl rides are a great way to keep track of the super Bowl fans.
79	budlight commercial superbowl fingerscrossed	Fingers crossed; arc-in-commercial sky.
79	crash super bowl doritos pepsi max pepsico plan user generated commercial	It's a very good idea to have the same color as the one you're using.
79	stella artois superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	I'm a big fan, I'm a big fan, I'm a big fan.
79	eminem super bowl commercial damn chrysler commercial imported detroit	Eminem Super Bowl imported from Detroit.
79	super bowl commercial coca cola commercial coke	Great commercial Coca-Cola, commercial coke, commercial coke.
79	haha arod fed doritos commercial superbowl	Ha-rod fed Doritos Superbowl to the market.
79	doritos commercial guy lick cheese guy finger favorite superbowl commercial	It's a good idea to go to the supermarket and have a supermarket and supermarket.
79	best commercial super bowl imported detroit best	The best imported commercial Super Bowl in Detroit is the best one yet.
79	will write superbowl commercial someday vw take cake	J' Write an ad for the Super Bowl one day.
79	youtube present shawn moore soul reaching spreading love peace faith hope	Youtube present at l' love.
79	doritos funnyass commercial superbowl pug ftw	Doritos comicass commercial superbowl comicase ft commercial superbowl.
79	superbowl commercial big deal	You know, supermarket supermarket big deal.
79	superbowl commercial going bud light doritos pepsi	Superbowl advertising go budding doritos pepsi light.
79	doritos super bowl commercial offensive video dorito	Doritos Super Bowl commercial video dorito video offensive offensive video.
79	kia commercial advertising superbowl commercial snake consuming	Kia commercial advert superbowl consumer snake.
79	poseidon kia commercial awesome superbowl	Commercial Poseidon Kia awesome super bowl super cool.
79	doritos commercial redemption superbowl	Commercial doritos superbowl of doritos redemption.
79	watch audi superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Look at Audi Superbowl, the advertizing channel, youtube ad blitz.
79	hilarious super bowl commercial	Hilarious Super Bowl ad.
79	youtube video chevrolet camaro superbowl commercial al chevrolet hd	You will be able to watch the video clip of the game.
79	imported detroit excellent car commercial paying attention eminen damn superbowl commercial	Imported strait excellent commercial car paying attention eminen super bowl whore commercial.
79	greatest super bowl commercial bridgestone reply youtubeadblitz superbowl sb	The biggest Bridgestone Super Bowl answers superbowl youtubeadblitz sb.
79	watched pugattack hilarious superbowl commercial check vote attack	J' have watched hilarious pugattack superbowl commercial check attack your attack.
79	okaaaay bowled super bowl well official bud light advert	Okaaaay at the Super Bowl Bowling game, officially announced by Bud.
79	superbowl pepsi commercial best	It's the best in the business.
79	thi doritos superbowl commerical hot mess	These commercial doritos superbowl, hot hot messes.
79	doritos best superbowl commercial lmao	Doritos Best Commercial lmao Super Bowl.
79	case haven brilliant motorola xoom ad super bowl	The Xoom engine was the first of its kind in the world.
79	chevy volt super bowl commercial discovery sb sbxlv	Chevy Volt Super Bowl sbxlv sbxlv commercial discovery.
79	doritos commercial super bowl banned sexy ban	The Doritos Super Bowl banned it; it banned it from being sexy.
79	volkswagen black beetle commercial teaser vw set air ad super bowl xlv	It's a good thing you're looking for a great game.
79	superbowl commercial winner vw vader xoom heard price bridgestone beaver	Superbowl commercial winner vw vader xoom has been awarded a bridgestone beaver prize.
79	youtube mercedes benz super bowl commercial	Commercial Benz Super Bowl Mercedes YouTube.
79	superbowl commercial elantra psychedelic groupon wrong cocacola cool elantra win	Superbowl commercial psychedelic groupon cool cocacola win elantra.
79	doritos son funny as superbowl commercial wack	Funny son Doritos like superbowl pub wack.
79	lmao check funny commercial doritos pepsi max	Imao check out the funniest commercial pepsi doritos max.
79	hella funnny drt superbowl funniest doritos commercial	Dr. drnny drt drt superbowl is the funniest Doritos advertisement doritos.
79	super bowl xlv commercial lm	It's a great game.
79	watch coca cola superbowl commercial youtube ad blitz channel	Check out the coca coca superbowl, the commercial chain youtube ad blitz.
79	doritos commercial dog best	Best commercial dog, Doritos.
79	youtube video brisk eminem super bowl commercial	Eminem Super Bowl is a game that you can play on video.
79	best superbowl commercial year chrysler comeback	This is the best return of the Chrysler de l'apos, the commercial year of the super bowl.
79	link superbowl ad motorola xoom tablet parody apple ad release feb	Superbowl link xoom parody tablet ad motorola promo apple feb.
79	definitely forward superbowl commercial year esp steve martin cameo	There's no doubt that it was the commercial year of the superbowl at L' before that, with Steve Martin's superbowl cameo.
79	eminem helped plug commercial yesterday superbowl second superbowlxlv	Eminem helped to put the ad yesterday superbowl 2nd superbowlxlv.
79	hashtags tv ad superbowl audi launch commercial twitter hashtag	Hashtags TV Superbowl Audi commercial launch Twitter hashtags.
79	loved ad chrysler eminem super bowl commercial imported detroit	Eminem Eminem Super Bowl imported from Detroit, Michigan.
79	nice check video chrysler eminem super bowl commercial imported detroit	This is a great video from the Chrysler Eminem Super Bowl, imported from Detroit.
79	video volkswagen invades super bowl darth vader starwars superbowl	Video Video is a gameplay video game that you can play on your computer.
79	hahaha doritoes commercial best superbowl	Hahaha Dornitos Best commercial super bowl.
79	volkswagen star war themed commercial superbowl	Superbowl commercial theme Volkswagen Star War.
79	chrysler telling story well check chrysler commercial imported detroit	Chrysler is the name of the company and the name of Chrysler.
79	doritos wit homo commercial time wit dat la superbowl	Like gay, like the super bowl.
79	doritos super bowl commercial funny second going overboard	Second time, I go through-over the edge.
79	superbowl commercial top number gt force volkswagen	I'd like to thank you very much for your time.
79	super bowl commercial volkswagen favored win seo	The Super Bowl was the first Super Bowl game in the world.
79	pepsi promotes domestic violence crime superbowl ad	The Pepsi promotes the crime of super bowl domestic violence.
80	republican party debt gear	L' Republican Debt Machinery.
80	rnc chair political vip super bowl republican national committee chairman reince priebus posted	Rnc political president vip Super Republican Super Bowl National Committee reince re priebus published.
80	rnc appoints chairman tampa convention effort visit tampa republican nati tampa fl	President of the Tampa Convention Visit to Tampa Republican Nati Tampa fl.
80	rnc money ronald reagan birthday	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
80	update michael steele resigns rnc	Update Michael Steele has resigned from RNC.
80	read open letter michael steele chairman republican national committee rnc tcot	Read the Open Letter Michael Steele Chairman of the Republican National Committee.
80	rnc best shot knocking debt time race leading pack	C&apos is the best time-watch shot in debt.
81	black swan tonight amazing natalie portman talented actress bestmovieever blackswan lt	Tonight's Black Swan starring Natalie Portman is the best film ever written by Blackswan.
81	watched black swan mindblowing watch natalie portman deserves oscar mila kunis love lt	Natalie Portman deserved Oscar Mila Kunis, in love with him.
81	wowsa black swan movie intense stirring hope natalie portman win oscar role	Black swans intense film hope Natalie Portman win Oscar role.
81	black swan artistically perfect portman acting brilliant plot shallow doesn affect overwhelming experience	The black swan, which acts as a shiny, shallow part of the body, does not affect it; the experience is overwhelming.
81	blackswan night amazing natalie portman will win oscar performance	Blackswan Amazing Night Natalie Portman wins performance award.
81	finished watching black swan twisted mental strain take embrace role natalie portman incredible	I'm done watching the twisted, twisted, black swan take on the role of Natalie Portman.
81	black swan amazing natalie portman deserves award doubt will	Natalie Portman, the legendary swan, deserves a prize.
81	black swan night london masterpiece portman oscar	The head chef-d&apos, London-based Portman Oscar, on Black Swan Night.
81	outstanding performance female actress natalie portman black swan sagawards	Natalie Portman Black Swan Sagawards, actress.
81	congratulation natalie portman golden globe sag black swan seriously phenomenal sagawards	Congratulations Natalie Portman Golden Globe Black Swan Sagawards seriously phenomenal.
81	black swan drama purest form portman doesn win academy corrupt aronofsky created masterpiece blackswan	The drama of the purest black swan, Portman, wins the apos; corrupt aronofsky academy created chief-d' blackswan work.
81	obsessed natalie portman black swan amazed beautiful dancer	L' obsessive Natalie Portman Black Swan... astonished the beautiful dancer.
81	natalie portman better win oscar best actress black swan movie amazing time	It would be better if Natalie Portman won the Oscar Award for Best Amazing Weather Swan Black Actress.
81	black swan trippy natalie portman good performance	Natalie Portman, stumbling black swan, good performance.
81	black swan good movie melodramatic natalie portman phenominal shoe best actress	The Good Black Swan Melodramatic Natalie Portman phenomenal shoe best actress.
81	spellbound black swan night budget gross growing natalie amazing hope sweep nomination	The bewitching black swan's overnight budget is growing, Natalie is an incredible candidate for sweeping the apos; hope.
82	orange student dish school lunch white house chef orlando sentinel fl schoollunch letsmove	The orange cook from l' cooking school, the white housekeeper schoollunch sentinelle Orlando let go.
82	charlottesville city school offering student vegetarian option lunch	L&apos, Charlottesville Civic School, offers students a vegetarian lunch.
82	kamut international welcome improvement school nutrition bill	The international bill on improving nutrition in schools is welcome.
82	healthy school food pay save attention going	It's a good idea if you're looking for a place to eat.
83	senator avoiding tea party caucus	The Senate avoids the tea caucus.
83	news sen paul tea party hold power hill predicted tea party movement	The news of the tea festival of Paulin has toured the world.
83	dc medium opt tea party tea party caucus remains vigilant teaparty tcot tlot gop dem	The tea caucus at the middle hour stays alert and teaparty tcot glot gop dem tep.
83	antonin scalia charm tea party caucus simmi aujla politico	The hotel is located in the heart of the city, close to the city centre.
83	senate teabaggers desperate caucusing member teatards tea thursday	Senate tea drinkers desperately caucus their members on Thursday.
84	exsteme makeover grabbing heart don text drive	It's a great place to get your hands on some of the best stuff I've ever seen.
84	texting driving pledge ive close wresting median interstate	Sending a text message to a driver's candidate five times closer to the center of the highway.
84	mann texting driving	Mann texted to drive.
84	signed pledge will text drive awsome orange thumb ring	Signed commitment will send by text an orange ring with the thumb.
84	don dangerous drink drive text drive	Don't be a fool, don't be a fool.
84	follow johnny mac jeanne pledge text drive	Follow Johnny Mac Jeanne on the text disc of his pledges.
84	alex brown	This is Alex Brown.
84	mama texting drive damn raining	Mom keeps texting, it rains like crazy.
84	dont text drive	I don't have a computer.
84	join campaign texting driving save life future will help	Join the campaign by sending a life-saving message.
84	sign text drive	Sign reader text.
84	luster texting driving	Luminous text about driving.
84	good app called auto text reply will auto text office car angel pledge don text drive	A good application called auto-text response will auto-text office because angel don don text drive.
84	teacher talking texting driving haaayy	The teacher speaks of a text message that leads to the end of haayyyy.
84	lt will text drive	There will be a reader of the text.
84	awful watched don text drive video driving class	Don's text-driving class was horribly watched.
84	well cant drive thing will text drive	Well don't drive the text-reading thing.
84	worst person tonight stop will longer text drive	The worst person who stops tonight will have a longer text.
84	commit texting tweeting driving	Please send us-a message.
84	day ago driving started text thought	There's conduct started texting thought of a day ago.
84	podominick texting drive died	Well, the text engine podominick is dead.
84	texan driver promise text drive lt	Texas driver promises text reader.
84	don text drive hey easily turn goodbye	Don't be afraid to say goodbye to your friends.
84	don text drive	Don texting drive.
84	dont text drive safe life safe yourselfs	N' don't even send you-on security of life.
84	seth godin texting working shouldn text driving talk cell phone argue wit	Need a little help.
84	text driving drunk	Drunk-driving text?
84	justin bieber address danger texting driving extreme makeover music celebrity justin bieber	Justin Bieber s' addresses the danger by sending a text message leading to an extreme musical metamorphosis Justin Bieber celebrity.
84	dangerous text drive besafe	Dangerous text-reader not working.
84	dont text drive	I don't have a computer.
84	seth godin news texting working shouldn text driving talk cell phone argu	We need phones, a text, phone, phone, phone.
84	greg biffle justin bieber address danger texting driving extreme makeover mtv	Greg Biffle Justin Bieber addresses the danger of driving an extreme, texto mtv-transformation.
84	watching extreme makeover edition sad story texting driving text drive	Look at the' editions of the extreme, sad, text-driven, text-reading relookage.
84	gonna driving time will text drive	Driving time is the transmission time of the text.
84	don text drive remember	Remember the text reader.
84	video terror texting toronto gta news toronto sun	Video of a terrorist attack.
84	dont text drive worldwide	You can't drive textbooks all over the world.
84	drive text	You can start the reader's text.
84	life waste text life shouldn text drive	Waste of Text Life should be the driver of the text.
84	twitition dont text drive remember alex brown	Twitition, which Alex Brown remembers.
84	justin bieber extreme makeover fan kid teen warning text drive inspired touched	Justin Bieber Extreme Kid Adolescent Makeover Fan Warning Text Drive inspired hit.
84	watching extreme makeover edition story sad don text drive	Watching the apos; History of the apos; Extreme Makeover Edition Sad Don Text Reader.
84	watched extreme makeover edition awsome lt	J' looked at the makeover.
84	don text drive remember alex brown	It's a good idea to try to make it easy for people to read it.
84	save text save life don text driving text life imagine dream inspire	Save the text save the life only lead the text live imaginer dream inspire.
84	don text drive example cell phone driving backseat	Don Text Reader Sample cellular phone(s) driving back seat.
84	pledge text drive	This is a text-reader for pledges.
84	hey dont text drive sake ur life sake love yall	Don't go.
84	sign pledge text drive	Point out the text reader of the pledge.
84	don text drive	Don texting drive.
84	don text drive pledge	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
84	texting driving good idea	T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T T
84	mobile launch service osl	Mobile launch service is also available.
84	remember alex brown	Just remember-you d' Alex Brown.
84	shouldn texted driving snowy foo	Maybe we should text Snowy Foo while we're driving.
84	don text drive makeachange	I don't know what you're talking about.
84	sign pledge abc makeachange	Sign the ABC Makeachange Oath.
84	textin driving remember alex brown teamfresh	The driver remembers Alex Brown, fresh out of the car; team.
84	drive text include tweeting	Tweets are included in the reader's text.
84	think extreme makeover edition great message tonight don text drive	Think extreme make-over grand message edition tonight Don text reader.
84	remember alex brown don text drive lt ambrat gt	Remember-you d' Alex Brown Don Text Drive gt.
84	bringing tear message heart don text drive	Bring the Message of Tears Heart Don Text Reader Don Text.
84	omg oprah plege wouldn text drive didn seriously lol xd bbl	Omg oprah plege would be a serious n&apos text reader; a serious lol xd bbl xd text reader.
84	watching extreme makeover don text drive	See l' Extreme Relooking Don Text Drive.
84	reading learn well knew dont text drive time donttextdrive	Learn how to read, write, write, write, read, read, write, read, read, read, write, read, read, write, read, read, write, read, read, write, write, read, write, read, write, write, read, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write.
84	app called auto text reply will auto text office car angel pledge don text drive	An application called auto-text reply will auto-text office because angel don't give a text drive.
84	florida car accident attorney texting ban state road safer	He's a lawyer specializing in car accidents in Florida, sending out text messages from the DMV; forbidden.
84	justin influence text drive	Justin influences reader of text.
84	going text driving	Text mode drive.
84	texting driving don mom	J' just text Don Mom's driving.
84	seth blog texting working texting working shouldn text driving talk	Blog seth work texto work texto work should text to lead speech talk.
84	tune abc check extreme makeover	Check the top finish of the abc.
84	nightt twitterlandd remember text wait shawty lt	Nuitt twitterlandd remembers to wait for text shawty ltt.
84	remember alex brown	Just remember-you d' Alex Brown.
84	don text drive	Don texting drive.
84	teen told wont text drive donor yeah sad reading photo caption choked	He said that there was no such thing as a text giver, a sad reading, a smothered photo caption.
84	seriously guy dont text drive addicted texting phone cant driving	Seriously, the guy who texts n&apos is not hooked on the phone, he can't drive.
84	watched extreme makeover tonight awesome apart	Well, tonight, we've been witnessing an extreme makeover.
84	smile katrina face extreme makeover aww seriously dont text drive	Katrina smile face l' make aww extreme seriously whose text reader.
84	texting working shouldn text driving talk cell phone argue dog	S' texting while working should lead you to talk about your dog's mobile phone.
84	extreme makeover	Extreme makeover.
84	remembering alex brown	Alex Brown, I remember.
84	amazing gah sad cry eye text drive watching will	L' incredible Gah sad eye drive text view Will.
84	pledge text driving	Text of pledges leads to text.
85	investor advisory firm call apple disclose ceo succession plan concern health apple chief	The investment consulting firm Apple disclosed the CEO's estate plan regarding the Chief Apple's health.
85	apple steve job newsweek	Apple Steve is working newsweek.
85	internet news steve job medical problem affect apple stock latest internet news steve job	The Internet is a major source of information for the pharmaceutical industry, as well as for the public.
85	ijsmblog week apple future steve job	I'm sorry, I'm sorry, but I'm sorry.
85	potential replacement steve job tech idea steve job absent app	Idea, teamwork, teamwork, teamwork, teamwork, and teamwork.
85	potential replacement steve job electronics worked ibm year including senior role	L' replacement electronics has been working for one year, including a senior electronics management role.
85	apple disclose succession plan ceo steve job influential proxy advisory firm i report	Apple discloses the company's succession plan; proxies consulting business.
85	appropriate apple shareholder demanding steve job succession plan macabre tone	An Apple stockholder demanding Steve's gruesome succession plan.
85	blog post potential replacement steve job apple	The blog posts a potential Steve job Apple replacement.
85	potential replacement steve job	Potential steve replacement.
85	steve job health private matter joe wilcox betanewssadly reaffirm position stated du	Health and Safety at Work, Private Business Joe Wilcox Betanewssadly reaffirms the position set out in the present document.
85	netgear bos astonishing attack steve job	Netgear's bona fide bona fide bona fide attack on Steve's work.
85	tim cook step steve job apple san francisco chronicle	Tim Cook Step Steve is a chronic Apple San Francisco job.
85	global cio apple face mounting pressure steve job succession plan	This is the first time in the world that the world has seen an increase in the number of jobs.
85	wired legendary steve job leave absence medical reason second time	C' is the second time that Steve legendary s' has been absent for medical reasons.
85	recap steve job will good time apple	Let's go over Steve's work now and then apple.
86	bullet rescuer hit captain arai mahomed somali pirate captured south	A bullet-saving man hit Captain Arai at home, a pirate Somali captured in the south.
86	south korea target pirate incorporation anti piracy operation gulf aden op	The goal of South Korea is to integrate pirates into anti-piracy operations.
86	second tweet somali piracy sea economist	Somali, hijacker of the air.
86	iranian oil tanker escape pirate attack	Iranian tanker escapes pirate attack.
86	indian navy sink mother ship somali pirate arabian sea held fifteen pirate custody	The Indian Navy sank the Somali mother ship Arab pirate Sea D'apos; held Arabian 15 Pirate Guard.
86	pirate battle free norwegian ship	The pirates freely fought the Norwegian ships.
86	indian navy coast guard rescue thai vessel pirate joint operation indian navy coast guard intercepted neutr	Indian Navy coast guard-saves Thai pirate ship.
86	indian navy seizes pirate indian ocean mothership don care tnfisherman	Indian Navy seizes ship-mother of the Indian Ocean do not worry tnfisherman.
86	test case malaysia selva somali pirate captured international water malay	Malaya selva somatic hijacker captured international malay water.
86	navy hunt pirate ship	The Navy is hunting the pirate ship.
86	navy destroys pirate mother ship arrest pirate indian navy coast guard joint operatio	Navy destroys ship-pirate mother, ship-mother, ship-mother, Indian navy, l' joint operation of guards-coasts.
86	indian navy arrest pirate drama high sea major anti piracy operation	India's navy is stopping the high seas pirate drama.
86	best news somali pirate hijack german ship somali pirate hijacked german owned ship mv amirojkes	Better news than the pirate of l' Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Air Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate Pirate.
86	somali pirate killed south korea rescue freighter crew south korean commando secure boat	The Somali hijacker has killed the Apos crew, a South Korean rescue freighter.
86	well korean navy rescue hijacked crew kill pirate	Yeah, well, the rescue of the hijacked Korean navy crew killed hacker kill.
86	somali pirate flown seoul somali men suspected hijacking south korean cargo ship arabian	They are also suspected of having hijacked a South Korean freighter.-Koreans.
86	trial pirate suspected hijacking south korean freighter samho jewelry arabian sea	Hijacking case suspected of d' hijacking South cargo ship-Korean Samho Arabian Sea jewels.
86	indian navy capture pirate lakshwadeep island indian navy captured	The Indian Navy captures the pirate Lakshwadeep Indian island capturing the captured Indian navy.
86	somali pirate expand motherships extend range game changer navy	The Somali pirates are expanding the mother ships... expanding the game ranges to change the navy.
86	somali pirate face life sentence lee hyo sik somali pirate captured south korean special	Lee hyo sik Somali pirate captured South-Korean faces life imprisonment.
86	malaysia hold somali pirate saving ship	There's something like a lifeboat in Malaysia.
86	south korea negotiating delivery somali breaking news south korea negotiating delivery	South Korea brokering the Somali delivery news of the South Korean breakup negotiating the delivery.
86	singapore news somali pirate face prosecution malaysia kuala lumpur somali pirate captured	Singapore Somali pirate news face malaysia pursuit kuala lumpali pirate captured.
87	identity theft cost infographic long ago identity theft online	It's a good idea to create a web site that allows you to find out more about our products, services and services.
87	protecting financial info identity theft mail	Financial Information Protection, Identity theft, Mail theft.
87	identity theft cost infographic	It's a good idea to have your name on the list.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	It's a big deal, but it's not a big deal, it's a big deal, it's a big deal.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	It's a big deal, but it's not a big deal, it's a big deal, it's a big deal.
87	identity theft social medium smith credit report refinance discovered	It's a good way to find out what's going on, what's going on, what's going on, what's going on and what's going on.
87	attorney general office identity theft prevention tip west virginia attorney general darrell mcgraw	Virginia Attorney General @-@Western, Darrell Mcgraw, was informed by the Attorney General of the Office of Robbery Prevention.
87	identity theft cost infographic	It's a good idea to have your name on the list.
87	colorado nation scammed state denver coloradan receive scam invitation	Nation Colorado scammed denver State Coloradan receive an invitation to scam.
87	type identity theft dark dragon grownup identity theft	Identity Identity Type Identity Identity Black Dragon Adult Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity Identity.
87	identity theft cost create problem business deal reaching fake provider showz	The cost of the project; the usurpation of identity; the problems created by the project; the business to reach the fake supplier Showz.
87	thumbnail drive wi fi device convenient risky safe tip fb	Nail miniature reader wi fi convenient security tip fb.
87	colorado nation scammed state identity theft protection expert warn informatio	It's a great way to protect your privacy, and it's a great way to protect your privacy.
87	identity theft cost infographic	It's a good idea to have your name on the list.
87	fact identity theft	Identity theft.
87	reminder beware identity theft harm credit tip protect identity	If you do not have the information you need, you may be able to use it.
87	identity theft steal social security number theft	It is also important to note that there is no information available on the identity of the individual.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	It's a big deal, but it's not a big deal, it's a big deal, it's a big deal.
87	identity theft social security number	Social Security Number (SIN) for theft of identity.
87	identity theft cost infographic	It's a good idea to have your name on the list.
87	freemont tribune safety tip atm tip safety	Freemont point-of-safety point-of-safety atm security platform.
87	identity theft cost comment	Comment on the Cost of Flight d' Identity.
87	protect phishing scam	Fraudulent phishing.
87	apps equal chance identity theft	Calls equals luck, theft, identity.
87	protect internet	The author of the article on the protection of privacy.
87	identity theft resource center protecting personal identifying idtheft identitytheft	Identity that protects individuals from theft; identity.
87	data privacy day roundup add ons tool tip protect online	Online protection tools are added at the Data Protection Day Gathering.
87	protect laptop theft	Protect yourself from the theft of your personal computer.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	It's a big deal, but it's not a big deal, it's a big deal, it's a big deal.
87	identity theft cost infographic	It's a good idea to have your name on the list.
87	apps equal chance identity theft leslie meredith start year company	Apps equals flight chance; identity Leslie Meredith begins the company's flight year.
87	identity theft cost infographic online fraud crime rise mo	It's a big deal, but it's not a big deal, it's a big deal, it's a big deal.
88	oscar nomination draw attention pa gas drilling gasland fracking	The name of the company is Oscar, and the name of the company is Oscar, and the name of the company is Oscar.
88	today read concerned gasland movie stand set record straight	It's the first time I've seen it, but it's the last time I've seen it.
88	oscar nominated gasland director josh fox gas drilling barnett shale dallas observer blog	Oscar appointed Director of Gasland, Josh Fox Gas Drilling Barnett shale Dallas Observant Blog.
88	gasland scare oscar nom best doc news junkie post read njp film review eco greedmachine	Gasland fear oscar name best post-reading junkie news doc njp eco-critical movie machine avidity.
88	industry boo oscar nod gasland	Boo-scar nod gasland industry.
88	vote best documentary oscar poll express pls	Vote on the best Oscar documentary express survey pls pls.
88	gasland nominated academy award coga defends	The Coga de l'apos Academy, appointed by Gasland, promotes the interests of yoga.
88	gasland oscar nod draw industry ire gasland documentary detail environmental impact process called fra	In addition, it is important to note that there is a need for more information on the natural gas industry, particularly in terms of its impact on the environment.
88	gas industry doesn gasland oscar nod figure fracking marcellus	L' Gas Industry makes an Oscar-winning Marcellus nod fracturing gas.
89	pressure grows myanmar sanction call growing western sanction myanmar	Pressure increases Myanmar punishment calls for Western Myanmar punishment.
89	pressure grows myanmar sanction afp	The penalty in Myanmar is increased by the pressure.
89	gbagbo camp futile cut ivory coast economy reuters ivory coast laurent gbagbo will find way	Gbagbo futile camp ivory cup of l' reuters Ivory Coast coastal economy gbagbo will find the way.
89	wikileaks pushed uk sanction iranian bank cable view britain settin jpost	Wikileaks supported Iranian cable Uk's crackdown on settin britain jpost settin.
89	suu kyi party urge west maintain myanmar sanction reuters	Suu Kyi Party urges the West to maintain the Reuters Myanmar sanction.
89	gbagbo camp futile cut ivory coast economy	Gbagbo futile camp Ivory Ivory coastal economy.
89	toughens sanction belarus join eu widening sanction belarus leader follow	The sanctions increase the sanctions of the head of the belarus.
89	sanction dull tehran commercial image casual observer sanction irania	Allow tehran boring commercial observer occasional irania sanction.
89	belarus promise adequate response eu sanction belarus voiced readiness proportionate	Belarus to promise an adequate response to the sanctions imposed on Belarus, expressed state of readiness.
89	expert differ sanction debate	The debate on sanctions is different among experts.
89	toughens sanction belarus join eu widening sanction belarus leader	The sanctions increase the sanctions of the head of the belarus.
89	chamber commerce writes iran express opposition sanction capital loyalty homeland	"The Chamber Trade writes that the ""Iran"" expresses its opposition, sanctions the loyalty of capital, the homeland of the loyalty."
89	suu kyi party urge west maintain myanmar sanction reuters reuters party myanmar pro	His Kyi Party is urging the West to maintain the Myanmar Reuters penalty pro pro pro reuters.
